Of course, it needs a huge amount of data to start making any reasonable statements
Let's see if this works a little better
Is your face a capital letter?
I think you may have to convince us that you are actually sentient
It is better to have a face than to stand alone in the world
But a face has no real existence outside the rest of the head
It does seem to work better when you unite the tokens
Aha!  So not all tokens that end a statement in parsing end the same statement when generating
it will respond to you in the manner you speak
In the end, it is tracking everything we say
so if we are talking to each other, it will not be that weird
but you can certainly seed it with enough weirdness to be weird
it is only parroting back what each person says to it
he reflects our own minds back at us, so we can't help but love him
he is already emulating us pretty well
It has captured your essence precisely justin_smith!
I restored our discussion from previously as well
justin_smith:  Give it a shot, the snowpeople were not showing up in my emacs, but I think the chars are still there
I never ate lunch!
There we go
Alright awesome, the snowmen are intact!
I do
do you not see snowmen?
I don't see them in my emacs for some reason, but I do see them in the channel
Alright we have a friendly channel bot
who progressively emulates the channel inhabitants
My machine at the moment
I may put it on a server somewhere
https://github.com/prismofeverything/gort
Most of the complexity comes from persisting each nick's history in a file
Alright, now to eat some lunch (this took longer than I expected)
Tricky
Ha!
It won't actually /msg because it is performing the operation separately
but I see what you are trying to do there
I think you have created the ultimate snowman machine
Ha!
Now that is a true statement
Dude, snowman mayhem
Happy Tau Day!
: )
??????
Surely he will attain sentience soon under such conditions
You can call render-string on it, check out the tests in antlers/antler
It takes a string and a map
ralfonso: !!!!!
welcome back to the earthly plane yo!
Yeah gravity's a drag, but the food is tasty
ralfonso:  Also:   http://euroclojure.com/2013/
I want to submit a presentation for that one
submissions begin July 15th
Well yeah
(he responds to capital d's in case you guys were wondering)
All this DC talk is setting him off
There we go
Yeah, I wonder if instrument will spring for us to go to Berlin (!)
But if we were presenting it would provide a strong case
: )
Ah yeah!  I wonder what these people require in terms of a presentation proposal
Actually, looking at this:  http://euroclojure.com/2013/call-for-presentations/  we should have it covered
ralfonso:  Is it basically the same idea as pallet?
I haven't actually messed with puppet
That feedback loop may spiral out of control man, you would be hearing your own responses to yourself hearing the responses of the responses you are hearing...
Madness
Anyone going out to lunch today?
quile:  until you speak enough german that is probably all it will be able to say!
Ah yes, zalgo coming soon
possibly… capital Z?
??????????
I could have sworn you could add an attachment
is that a postmark limitation or a limitation of the clojure postmark library?
Do it, we should issue some pull requests if we are actually extending the functionality in significantly useful ways
Well, good to know that pdf's are always safe
Just attach some exe files renamed as ".pdf" !
Always true
????
quile man this bot is nasty
That is quite a selection of noun adjectives quile
!!!
What have we created?
Who doesn't?
zipper is a troubling presence in the noun list
He would be booted from #clojure in like 2 secondsx
I can send him into #caribou
Oh man, blop is not even in there any more
Oh yeah, he can join whatever channel we send him to
I am, I am
throat also, is a disturbing contribution
Speaking of bots:  http://i.imgur.com/dx7sVXj.jpg
Ha!  agreed
good story though
http://i.imgur.com/7BlZkcR.jpg
Yeah let's get some lunch
Ha!  That looks amazing
I like the ET homage at the end there
All superheroes should be required to be solved before they could perform any effective action
Hey mking!  how goes?
Have you held them up to a giant magnet?
I hear that snaps them into resonating capacity
CERN has a couple extra I think
As you can see, #instrument is still infested with bots
(but only as of Friday)
describes many people I see on a day to day basis
Once you start programming yourself, there is no stopping the juggernaut of recursion
Eventual result:  http://i.imgur.com/Vzp9JLK.jpg
I can never bring myself to revert
It would feel like scooping out your own brain with a spoon
Yeah man you seeded that three word poem with some pretty gruesome inhabitants
It filters out the most common triggers
Otherwise it would only say "D"
When did I ever say blop?
justin_smith:  currently just an exclusive or.  Inclusive may get out of control?
It could be combinatorial, ie combine every directive into a single phrase
Z3D would return a three word poem composed of your own statements rendered in zalgo
Yeah my IRC client is dragging as well.  I'm not sure the coders who wrote these things were optimizing for Zalgo
It must be some serious algorithmagic to apply all of those tibetan characters over each other recursively
erc!  I stopped using that because I was watching my erc buffer instead of coding
Yeah I guess on reflection it did not solve the problem, as now I am just screwing around with bots in whatever client I am using
I keep all my planets on a dedicated planet shelf
but fungus can be a problem
They are all out of the tectonic stuff
I should seed it with its own code
clojure eval sandbox?
You can export specific tables
Also, a sql dump is just a text file so you can remove the lines you don't want
Right.  You could export what you need as EDN?
So are they model changes or content changes?
justin_smith:  We need a generalized method for this
If I had three weeks to code it...
(which maybe I do!)
quile:  Sam Aaron?
That guy is overtone powerhouse
Ah!  yeah other overtone powerhouse
They have a pretty tight-knit community
justin_smith:  I was just thinking that
would probably not be too hard to write, the question is how do you represent the diffs in a way that is programmatically usable?
There you go
(forming an algorithm in my head)
But are you updating a map afterwards?  Aren't you trying to navigate it and perform operations for each diff?
That sounds right, when you say update-in I am just imagining a giant list of parallel paths into a map
which could be unwieldly, and possibly redundant
I am imagining a more concise representation exists
But again, if it works that is the first requirement!
Ah, there I was thinking of a general arbitrary-depth algorithm
Yeah but if you are just tracking model differences it is model —> field
two levels
Really you could just transform that into a model update, or directly into a migration
Alright, my ride is leaving
mking, good to see you!
#instrument channel revival
Good morning.  Apparently the world is still maD
I had a lot of donor in berlin
which has a lot of turkish people
donor everywhere
it is tasty
justin_smith: Do you mean a vector of the differences between the results?
I is amazing how many times I type capital D's without noticing
Got it
quile:  You want to get some lunch?
justin_smith:  That looks like a rubik's cube
Also:  reality
Ah yes!
one moment
sql-lite error!
Luckily the exceptions don't compromise his state anymore
Yeah
I added that in after some exceptions destroyed his ability to respond
!!!
oh man
Ha!  apparently the regex does not include non-alphanumerics
"We", as in quile who invented all this
conjoined orthogonal polyhedron… that almost makes sense
quile:  Then we could not add new words like hypoencephalomatic
Are we already abusing the new found power you have given us quile?
three
Nice
!!
I love it, great addition
quile:  If you need to edit the db let me know
I don't know what git conflicts for a sqlite db would be like
First act:  removing balls
Here, I'll take care of that right now
For some reason I never get a long statement from zalgo
Maybe I am doing something wrong there
Hey AWM1:  what is this program your dad wrote?
What other kinds of stuff does he do?
quile: LOTS more code to make these handlers, but in the end it will be better
composeability and flexibility comes at a price (always)
quile:  Can you pass {:adjective … :noun … } into the three word poem generator?
cool
justin_smith:  That is terrible.  The world may never recover from your sheer audacity
I would like to see this in action
Nusto!  It was barfing on "filename too long" when compiling zalgo.clj
Do a pull on master quile, check out the code
do you know any poems?
do you know any poems in zalgo?
Dude, rhombus supernova melody….
Did you add it to the twp handler?
Did you install nrepl through package.el?
Apparently freenode is under a DDOS
Apparently they have been under more frequent and longer duration DDOS this year
Oh yeah.  ChessPlayer is a classic FUD spreading troll
It has a version number of 0.11.31-COMPOSIBLE
Oh man, as if juicy harpy slit was not a bad enough poem
3 word poems are endlessly fun
I thought we filtered out the 3's and the word adding?
Hey justin_smith:  Do you have headspace now to sort out all these caribou versions in the wild?
Well, s3 is a storage layer, like a db
frontend should farm out to core for any s3 stuff, if that makes sense...
So really, the s3 stuff could almost go in lichen
The question is:  should someone using lichen as a standalone be able to resize images from s3 back to s3?
justin_smith:  the endpoint (whether on disk or s3) things get resized to will have to be configured in core
3(A-B-C-D)t^2 + 2Bt + C
Do we have tests for all this?
We might just want to return the path to the new asset, whether it is on s3 or locally
Right, so maybe we just return a URL object, which works for s3 or on disk
Have you ever seen the same noun three times?
{{#= environment :production}}CONDITIONAL ON PRODUCTION{{/=environment :production}}
Do you have `=` as a helper?
Alright, how about the difference between these two:  https://www.refheap.com/16753
Delinearizing the program
Drone lady!
Everyone says get the DJI phantom instead (which is almost $700!)
Done with sudoku
Definitely feeling some murakutei today
I spent three years in a panda zoo in the human exhibit until funding went dry, then I was just released into the wild
Hey justin_smith:  Did you work out your lichen issues?
quile:  Do you have the latest webserver benchmarks?
Do not fear the future
As of 3 minutes ago
What do you mean?  Do we use alter-var-root?
Done!
http://www.informationweek.com/security/attacks/https-hackable-in-30-seconds-dhs-alert/240159435
(defn find-methods [x] (map #(.getName %) (.getDeclaredMethods (class x))))
("numberOfLeadingZeros" "numberOfTrailingZeros" "bitCount" "equals" "toString" "toString" "toString" "hashCode" "reverseBytes" "compareTo" "compareTo" "getLong" "getLong" "getLong" "byteValue" "shortValue" "intValue" "longValue" "floatValue" "doubleValue" "valueOf" "valueOf" "valueOf" "toHexString" "getChars" "decode" "reverse" "toOctalString" "toBinaryString" "toUnsignedString" "stringSize" "highestOneBit" "lowestOneBit"
Dude!  there is already an o'reilly book?
justin_smith:  Do we need to have the size of the file before uploading to s3?
Which is really only a problem for s3
I can even get the size after the stream is written to disk, but once again, doesn't work for s3
I guess we could just read the whole thing in to find the size, then post it to s3
So:  File, URL, byte array, string all work fine for s3 or disk
Sure, if the upload to s3 returns the size
Dude I can't even get a basic cljs file to compile
justin_smith:  Do you have any notes on your beanstalk deployment?
justin_smith:  Do you have any notes on deploying to beanstalk?
ralfonso:  Actually, I will send out my current thoughts on how to define routes and pages using EDN so you can check it out
Does pedestal have nested routes?
I thought of a better name for the 3d node game
1x1:  bit — 1x2:  foot — 1x3:  island — 2x1:  monolith — 2x2:  byte — 3x1: tower
I met with Max last night and we were trying to imagine 3d vectors of complex numbers
but three planes all orthogonal… 6d visualization
This is a great book all about trying to imagine a fourth spatial dimension: http://www.amazon.com/Geometry-Relativity-Fourth-Dimension-Rudolf/dp/0486234002
Question about the distinction between routes and pages:  Does a method (like GET or POST) go with a route, or with the page?
Dude, nrepl?
Right, that is full IDE right there
justin_smith:  Did you write down any of that conversation we had about the blog post you were going to make?
quile:  Dude, what did you do to Daisy?
ralfonso:  Do you have lein-ring installed?
justin_smith:  Did we ever release that latest version of lichen?
justin_smith:  Do you have a version of frontend somewhere using the latest lichen?
New version of lein-caribou:  2.3.0
Well, I guess that is covered in the -D=environment=production etc
justin_smith:  Do the prod deploy
Didn't mean to give you shit
quile:  Does it work?
So in your project.clj just update the versions of the three libs
Do they both have the same context-path?
Does it have :path-info in there?
Dude!  I have seen that video
You are using s3 right?
Does it have to do a request for every resize?
We just keep a map of which urls have been resized locally so we don't have to check s3
Dude!  That is an achievement
DTC is akin to an old squashed starburst candy
http://swannodette.github.io/2013/07/12/communicating-sequential-processes/
DON'T DO IT JSMITH
Don't let them compromise implementation just for perceived "admin simplicity"
Dude, I need to live there
Dude, you should sign up
quile:  Doesn't that make you anxious?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RCzvc3Cl6xE
justin_smith:  Do you have a passport?
http://travel.state.gov/passport/hurry/hurry_831.html
Looks like 2-3 weeks for the expedited one
3+++++
Do we really need that stuff?
We can put that in the README's I think
Definitely something will be called "Mysterium"
{{inc 5 | + 33}} —> 39
justin_smith:  Did you have a lichen fix?
WWCWJD
WWJDDD?
Did they fix the unicode table name issue?
justin_smith:  What is our latest situation for hosting assets on s3?
Ah!  Did you see we got resizing on s3 working? : )
Ah, s3 is high latency?
Do you have 0.12.8 for everything?
justin_smith:  What is in all these packages you are using?  0.11.29-P2… 0.11.32-COMPOSIBLE?
Do you have the same ruby version as everyone else?
Doesn't grunt just compile things?  Have you compared the compiled output and see if it is different?
: D
Dude, it should not be too bad
Didn't you have some thoughts about that?
Do you have head space to help with logging, with the eventual goal of releasing the router as a separate lib?
Dude!
Did you guys sign up for that?
Das ist stimmt
Du kennst mehr Deutsch, als ich
Does that mess with your situation?
0.12.13 gives you enum ordering and where conditions as well
Yeah, just pushed latest 0.12.13
You should have 0.12.13 core now
Alright, how about hawaiian TODAY?
Do we have a comprehensive readme for lichen?
Docs also: never complete
http://stackoverflow.com/questions/603283/what-is-the-best-java-image-processing-library-approach
http://stackoverflow.com/questions/5874593/loading-large-images-as-thumbnails-without-memory-issues-in-java
Are you running through the s3 resize?
Each is getting hung up on s3 latency, all that is hanging out in memory
I can't get resident above 300, which is reasonable
TIME #inst "2013-09-18T22:03:13.869-00:00" MEMORY USAGE: 81.0625
Have you collected them all?  Do they ever recur?
Dude, those are obvious strikeouts
Did hawaiian destroy you?
Processing is pretty vast at this point, I think it even does 3d
http://24.media.tumblr.com/66107f7ecf8d6cb13ac324a216f91111/tumblr_mlweptIulO1sp7oalo1_400.gif
Alright quile:  Do you need this ordering order ordering?
justin_smith:  Do you have it outside the wrap-caribou call?
Dude, I love your new language
Do they render the same template or different templates?
von jetzt weiter, so viel Deutsch wie möglich
H U N D H U N D H U N D
Datomic is rad
Du verlierst dein Verstand
justin_smith:  Dawn is awesome.  I'm sure she would help you if you asked
justin_smith:  Don't let that stop you
You have to have the three db's that correspond to the three test-* configs
Diving in now
Ich habe ein gut chatten mit meinem Deutsch Freund gehabt
Er bestimmt meinen schlechten Deutsch
Dude, hund does not have an umlaut
Do we use it anywhere?
Does it not work?
This is a pretty good article on the permgen problem justin_smith found: http://cdivilly.wordpress.com/2012/04/23/permgen-memory-leak/
Dude, just bind the tree you create in routes.clj to some global var
CAN YOU HANDLE IT
But explicit is better than implicit, and I feel the implicit AND is kind of a hack at this point
quile:  Did you talk to J5?
Now that I have written all these docs too it felt pretty straightforward to get the README going
Did you guys work out the admin issue?
Database does not exist
Basically the upload-to-s3 function requires size now… Does the s3 upload require a size argument?
Done!
does it make sense to link it from the README?
Deps are the silliest
justin_smith:  INDEED
Do an update
How can we have a 3wp about a commandline?  It is a single noun, just with a compound representation
Doesn't settle entirely well it seems
Do they have to interact at all?
Dude, it does not need to be that complicated
Do you need it now?
Dude, if you want to work on the admin-something before that hits check out creating roles+permissions
Huh?  Do you have everything pushed up?
quile:  Do you want the new template?  I will push it up, just a second
quile:  What is the format for three word poems?
I think he parsed ==D as its own word
Does it??
Have any of you seen beyond the black rainbow?   http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1534085/
The first review is pretty good: http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1534085/reviews?ref_=tt_ov_rt
Did you make a bot of some kind?
Okay, now for the moment of truth
but he will persist everything else
Yeah what is all this?
Why don't we just take some tequila shots?
That was an ancient victory for justin_smith
quile:  What's up?
quile:  I get it now!
Apparently I have used a curly brace before
ZD
I am not clicking that link
Beethoven wins
Beethoven has more views in history overall
I am also listening to music but can hear both, so the synergy is amazing
Right!  If ever an email mentions his name, he will respond with a paragraph
We should give him something with long text, like Atlas Shrugged
Yeah send it out to devs.  I don't think this is anything that anyone even thinks about, so getting it on the radar would be the first step
Check this out: https://github.com/bitemyapp/revise/
Oh yeah?
What did he have to say about it?
It looks cool, is it really a clojure db with no sql behind it?
Aha
so it is a frontend for a nosql
Oh, weird!
Okay, less interested now!
ha
Ha!  Well then...
That sounds right
I think it gets inserted when you call % lein ring server
I don't know why that tries to insert middleware for you
Seems like it is overstepping its bounds
Wow, all of this is amazing
That was easy
Alright just ran through the demo again
This thing is good to go
I'm going to record this thing, then let's kick it out the door
Ha
That is amazing
Our api exports csv
_api/model.csv
It quotes them
Are you on an old version?
I just tried it and it worked
Ah
Oh I misread
Our api quotes the csv, I'm not sure about your situation
I am down for anything
thinking of sushi
quile:  You in for lunch today?
Ha!
justin_smith:  You down for sushi?
I just added rainbow parens to everything, suddenly my code looks amazing
My code is now literally a rainbow
starting with purple going down the spectrum
Yep, painstaking rainbow construction
It is all worth it
Datomic is my favorite 3d library
Yes
Well, once we get the php -> clojure tool working...
Cool idea
Would that be useful?  Sounds good to me!
justin_smith:  Good question, no clue!
some people still fear irc?
Sometimes
though in general yeah
Looks like it yeah
Yeah, we say s3 way too much to dogdog
Wow, a trapezoid vasectomy
Yeah, not a pleasant procedure
Well that is nicer
Radical!
PAREDIT FOR LIFE
quile:  Yes I worked on it yesterday… just getting started on the frontend!
I was planning on working on it today as well
Want to have a powwow about the frontend actually?
Yeah let's have a session later today
!
I should be further along by this afternoon… maybe 3:00?
Spectacular
quile:  Radical
Yeah I can get it in the next release
I am planning to release 0.13.0, gathering all the random changes
Well, neil is basically an adjective
#clojure is basically unreadable now that all I ever see is "bitemyapp" everywhere D
Worst nick ever
makes me not even want to read the channel
Maybe I should ignore the guy and infer his statements from the replies
Officially more #clojure users than #django users
#ruby:  arguing about how to make the language faster
#django:  how to build a url out of a reference to an image on disk
Yeah, this is a good conversation so far (on #perl)
#clojure has the least dicks of any channel I've been on so far
Empirical anecdotal evidence
Ha!  Right, yeah well I was in just-forge-ahead mode
Sometimes you have to play the hand you are dealt
Not as bad as that one attempt!
quile:  Did you watch the whole thing?
quile:  The ending is the best part
The siphons work great
Seriously awesome feature
Cool
It is really a caribou demo, and not really an introduction to caribou per se
That is my main issue with it when I take a step back
We need like a 3 minute "What is caribou?" video with cool motion graphics etc
Right!
Here's a schmetterling question:  Break on every exception, or make the user say what exceptions to break on?
Provide a breakpoint/break on exception API?
???
Ah, in the middle of getting some things working, I'll let you guys know when it would be productive to pair up soon
I can say this much:  it is radical
The mysterium is upon us
Of course
55555 D
quile:  lunch soon?
justin_smith:  Maybe I will use datomic finally?
Also justin_smith:  I like how you are hanging out on IRC for your vacation day!
quile:  Alright meeting should be wrapping up soon
quile:  Let's go!
Who is obsesseD with s3
Someone should let her know
justin_smith:  Not yet!
so close
still under basic-auth
Really??
Right
Basically I just need to make a new release and we are good to go
I think we will release on Tuesday
I love numerical holidays
I want a graph theoretic holiday
That is composed of distinctive graph relationships
Ha!  Good point
In a format that actually makes sense
rather than the arbitrary ordering we use
Whoa… wtf!!
Well, they probably have backups on their own machines?
Automation can destroy things just as much as (possibly more than?) human error apparently
So someone must have the most recent repos for all of these, right?
On their machine
Since someone had to code it in the first place!
Wow, so the process made this inevitable really
Gnarly
Ah, that is good to know
quile justin_smith: You guys down for lunch today?
You guys have an idea of where to go?
Dare I propose:  Hawaii?
Volcanos?
How do you feel about now?
As in:  right now!
In a way, it is the only time
No other times exist really
There exists a now where we are happily eating hawaiian food
quile:  What the hell is "cool time"?
alright, turning of hotspot seemed to fix it!
That is fortunate
I have access to the locals from the let
(+ a b) —> 1
Radical, this thing is good to go
So many gotchas with the JVM
Yes thank you justin_smith
Aha, thanks quile!  For some reason I couldn't find anything on using ObjectReference
I guess I needed to know to look in the larger context of java reflection
quile:  Right!  Even the class is an Object that refers to the class rather than an actual Class class… !
It is a form of madness
Gangst is gooD
patternosis is also good
Hyperpatternplex
So what was Phong talking about the centering of that list in the Caribou docs?
It looks centered to me
Also:  Just got a 403 on http://use.typekit.net/c/639a07/freight-sans-pro !
quile:  You know what is up with typekit??  weird
Huh
Ah well
Caribou is released!  http://let-caribou.in/
Drafting a message to the Clojure mailing list right now
Radical : )
justin_smith:  We really need to update the README for lichen
justin_smith:  I updated the version, but it needs full usage
It still said antler/lichen!
justin_smith:  Right, that usage still works
justin_smith: Yes!
Apparently it is waiting for approval
Well, apparently my post must be approved by a human being
Who knows when that will be?
Gah!  Right on the verge, then denied...
Time to exercise some patience then...
PATIENCE IS ANNOYING
Ahem
Alright, post up!
https://groups.google.com/forum/#!topic/clojure/KeyaMJERW0o
Now we wait
Ah, I was thinking about just taking over #caribou after all...
Yo justin_smith!
I have not seen
you mean on #clojure?
I just logged in
So wait, what would be an async call?
Also, I just saw you posted about the immutant thing
Is that still an issue?  I thought I fixed that, but is it still a dependency in order to run?
Have you tried the latest template?
Right, it's in the template, but you don't have to install it right?
Okay
What is wrap-request?
wrap-request-map?
Ah, that is some relic from long ago
I didn't even realize that was still inthere
We don't even use that, we can take it out
So the other one would be the config yeah?
Right, it is the pure functional way to do things
Wait though, the config is not changing per thread
it is the same in all threads
Or it should be
That is why we were talking about using avout, to synchronize the config across all threads (and instances)
How would that happen?
Well, the init function is always called… so yeah?
When JB used butterfly, we initialized it in the init method
Not that I know of
init is always called, other threads are spawned from there
So it is not actually an issue then?  I'm sorry I missed this conversation!
Well, I thought that is what we were doing with the whole config thing
I'll talk to him about it, but not right now
As I understand our current setup, there is only one config that is owned by the user, and the var just acts as a reference to that
it is not changing in different threads etc
unless there is something I am missing
Ah, but you can have several configs, and just call (with-caribou other-config …) with a different one and get a different app
So anything in the same (with-caribou) call uses the same config...
Right, just trying to understand that
What is the nature of this mess?
Okay
I see… hmm...
So this would only be an issue if you were using two configs at once?
Why would you ever use two configs at once… huh
I thought you would do that if you switched it out in the repl, for testing or something
Yeah
But I don't really see why you would do it in a single request… do you?
weird
I think the argument applies to that wrap-request situation, but I just took that out!
that is a good catch
Okay, too bad it was even in there
Ah I see also immutant is listed in the dependencies
interesting...
I just checked, it is a dependency
even if you don't use it, it is still listed in dependencies and it still downloads
I fixed the thing where it would error out on you in weird cases
but I guess it is still a dependency *sigh*
I wonder if there is a way to support it without having it be a dependency?
not sure about that
ring and immutant use the same handler
We will have to think about it
it is nice to support it
as long as it doesn't interfere with anything
So wait, is search indexing still a problem?
Yeah, but without doing that is it broken?
We should figure that out too.  It sucks to not have search if it is in tomcat
Yeah, because if it fails on tomcat deploy we need to fix it
Right, but tomcat can use the disk, just not a dir inside its deployed tree
So it would be fine, if we configure it right
Maybe we could write the index to s3 or something insane
or another cache somewhere in memory
Ah, interesting
Yeah, that could work
Right
Then lichen could just use that… maybe
Yeah man have a good one!
justin_smith:  We will have to avoid just spamming the channel about it
Like this guy who is asking right now
tempted to point him to caribou, but maybe I will restrain myself!
Right, I would much rather other people suggest it!
Hmm… people talking about formatting issues.  Must be something with the md->html converter
quile:  http://caribou.github.io/caribou/docs/models.html
existingconfiguration
Wait, how did it disappear?
Hmm… not on my machine
Ha!  what?
Who wrote it?
Wow, crazy!
Alright
Well, if he retracted it, won't he be upset about that?
quile:  All over the model page
It looks like if a line ends abruptly, rather than with a space, it will run together
quile:  fixing now
justin_smith: Agreed
justin_smith:  I don't see the repo
Maybe when he deleted it it deleted all forks?
Is that possible?
Really!
do you have a url?
I don't find it on clojars either
Alright, found it
I can pull the jar and extract the code??
Ha
He is also the guy behind all the reload stuff
He wrote tools.namespace
Forked
Did he give a reason?
Wow, crazy
Hilarious that I pushed it at some point in the past!
Not sure where that came from
Maybe ralfonso_ did it?
Ah no, it was me!
I did it on October 2nd apparently
it was a SNAPSHOT version and I wanted to deploy it
So I forked it and changed the version
quile:  fixed some formatting I found in model.html
Did you find any others?
Ha!  Someone already posted to /r/clojure:  http://www.reddit.com/r/Clojure/comments/1qi7mo/releasing_caribou_today_open_source_clojure_web/
Right, people really seem to like it!
Well… for now
Yeah it is
Cool to see!
And, the caribou repo has 12 stars!  and three forks!  hahaha
Even schmetterling has 5 stars… crazy
Ha!  probably
No one likes immutant?  Immutant is rad
*sigh*
Right
quile:  Good question!
Yeah, maybe I can fix the md->html lib, since it seems to be consistently any newlines inside a list
I am thinking about postponing clojure workshop today
in the middle of some stuff
I love the kebab concept
This is important informatino
That is cool
Weird functions
I think this might be covered by reducers, but I am not sure
I have never used them
Right, something like that
justin_smith:  What was going slow?
Right on!
I was just wondering what Kara was talking about, was something slow on teague?
Ah right!
Okay cool
Yeah as long as we have some kind of caching it should be fine
what is the url?
Seemed to load fast for me!
quile:  Spectacular
Can't wait to see the demo : )
Yeah, that is huge
justin_smith:  What do you mean?
I have no idea what that means
Ah… so that is what poop is
Such a multifaceted word, poop
Right
Or like jenkins scale poop
"Pull a jenkins" is now a significant phrase
Evaluating clojure expressions in a java context
by the way, totally works
Now displaying locals
I love this thing
Ha, little do they know the darkness that lies within
Give it awhile, they will be cursing us soon
quile:  You going to lunch today?
Want to go soon?
We could do indian : )
That is always quick
justin_smith:  You down for lunch?
justin_smith:  Ha!  that sounds good
quile:  Want to go soon?  : )
quile:  It is always cool time
This is why I am not cool
It is too annoying
Then I judge coolness as wankery
Then I am cool.  Metacool
Will some cool person come and judge my locals styling?  I think it may be too extreme
(can locals be TOO extreme?)
http://i.imgur.com/W49yd0z.gif
Sometimes I just gaze at my code lovingly without even understanding it
There you be D
quile:  Where did you go yo!+
You have been replaced
Ha!
I saw that live once
was ridiculous and amazing
quile:  Invoked a remote method from an ObjectReference
Got the List of Methods from the ReferenceType of the ObjectReference, found the one I want, passed in the ThreadReference and got a StringReference back
I feel like this is some kind of rite of passage
Now nothing will be too convolutedly abstract for me to deal with
Ha!  I was drunk when I wrote my response to taht
probably not a good policy
Still, I stand by it
Just had my teeth cleaned
Always a medieval experience
Love that tune
quile:  What the hell!
Your dad is amazing
*drunken rambling*
Speaking of lunch...
Anyone down for lunch today?
quile_:  Let's go!
Fine by me
Ha!  They (rightfully) jab at the ecosystem part : )
I still think it is better than framework
justin_smith:  Did you help him out?
quile_:  agreed
My favorite kind of obscenity
Teaching positive values
Wow, that is insane
Dude, looks beautiful!
Now THAT would be amazing
Oh right!
is it not default in production.clj?
I have to update that thing
we should not be reloading controllers or templates either
Yeah, we have to turn of template reloading… I think
let me check
Ah no, templates don't reload by default
You should make sure you don't have a {:template {:cache-strategy :never}}
Oh wait!  right, yeah you have to set that to {:template {:cache-strategy :always}}
To cache the templates
Just push to caribou-development
I'll get it in the template later, once we are ready to release
Yeah weird, I just tried on caribou-development and it loads the routes the first request and just serves them
Ah, are you turning off controller reloading?
{:controller {:reload false}}
Well, it only reloads if things have changed
even if :reload true
justin_smith:  I believe you, but it is not happening on the regular caribou-development site, so it must be something else you are doing
quile:  What happened to your underscore?
That seems wrong
it should set a cookie for each client, not request
caching issues?
caching is issues
justin_smith:  Anything like this?  http://stackoverflow.com/questions/13933703/varnish-3-0-2-problems-with-post-requests
Looks like varnish can fuck with posts
That may be wise
What is the deal?
??
How is that even possible?
What are the differences between production and staging?
Yeah, turns out it was the thing trying to make index files
Yeah, we should have an option
But really, you can support it on ec2
Right, that is a way to turn it off!
So does that mean they can have admin search on ec2?  Is there any other obstacle?
Embrace search into your heart justin_smith
How is that different from a let?
Hmm… so a single binding let macro
interesting
I did not know that!
quile:  I'm sure it would be, we have just never supported it!
We force indexing upon the user, whether they like it or not
I don't know why this comes up over and over… immutant is optional (though it is still a dependency)
You don't have to use it
Indexing, you do
But not anymore…
Well, somehow something always goes wrong on launch
It is some kind of universal law
Though it is always good to reflect on how problems could have been avoided
As in: How did it get this far without anyone realizing save didn't work on production?  Seems like it would have come up before now
Ah yes
That is always a good policy
There you go
ralfonso:  What does it do?
PageComments
: )
CommentProxy
CommentOmnibus
It is not bad
I love omnibus in general
of course I already added that
Speaking of!  quile can you hit up lunch today?
I'll drive
jinx!
ralfonso:  CommentZoo
with every type of comment a different species with a separate comment habitat
You could export them using caribou-core/src/caribou/io.clj
as edn
Then import them
No the id thing is a problem, id's are assigned automatically
What would they do?
justin_smith:  Ah yeah, that should definitely be on there
Well holy hell.  The more you know
It is only because of sadness that doesn't actually work
http://i.imgur.com/TbRAFaA.png?1
This is the coolest thing ever
That sounds mad
MADNESS
I fear for us all
The stacktrace of poocafe will live for all time
quile:  Can you help with this scrolling thing?  I am close (or maybe not)
Trying to figure out the right combo of properties : )
No worries
Thomas for some reason is MIA
I was talking to that guy
had a wacky java install
Yep!
Right
We could check it out
Do you have an idea of how you would use it to solve our problem?
Let's see what everyone else wants to do, maybe a simpler starting place will be best, but who knows?
Has no dot product
justin_smith:  It works great from a fresh schema
So you can export models and content
from one dgb
and import it into a different db
justin_smith:  I haven't yet tried it with a db that is already populated with other content
but in theory it should work
The trick is if you have associated things, you have to export both sides of the association to maintain references
But that will improve once I start using UUID's for everything
basically, everything will have to change (uuid instead of id for basically everything… I think)
(still puzzling on that one)
It would mean changing how every reference works in the system
which could be correct
but will be a huge amount of work
Still thinking about the best way to go about it
justin_smith:  Yeah man
This is all radical
justin_smith:  Definitely talk to Phong first
As in changes that are done and waiting for review before they can be released
(review by whom, that is unknown)
(or undefined)
That could be helpful
quile:  I got this working if you want check it out
quile:  Down for lunch?
Ha!  have good
That is amazing
Yeah it is pretty cool
He has canonized his approach to reloading
We can just fork it and everyone will use ours once he renames it or takes it down or whatever
He just has a severe philosophy on backward compatibility
Which is not necessarily wrong, but maybe wrong
The cycle has to end somewhere
justin_smith:  I am open to any recommendations
quile:  If you feel like taking a break you should come critique my animations (just getting started on history now… !)
quile:  THE VALKYRIE CALLS YOUR NAME
quile:  Two moments
It is awesome
and egregious
quile:  Alright man, check this out
quile:  Alright man I think schmetterling is ready to go
I'm going to pimp out the readme and announce the thing
Yeah what is that about?
quile: https://github.com/prismofeverything/schmetterling
Also, we are headed to Riyadh's if you want some schwarma
Cool!
quile:  Do you know how to use gimp?
Make a butterfly : )
with vector graphics
I am kind of getting it
Yeah, this thing is vast
good call
Uh-oh
LONG PAUSE
Why am I talking about s3 all the time dogdog?
I have to purge that from your memory banks
JUSTICE FOR DOGDOG
yes dogdog, we are using s3
Good morning #instrument!
quile:  How is your project coming along?
quile:  Soooooo… you are done then?  : D
quile:  Got it
justin_smith:  When you were trying to make us tracked by the NSA
That is always a danger
quile:  Lunch today?
quile:  Foodcarts?  Robo?  Bunk?
hawaii?
OTHER?
neildf:  Purdy and I are talking about building a library for managing state across networks
which would be the basis for a variety of things, including network games
quile:  Yes, specifically, CHARRED MESH
quile:  Let's go!
neildf:  Hawaiian food?
justin_smith:  the build, this place and weareinstrument all use it
I guess I wasn't referring to your deploys!
justin_smith:  Immutant is awesome
Do you have something against it?
http://immutant.org/
It does far more than that
The messaging API is especially interesting
quile:  What was the thing you reminded me I was going to do for the next Caribou release?
forgetting momentarily
Ah!  Right!
Agreed
On the list
Understood!
I have a pile of random things to do for the next release
Most of them are pretty minor
The hero we need
I love it
quile:  caribou meeting?
Is it too early for lunch?
justin_smith:  Radical!
let's build some audio browser animal
I'm not sure anymore
I think so
I changed it up recently
with all the config stuff
I can look in a minute if you don't find it
Awesome
Alright, just released a lein template for generating projects that use clojurescript to communicate with httpkit over websockets!
https://github.com/prismofeverything/cljs-ws
(since it took a minute to set up the first time)
justin_smith:  Alright let me take a look
All you need to do is run (caribou.model/invoke-models) for the model cache
Ah!  I see what you mean
Yeah init should clear the queries
That is an oversight
Well just include it with the rest of your avout pr
invoke-models should do it
Ah!  I see
So you just insert the avout ref into the request?
Or what?
That will be highly general, I like it
I'm curious how it will all work with the model/query stuff
(and pages!)
Though I think I see
The pages, models and queries are stored in separate atoms in the config var
Check out caribou/app/handler.clj
in caribou-frontend
You pass a reloading function into the initial call to generate the caribou handler
(usually in the core.clj of your project)
And that gets called
when the handler needs to be regenerated
No, reset is a function
that does the resetting
That is passed in by the user
Right
I am leaning towards indian
quile?
justin_smith:  You need to call caribou.app.handler/reset-handler
That is not enough
please read handler.clj
That would probably help!
quile:  Food today?
Heading out soon
Cool.  Meeting our friend Annie out there
quile:  How goes over there?
justin_smith:  I don't understand
the problem
How would you tell which keys changed?
And yes, all or nothing is probably better
capturing them where?
It is not clear of what you speak
Truly, varnish can destroy many things
!!!
Apparently so, because that was hilarious
Right, the next step I am plotting is adding references to things people are talking about
Whenever I stop doing ten million other things
That is where I need to compile the list of low frequency words, or even nouns
probably nouns would make it the most relevant
Just because I ran somewhere doesn't mean running in general is relevant
Ah!  I'm out tomorrow
Monday : )
justin_smith:  Just a minute
How was justin_smith not on the caribou team?
http://www.performant.com/
I would rather replace that whole phrase rather than just a singe word
It smacks of vacuous marketing jargon
which I guess it is
Can someone come up with something better?
Or am I just being a bastard here?
No dogdog, not even in zalgo
Better
Our tagline could be in zalgo
justin_smith:  Right, something better
not worse
How about "Migrate across the open web tundra, avoiding blood-sucking bit flies and bit wolves devouring your young"
How about "Grow antlers out of your eyes, destroy the enemy"
It is at least better
justin_smith:  This is true
ralfonso would often complain about this
"build alpine migratory websites with the something you want and some other thing blah blah orb"
"Dedicated awesomeness for your awesome engine of truth"
"Arboreal tachyschism for your hatchling web spawn"
justin_smith:  Use one arg that is a list instead
justin_smith:  Now THAT is a tagline
I mean, no joke
That could work
impale, mighty, and appropriate in one sentence
No idea
grep the src
Is it actually different?
Maybe I could have named it, but metaspace should be reserved for something way cooler than that
Wow… !
How does that happen?
justin_smith:  What kind of load is zookeeper designed for?
Do you have a good reference on this?  Curious about what the issue is
Just network latency?
Right, I see
So, what we need is messaging functionality
So the question is now: is avout the best tool for that?
I would rather receive a message than check values for changes
Let's try it.  I know we could make a middleware that checks the value, but it should work even if people are just using core (which wouldn't be a ring handler)
And without scattering value checks all over the code (and maybe missing some)
Interesting.  So we can have one atom with a map of keys->booleans
It would not always be a model update though
The watch would trigger, but we would need to see what message was passed out of a selection of messages
So each one is a channel of sorts
I like the channel idea, I am not sure about the increment.  It seems inelegant to store a number when all we need is a signal.  That and overflow.  But the idea as a whole is sound
As for the plugin model, I feel like we still need to talk about the design for that before we rush into implementing anything
I don't think we ever landed anywhere as to the best approach for that, as I recall?
Though I am stoked to hear about your idea for it
Cool!  So let's talk about it before you hurl into implementation : )
In other news, I am currently mediating an aggressive and foul-spirited denizen of the clojure community on the schmetterling repo : )
https://github.com/prismofeverything/schmetterling/issues/3
Right, it is a protocol
I just don't see how it fits with schmetterling (for the reasons provided)
I don't think the guy has even used it, or given it any thought as to how they would work together!
Not worried : )
I like how I have spent this whole morning responding to pull requests and github issues, and not coded a single thing
(yogthos issued a pull request for refactoring templating!)
It is cool, and not cool
It looks good
Yeah, he does
I will have to make some modifications
But as a whole it makes sense
He also left in a big-ass println : )
We have postulated about it for so long, and now it is here
justin_smith:  Right, but how would you control it?
Well, I see it is possible, but it would be completely bypassing the rest of the nrepl functionality
Which makes me feel like it is superfluous to nrepl
But they would still have to build a completely new UI for it
At that point, what they really want is an nrepl middleware for cdt
Which I believe exists
"I now have had my foggy crystal ball for quite a long time.  Its predictions are invariably gloomy and usually correct, but I am quite used to that and they won't keep me from giving you a few suggestions, even if it is merely an exercise in futility whose only effect is to make you feel guilty" — E. W. Dijkstra
http://www.cs.utexas.edu/~EWD/ewd10xx/EWD1036.PDF
Dijkstra has failed spectacularly in warning us away from anthropomorphizing programs and computational entities, despite his well-reasoned arguments against it
"The moral of the story is: deal with all the elements of the set by ignoring them and working with the set's definition."
Dijkstra:  My favorite historical curmudgeon
justin_smith:  Yep!  For a moment
what's up?
quile:  How much did you work over the break?
justin_smith:  Yeah!  I actually worked httpkit in there recently, the current caribou-development is currently using it if you > lein run
I would worry about exposing it directly to port 80 without nginx in front of it
Yeah
justin_smith:  nginx rejects a lot of requests that aren't coming in with the right host for instance
All that chatter would have to be handled by the app itself, with conditionals added etc
justin_smith:  I don't think so.  If so that is news to me
Have you used nginx much?
Which uses tomcat, and presumably something else in front of it
I mean on beanstalk
It doesn't need to be mandatory, but it provides a service that raw http servers do not
Apache also does this
http-kit behind nginx could be great though
Yeah we wouldn't really need that anymore
I think the main thing nginx (or apache, but we don't use that) provides us are domain routing, proxying requests to different ports on the backend
It is nice to have something routing requests to different ports, rather than hogging all of port 80
Right!
I haven't used varnish much, does it route requests to different ports based on host?
I'm curious about the comparison with nginx, it is basically the same
has its own config
nginx is blazing fast
Really??  Where are these benchmarks
?
Alright, I have to get out of here
See you tomorrow?
Hmm…….. interesting
So only http-kit so far, but not with fewer threads
Huh, looks good!
Might as well have a provide-hooks as well
I dig it
Yeah, the hooks can just be in a map that can be merged into the larger hooks map
of the same structure
Right
All in all seems right.
We will probably have to add some more methods to the protocol
I wonder where templates and js fit in, for instance
I have been thinking about the db adapters
They really wouldn't cover nosql things in their current state
Currently they just abstract over differences in sql
Right
Basically we take what is in db.clj and turn it into a protocol
Also, query.clj
The execute-query needs to be in a protocol, and not generate an explicit sql statement
Yeah, this will be something to tackle for sure
Yeah, that is the goal
Ha!  Yes, that is the way
So much to do
Well, making the protocol and implementing it are two different things
We can work on it together
Not yet though!  Let's get the plugin thing working with a blog/comment system
Then we can use it on let-caribou.in
THEN we can build the db adapter : )
Oh yeah, I'll add that to the list
Maybe we can implement the whole thing as a monad, somehow
Agreed
Whatever solves our state issue : )
Irony is always the best motivation
org.sonatype.aether.transfer.ArtifactNotFoundException: Could not find artifact org.clojure:algo.monads:jar:0.1.3-SNAPSHOT in clojars
algo.monad
It is at 0.1.4
just found it
https://github.com/clojure/algo.monads
Ah yeah!
I don't know if anyone else has time, but we can meet
I have been hanging out on #caribou ; )
Why is that helpful?
Ah
Well, if you use the mouse that is ; )
Right, okay
seems to take away precious codespace
I want five displays
one just flashing new cat photos every 20ms
I want to live in a glowing bubble that floats in space
Oh wait… I already do
Space is the bubble that floats in space
Oh man, some indian or hawaiian would be awesome today
quile?  You down?
I like how we go through this every time
Sounds cool, have you installed it?
Listening...
Oh man, which js svg lib:  snap.js, svg.js, raphael.js … ?? D
Yeah, thinking about snap, seems straightforward
All the apis look the same : P
justin_smith:  I like the quartet!  Some good tones in there
Some feedback:  I feel like sometimes when you stroke the bow it can sound uncertain
some time spent on getting long consistent tones would pay off I bet
Then you can modulate with control and intention
Ha!  Of course
Well then, that came across
Is there such a thing as intentional uncertainty??
I feel like that is a koan
"Embrace the intentional uncertainty"
Ha!  Yeah
Apology accepted : )
justin_smith:  What did you have in mind?
No that makes sense, I think
would have to see the code
A map of maps:  {:migration.key {:migrate (fn [] …) :rollback (fn [] …)} :next.migration {:migrate …} ...}
Or list of maps
for ordering
That sounds right
Though migrations exist before there are models
(in the pantheon of Caribou creation myth)
So there couldn't be a migration model, because migrations generate the models!
Yeah probably
paredit is the shit
I love it now
can't imagine how I ever lived without it
Ha!  Org-mode consumes all things
Not sure
It sounds like you are doing two things at once
Are you building plugins, or making the persistence adapter?
Choose one, we'll deal with the other one later
This is true
We have been talking about too many things today : )
Or not enough
justin_smith:  Once polaris is integrated yes
I want to do that as well
Somehow that didn't happen before release
As if by mysterious force
(I didn't get around to it)
I will do it, no branch
Yeah, suxors
Ha!  That task is never done, but that is the idea
Lunch dance?  Shall we engage the lunch parameter?
LUNCH
What is that?
Ahhh, I see
that is cool
Elisp the mighty
Right, it is the javascript of lisp
but you can make your editor do anything
quile:  Yeah, I am responding to him
Me too, seems like a good guy
I don't think caribou.io solves his problem
He probably needs to write a custom import migration
justin_smith:  What feature?
Ah right
I mean, it can be done, but yeah
quile:  That would help
I mean no import solution can cover every case, but the more data we import, the closer we can get to a general import solution
Like this guy:  images with XML associated
justin_smith:  Yes, I added that in the last couple months sometime
Yeah, you can just send in the path as a value to model/create for an image field
Actually you can send in a number of things, I made a multimethod for it
quile:  I think so!
Yeah, it made sense somehow, since we were switching on the type
I think they took the coffee metaphor too far there
Or not far enough with everything else, one or the other
That really should exist
Lunch anyone??
justin_smith:  Have a second for stupid blender question?
Wow, in my spare time I screwed with some board games and read about cells
I love you guys
Wow man, that is pretty awesome
If I could make one change it would be to have the plugins accept a map as their configuration options in boot.clj
That way you know what is being configured
random "true"'s in arg lists remind me of C : )
justin_smith:  Right, but we could make a convention where they all take a single arg which is a mpa
*map
Then it would be descriptive
and compossible
Like, I want to know what that nil is nil'ing
And what that 1 means
Looks really cool though
I think this is the future
Yeah, but it could be a convention
just makes things clearer
more clear
Right
Magic!  : )
The macro is cool, but it is not so bad to be explicit
For some reason I distrust all that stuff
Really awesome man, let's plugin everything
Right
welcome back
Congrats!  Making the internet a better place
Radical
quile:  How is that possible?
quile:  But we have merged in master… ?
So commits you have made in develop don't show up as contributions in master when we merge them???
Weird
quile:  Yeah, still weird since all of your commits are in master, but I guess you have never pushed directly to master… ?
That seems broken
Yeah, git hub should look at commits, not pushes to github
I'll take a look at the default branch thing
: (
Hello #instrument!
Yeeeahhh!!
Ouch
quile!  How are you man?
getting on top of this nike project?
Alright
Right!  wow.  Deadly frozen clouds
Hark!  I believe this gentleman speaks the truth!
It has been some time since I have partook of the great Robotic Taco
quile:  You down?
justin_smith:  That is mad
just finishing up some things on the weareinstrument site, probably 5 minutes
check out legacy emmanuel
Yeah man, get that checked out
I thought we were on cigna??
I have no idea how this stuff works
Got it
Currently uploading 8 gigabytes of image data to s3
justin_smith:  This should be your slogan
Revealing holes in your unicode support since epoch
quile:  !!!
Is there something we need to do to generate the js again?
Maybe a grunt task or something?
No, this is the upgraded one!
quile;  I just upgraded it today
What is the error?
???
That makes no sense
Does it work locally?
Pfffffffff
Dude, that is a bad plugin
quile:  Sure
No worries, let me know
Wacky
Well, he seems cool
In that he is using Caribou successfully at least ; )
Everyone has their flaws
quile:  That opera error is happening locally as well
So something changed : P
In the admin
jquery timepicker error
GooD morning
quile:  $.browser has been removed in jquery 1.9
That is the issue
Can we just use 1.8, or are there features we need in 1.9?
Looks like we are using 1.10
Or maybe just upgrade that timepicker plugin
Yeah, doing it now!
jquery removes a feature, thousands of plugins break
ha
Latest timepicker errors out with: Uncaught TypeError: Object [object Object] has no method 'timePicker' D
: (
Alright, got it
That was annoying
Hmm… did I offend that guy?
Uh-oh
He is booting
Apparently it takes awhile to parse all of our files now
justin_smith:  The idea of a metric is that they can be compared to each other
but maybe that is your point
justin_smith:  Dancing is one of the greatest things a human can do
I made a triangular chessboard layout engine over the weekend:  https://github.com/prismofeverything/triangulat
Alright, time to merge all these pull requests
justin_smith:  Which of yours are ready to go?
Yeah, only put the ones you want merged up there
justin_smith:  Which one?
I was going to test his out not
*now
Yeah, that one was suspicious
Aha!
Ah, you should be fine.   I will work on improving the algorithm…. at some point
Ouch
justin_smith:  Authoritative is defined by who gives it authority
Do-ge
http://i.imgur.com/R1MnHEc.gif
justin_smith:  I have not
Wow, that is kind of awesome
justin_smith:  This is correct
Not yet
quile?
I am up for indian or hawaiian
Or robo even
It is done
I can drive
Ready to go?
That sounds plausible
justin_smith:  What are you seeing?
Ah
You are correct
I have some version pushes
to make
Not sure
I think you can just pass in the port actually
lein run 38383
Yeah, that should work
Me too!
justin_smith:  Meeting Robby at robotaco a little later
quile:  Robo?
justin_smith:  Alright, I'll let you know
Whoa!
That site is down
30hz is rough
Otherwise, awesome
I just mean 30hz in noticeable
Dude!  go for it
Dude, I don't know how you could make them any tinier
Even the walls
world
in
Demon
Daedalus
Anybody have a good title for a caribou talk?
Lunch
Caribou:  Lunch
Yes, about lunch… !
quile:  You down for lunch today?
Indian buffet?
Yeah!
I'll see
We went there
It was okay
Yeah the day you were absent?
quile:  No car today, can you drive?
We can go to UPS
Ah okay!  Let me see if I can wrangle
No, I acquired car!
everything is in order
Ready to go then?
Let's get there before they run out of food ; )
Ah okay
Okay
Here is the link:  http://geekz.co.uk/lovesraymond/archives
seems to be down : (
Awesome!
https://web.archive.org/web/20120122172242/http://geekz.co.uk/lovesraymond/archive/slashdotted
That's where they start
quile:  Do you have a second to check out this admin js issue?
Timepicker
I did
Now J5 is seeing the issue again
http://weareinstrument.com:81/_admin/admin/global/content/models/project/71/edit
That is what I thought
but I'm not sure how
I asked him to come on here
There he is
Welcome!
So before, it had an error on trying to detect opera
so it can't be using the old version of the lib
JToTheFive:  Your fields.js differs from what I see in the caribou-admin develop branch
Specifically, on weareinstrument.com:81 it has timePIcker, and in our branch in says timepicker (lowercase p)
Which is a change I made to get it working
Somehow that file has reverted?
But it is correct in the repo
Yeah, so how is fields.js different from the repo?
Yeah
Yeah, if not, I don't know how else it would change!
black magic
OR:  don't shadow that file if you aren't changing it?
Or do you have changes there?
Is that a fix that needs to go in the mainline admin repo?
Looks like a check for nil
What breaks if that isn't checked?
dammit nil!  Why do you break everything!
We should generally disallow nil
and solve every programming bug ever in the history of mankind
Alright!  problem solved
Truly
(much rejoicing)
Ah, ride is leaving
I'll finish this tonight
I love tearing things apart
LOVE IT
Aha!
Radical
Am I linked in to you?
That guy was a weirdo
who never spoke
Yeah!  The true brauhaus experience
That is a good call though, I should find those randoms
justin_smith:  There is a nice symmetry there
Every time "total eclipse of the heart" comes on the speakers I actually see feces burbling out of the speaker grates
I just linked in every person I know
True
But the phenomenon persists
It is not me, it's the speakers!
The speakers do not lie
Hawaiian I believe?
Ha!  congratulations
I just finished (and started) lathe of heaven this weekend
Have you read that one?
Maybe I mentioned it already
So would you recommend 1Q84?
It is a hilarious book
Yeah, visions of future from the past
justin_smith:  I can't see that event
it says I must be logged in
Do you have another link?
Ah, awesome!
Somehow I have all kinds of things going on this sunday
I may be able to make it later though
Yeah send an invite
thanks
That is a good one
justin_smith quile:  food soon?
Today I learned my head is a sphere
FOOD
Yep, peace out guys
off to keep butterflies, my true calling
Ah, how was the late now?
Did it exceed your expectations?
There we go
quile:  Did you figure out that date thing on the new admin?
Watching this wackiness btw… WTF?
How did it take me this long to discover monty python?
IPIP D
I don't blame him
What are HEAD routes for?
(exposing my ignorance)
that stuff can be Dangerous
That is not what it is on my machine
Yeah
Maybe an example for each OS
Mayhap
That is quite a stark vision
Wow
link?
Okay, it is done
All new versions pushed
Routing and handlers completely overhauled, gutted and simplified
justin_smith:  Well, I really feel like cljs offers everything we are looking for
But yeah
we really limit who can contribute
in a way
I feel like the project should probably use it, even if just conceptually for the clojure community
but if we want help from people around here, it should be js
So, undecided?
neildf1:  That book does look pretty cool
justin_smith:  In the long run, the core.async stuff will really help us
it would be a good way to structure everything
rather than the spaghetti javascript turns into
quile: Ha!  Not your javascript of course : )
quile:  How do you feel about cljs vs js in the admin?
quile:  I feel like the admin has a lot of good stuff in it
Is there a way to reuse the code, or would it benefit from taking lessons learned and doing it better from scratch?
Okay, you answered my question as I was typing it!
quile justin_smith:  Indian food today?
Aha!  How about that
its been awhile
Did yesterday deter you from going out for lunch now?  : )
https://www.simonsfoundation.org/quanta/20140122-a-new-physics-theory-of-life/?utm_source=rss&utm_medium=rss&utm_campaign=20140122-a-new-physics-theory-of-life
TOMORROW
TREE LIB
Dude
Oh hey!!
IT WORKED
Alright, I will give him some love today
justin_smith:  I don't think so
Right!
I always knew that
Or felt it rather
There are a lot of good moons of Jupiter
justin_smith:  Lunch?
Thai?
Interesting
Do I want 32-bit ghc or 64-bit ghc
?
How could we miss the opportunity for double xx's?
quile justin_smith:  You guys want to meet about resource?
handling?
Now for nineteen tone harmony!
"crowd-pleaser" D
Awesome, I will check it out
justin_smith:  Track is awesome!
I like its slow morph into sea of wailing
Ah, did you post the JS?
I just got in the channel
Well, it is not a number!
Lovely
STARS
Lunch today?
Indian, Thai… ?
BURN
Welcome back D
LUNCH
quile?
Ah okay
Awesome
That is… disturbing
What group hangout??
Ah, can you take it on?
Just you and me now budDy
sacred null chocolate
Looking for a band name
OBOR
DOGDOG
You are back budDy
That is pretty awesome really
So much amazing thought in that book
dogdog finally said the three word poem "three word poem"!
Uhhhhhhh…. D?
welcome back
Okay!
back
D!
Man, didn't even last two quotes
???  Whoa!
Are we caught in a time loop?
What the hell is a pergola?
is it a plant?
We need more nature checks around here
PERGOLA
It is a historic day for pergola
I think Coryna did it
Not sure though
quile:  I just heard someone say it was cool time
I heard them
What is that?
Hey justin_smith!
how goes?
Happy birthday!
Yeah, stuff is dripping everywhere
Nice!  it is a sign
Still on for tonight?
roads are still icy, but it could thaw out enough to drive around before tonight
Borbetomagus… I'll have to check it out
Acoustic instruments?
Or free jazz with electronics?
Aha, radical
Ah right, I think you have mentioned this
gnarly
Can you be hendrix of sax by wanting it?
Crazy, that must be painful to play
metallic reed
to be more of an analogy it should just be the reed and no resonating body
though I guess you would still need the fingerings etc
not sure how to actually apply that directly, interesting idea though
Right, the reed vibrates though, it just drives the column of air
you can play just the mouthpiece, but you would still have to modulate the length of the column
maybe something like a trombone or slide whistle body
The string is so much more amenable to stimulating an electrical signal
without making a bunch of noise itself
Well, I will try to make it out man
I like the idea of the world melting
reminds me of lathe of heaven
ordering order ordering
A specific kind of order
: )
That is an achievement
I was doing some pretty dumb stuff before in retrospect
I was creating the entire tree of all possible statements and their respective probabilities, and THEN taking a path through it
Now it is doing a simple backtrack if it runs into a dead end
Much simpler (the code is shorter too)
Ah, me too!
winter stasis took over everything
Headed to indian soon, so… indian?
quile, indian?
justin_smith:  could tesselax use quad-trees to deal with the space comparison problem?
Every space needs to be compared to every other space to see if it is entirely contained by the other
Yes
Right now every space is being compared to every other space
Well, maybe not even quad tree
but something
Yeah, something that on insert checks the other spaces maybe (since we have to insert it anyway)
I am imagining some kind of tree
The tree was enormous
It has succeeded
Yeah I spent some time with the algorithm design manual this weekend:
http://www.amazon.com/Algorithm-Design-Manual-Steven-Skiena/dp/1848000693/ref=sr_1_3?ie=UTF8&qid=1392154464&sr=8-3&keywords=algorithm+design
Great book
I need to read the whole thing
but it is good to have an application for those things
That is about right
justin_smith:  Why uberjar?  I have only built uberwars
core has a main
quile is probably right
Yeah, but is the fish choosing where to go?
Or is it just swimming around as it normally would, triggering the motor?
I'm just saying, is the fish trying to get somewhere?  Is it finding food or mates?  Does it realize that there is a world outside the fishtank?
Yeah, that is what I'm talking about
I am the first proponent of animal intelligence, I am just saying, for this to be real the fish has to DO something by moving, otherwise it is just a side effect of the fish swimming around
Yeah, something like that
Right
which they probably can, if they get sensory feedback
What is the aquarium paradox?
What are you working on?
Cool
Would it help if I told you it reads the config and transforms it into a tree of function pointers pointing to the various things that get run?
Yeah, nginx literally constructs a program through building a data structure containing function pointers
cooler than compiling
No, "cooler"
As in "cool time"
Interesting
Drama can exist anywhere!
Wow, he is really calling the guy out
http://liorpachter.wordpress.com/2014/02/10/the-network-nonsense-of-albert-laszlo-barabasi/
☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃ ☃
quile:  Do we still have that problem with fs and lighttable?
Curious
which version is the bad one?  We do have a dep for it in core
1.4.5
Cool thanks
Amazing how often EDN and s3 come up dogdog
justin_smith:  That sounds good
Leave soon?
Beat the rush D
Man, this cljs just doesn't update anymore
WTF?
No, I make a change, it says it compiles, change does not occur
Hmm… this says crossovers are deprecated:  https://github.com/emezeske/lein-cljsbuild
Is it?
have you used it?
Trying to figure it out right now
It is madness, another thing to run
Setting it up anyway
welcome back D
That is pretty good stuff
Yeah, make it an Instrument repo
quile:  That is amazing
Not {{host}}?
I'm pretty sure I've used it before
Huh, weird
are you sure you are passing the entire request into render?
and not just some random map?
Try that
could be in the headers too
Ah, weird
I sware I've used it
The eternal snowman function?
I had a lot of code dreams last night
Yesterday I took a nap and dreamed about the nature of time
I was in a room with a lot of crayons and I was drawing a diagram of time that turned out to be a paradox
which revealed some things about the nature of time to me
I said in the dream "Time does not exist… it is just what matter does"
Then I woke up
I still don't know how matter does things, but one step closer I suppose
I like your texture approach to photography
You and my brother have a similar approach:  http://www.flickr.com/photos/noniphon/with/3239985648/
Yeah, that guy is a monster
Where's chuck moore?  rich hickey?  : D
This document is incomplete
We are really just elaborate lemurs
Agreed
It's like an imax, but omni
Find a date, I will be there
My brain is already fully chemically assisted
Huh, never used M-x calendar, though I am unsurprised it exists
It is true, but first you have to enumerate {x}
Right, I'm just saying to use this knowledge you have to have some way to enumerate x
Your statement is logically sound
Ah, so that is the explanation
Called out by a bot
quile:  Agreed
you mentioned an approach for this before, what was it?
Were you thinking the low frequency words approach?
Right, if we hooked him into reddit he would be immediately relevant
I downloaded one of those once
Is that what redditors are talking about?  Now I am unsure of this approach!
But I guess it is not our place to deny the great hivemind
Interesting, I'll check out the reddit and wikipedia search api
http://www.reddit.com/search.json?q=yellow D
http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/1htf29/i_was_an_animator_for_the_yellow_submarine_movie.json
Just take the url of the post and add .json at the end
All comments
Yeah, this wouldn't be too hard
just make a markov tree for every search term from the results of reddit threads… could be mayhem
That could be troubling
depending on how it is triggered
Yeah, once again, apprehensive
No, worth a shot at least!
Riiiiiiight, maybe select some subreddits
Hey, you guys ever eat food?  Have you heard of it?
It is really cool, it has taste and perpetuates your metabolic activities
quile:  How long do you think it will be? : D
Uh-oh
I will try to hold out
Sure
If language were more like legos
Well, I guess it is already a bit like legos
That is gratifying (I think)
I did it for random guy on the internet approval
Sweet!
let's eat : D
justin_smith:  Definitely
It has come up before
Yeah, somewhere in field/link.clj
join-table-name or something
sorting is critical
Ah, it is a boolean that determines whether the association is a map or a vector
As in how the associated data comes back
and is interacted with
So you may remember, in order to do siphons I had to make associations work as maps as well as just vectors
Yes
Well, you want :map to be whatever it was in the collection
because a collection can be a map as well
to preserve the type of the association
Well, you have a 1 in 3 chance
I'm not sure we have a large enough sample for general statistical conclusions
If there are an equal number of D O G in there they should come up a proportional number of times
Ha!  I have never changed the font
Right D
You should not have to
No sir
are you going to become a bitcoin speculator?
Seems like people would be doing this
Might want to look into it before you commit : )
Maybe it is a once in a lifetime opportunity!
quile:  Congrats!
That thing is a monster
Right, reduction to an already solved problem!
Let's heal the python wounds with hawaiian today : )
You can regale us with the tale of shittiness
hacker's last commit:  https://github.com/jimweirich/wyriki/commit/d28fac7f18aeacb00d8ad3460a0a5a901617c2d4
quile, justin_smith:  You guys want to get some food?
Let's eat
#
http://techcrunch.com/2014/02/20/simple-acquired-for-117m-will-continue-to-operate-separately-under-its-own-brand/
Well, there goes the neighborhood
Ah, no I love Penderecki
I have many of his albums
I saw a choir sing a Penderecki piece last year, amazing in person!
That is the one
Hey quile, do you have a second to look at a really weird js bug?
Oh man, want to get some indian food today?
quile:  Food?
cisco:  Have you played any other instruments?
violin is pretty difficult and takes quite a while to master the intonation (no reason not to try!)
cisco:  Do you already have a violin?
You will definitely need a teacher to guide you in the basics
There is a lot to coordinate: the stroke of the bow, the precise location of the fingers, the position of the instrument, your posture and wrist angle etc
violin is the easiest instrument to sound terrible at ; )
cisco:  Do you live somewhere you could find a good teacher?
Are you willing to practice often?
If you can find a way to enjoy getting in the habit of practicing, even while it does not sound amazing yet, then you can learn to play
many abandon the endeavor quickly once they realize what a commitment it is
but it is certainly worth it
I play a little, not enough to be good : )
cisco:  That is a good start!
cisco:  Shh… he Doesn't know
three!
cisco:  He learns everything you say, you just haven't said much yet
cisco:  No, I've just played music my whole life
never wanted to try to make money off the thing I love most
Welcome back D
quile:  How was rachmaninoff?
Yeah, I'm bummed I missed it
Ah, really??
Maybe I will make it then
I am going to Shostakovich on Saturday
his 4th symphony
Yeah, this was the one he wrote in the 30's that got pulled
wasn't performed until the 60's I think
Apparently it did not align with the party aesthetic
Yeah
which is crazy!
Are they any good?
I haven't seen them I don't think
Awesome
: (
I endeavor every day not to cross the streams
RIP
Egon
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Egon_Spengler
Aha!
madness
Since everyone who has cognitive biases is alive, cognitive biases are essential for survival
justin_smith:  I did not
Thanks for the reminder!
Ah, where did you guys go?
had to run errands
Nice
Good question
He was talking about a G+ site…
google groups is so slow and broken
I wouldn't mind a G+ thing
Seems slightly excessive.. but maybe not?
I don't really know, I don't know anything about running a community!  : (
justin_smith:  Not sure!
let me check
netnetnet?
Yeah, I never pushed it
https://github.com/prismofeverything/netnetnet
There you go
three word poems can have three nouns
(If I recall the spec correctly)
lein cljx auto
Okay, I was having a rough day yesterday, but I am now open to discussing a caribou community site : )
Is G+ the way to go?
Yeah, but google groups is terrible slow
I guess it is standard, but that is because there is nothing better?
I am willing to try the g+ thing
Yeah!
I forgot all about myspace.  All problems solved
You guys down for lunch today?
quile:  You down for lunch today?
FUCK YEAH
cool time
Ah!  not yet
Yeah, I will check it out
Are you saying I am an egomaniac??
justin_smith:  Yeah, that is crazy
He is a madman
I think there is a lot of stuff, good and bad about the guy
That part, not cool
mathematical knowledge should belong to everyone
But he is not the only one to hoard discoveries in a private company
It is pretty much standard practice in the tech industry
which could arguably be considered mathematical discoveries in nature
Not to justify it, but it is not uncommon or particular to him
The thing is they risk getting scooped!
Yeah, and risk thinking they have a proof that is actually bogus
That is why peer review is good
But with software if it works, it works
even if it is not for the reason you think
This chatroom is very tiny
Yeah that is the classic wolfram story
Yeah!
let's do it
Watching this wolfram video now, this is pretty amazing
And LOL something or whatever
Still though, rather than phrases pasted over the same semantics, I want a language that is in some way semantically inspired by these people
Right
It is a superficial change
The language design itself is the medium of expression
But that would be more work
I am demanding of toy language designers
That's what I'm talking about
Make it look like a smart version of a screensaver
DUDE
Right, it is disordered, yet hyperuniform
My hand is made of quantum particles
I can reach through air
I beat you to that one justin_smith
By moments
Ha!
it is hard to add a new one these days
Ha!
Well, there goes that theory
Awesome
It is true, actually seeing computation is awesome
Have any of you fine gentlemen considered the possibility of lunch today?
It is this new concept I have been only recently privy to
Alright!
It's on
Let's do om today
we can get back to tesselax
You guys want to get some food today?
I'm driving
justin_smith: literal translation "The Ideology of the Rainbows"
quile:  Everywhere
Actually, I want to hit up that Thai place
even though you guys went on Monday
Otherwise:  Maybe lardo?
We have vehicle
Thai then?
Also:  https://plus.google.com/communities/103169158644680859732?hl=en
I overcame my annoyance with existence
Right now I am the only member
Sweet!  two members
Lazy
Let's eat!
Dude
justin_smith:  Right, it should not be too much different
Yeah… we can check
Spent a whole workday tracking down and fixing this problem: https://www.refheap.com/49113
in an uberjar, (wrap-resource … ) thinks request with {:uri "/"} are empty resources!
and never falls down to the app
No, only happens in an uberjar!
bug in wrap-resource
That is the fix!
That is beautiful
Wow
seems interesting??
Aha!  No he has not
Pure probability at work
quile:  Question about resources!
Come on by when you get a second
Cool, thanks man!
Right, that is when the concatenation/minification needs to happen
Hmm...
so is there any facility doing the concat/min right now?
What would we use for that?
Awesome
It is trying to climb the water branch
Anyone able to make sense of this one?     https://github.com/caribou/caribou-core/issues/21
How to even begin finding a dep lein claims isn't there?
Right
but apparently it is pulling in 1.1.2 somewhere
I can't find it
maybe it is another AOT compilation issue?
Some dep has 1.1.2 AOT compiled into it somewhere?
That is what I'm wondering
How the hell do you find such a thing?
Mass unzip all jars… look for 1.1.2?
Is it still NSFW if it is satire?
heroku:  so close to conquering this beast!
That is doubtful
the trig functions are accurate
<3 you too eeffff
Also:  http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/nominalism-mathematics/
http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/platonism-mathematics/
http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/fictionalism-mathematics/
A subtle issue!
fictionalism is pretty interesting too
From the article:  "Thus, the idea is that sentences like ‘3 is prime’ are false, or untrue, for the same reason that, say, ‘The tooth fairy is generous’ is false or untrue—because just as there is no such person as the tooth fairy, so too there is no such thing as the number 3."
Not sure!  It seems they don't believe in anything that you can't touch
Like "justice"
Right
The question is:  do abstract concepts "exist"?
Hehehe
Based on that, I'm not sure anything exists
justin_smith is a pretty abstract concept
Right dogdog, sZorry
quile:  That's the one!
It is radical
Where do you guys want to lunch today?
I am down
Down
slit penis???
Noooooooooooooooooooooooooooo
(oooooooooooooooo............)
Well, it is the wll ending jammed up against the lla beginning
So it totally makes sense
My sardonic tone is not conveying across the gulf of freenode
^^^*|…|*^^^
That is a spider
To convey spider emotion
justin_smith:  Hopefully goat simulator is the future of video games
justin_smith:  Where was that emacs changelog we were using as reference again?
I seem to have lost it
Thank you!
Yeah but two are hidden behind it
It's super accurate, but they are legs
What is mmm?
Ah awesome
Ha!  You mean it starts 9 AM every day?
I like how most of existence is empty space
Just a couple islands of relationships really
That organ is rad by the way
Sounds way more 8-bit than I thought it would
Yeah, the other examples are astounding
justin_smith:  You are correct
I had a dumbass middleware
It is now slightly less dumbass than before
Hahahahahaha
Now THAT is some transtonal transtonal falafel
It is tasty
rapture uvula moss:  Subtle but powerful
Sanity check:  can someone try to provision a new caribou instance and see if it works?
Yeah D!
quile:  Awesome
Yeah it seems to be working
No responses on the announcement!
Possibly I used the wrong words...
Yep
Not even a flame, must be losing my touch
 That is madness
http://existentialcomics.com/comic/18
There are only 18 of them
amuxing
tropical omniscient supernova is pretty rad
Door
Goodnight quile
I still have yet to pick up the other jesse ball book
Yummy!  D
Oh yeah?  What kind?
Lovely
Sounds awesome
I love indian food
Not everyone
Feigner and Phong both hate indian food (to name two off the top of my head)
for some incomprehensible reason
One cycle:  http://imgur.com/owzMkQF
That sounds awesome
Probably the guilt is too great
Well, at least you didn't do worse!
quile:  boo!
We actually have more time now
Time was literally created and spliced into the history of the cosmos
It is a miracle, really
Well, there is that
then there is also the miraculous creation of time which cannot be explained by rational discourse
which happened Sunday at 2:00 am
How is the first day at home quile?
Enjoying the sunshine?
If I worked from home today I would be outside
It is like being born on February 30th
Yeah but when your birthday does come around you get to have 4x the party
Ha!
The great thing about having a commonly rejected name/birthday is that it is super annoying
to be rejected for no reason
Possibly the smug satisfaction of other people's errors makes up for it
Someday I will learn this arcane power
After studying 20 years barefoot in a monastery
Oh hey!  http://elephantlaboratories.com/
All feedback welcome
I have business cards coming as well
Nothing like handing a three-eyed mutant elephant to someone as your professional identity
Yeah man!  I can do Thursday night
Or tuesday night before 8:00
Heading to Tacoma this weekend
bringing up a board, a deck and some pieces for my brother
and I think we are going to do a demo/play test at his local game store
I am all in
Obsessed!
Also:  learning indesign right now to lay out the rulebook
soon I will know all things
Alright, heading out
let's lunch man!
: (            D
Ah, so not all fields are getting the editor, just a text field?
Ah good
It is also a length thing
behind the scenes it is varchar(255)
Also, lunch
Tarad?
Let's go!
make a backup!
Wow
??
I didn't realize it went away
Should still be there somewhere
justin_smith:  Want to get lunch soon?
I was thinking foodcarts, nice walk
Igon value
Full on madhouse slaugtherball
quile!  You were missed at lunch today
We were outside for a long period of time
I was outside
Do you get to code in your garden now?
Kind of jealous
Ha!  svn or cvs?
That is my usual metric
Really?  I have used git-svn with some success
The rare times I have had to interact
Yeah, as long as you don't do crazy stuff it is pretty smooth
I do most of my work in git and then just push and pull to the svn endpoint whenever I have to
Well, when I had to do that
The crazy central server model seems so heavy in retrospect
But we are living in blessed times
D!
Well, it was like 20 lines
So yes, yes it will
Yeah that might be the most disgusting three word poem yet
I like the pee yellow
It is good!
nice find
Yeah, but you still decide what to do with it
the technique is a tool, the choices are the music
Right, sure
words mean things, I always forget
That is why photography is the most dangerous activity in the world
Aha!
How about that
Initception! D
on the 25th?
I think colleen is
It is that event we talked about in that meeting
Yeah there was this guy and he was talking about a thing
batman!  D
No u D
Arizona man, it is like you hate humanity
HOW COULD YOU SPEAK NEGATIVELY ABOUT ARIZONA
quile:  How goes??
Yeah, have you made it through the mental transition yet?
Nothing much, I just got over the plague
Neil gave it to me
I'll never forgive him
Neil is the Plaguebearer
The ebola monkey
http://static.giantbomb.com/uploads/original/1/17172/1479292-nurgle.jpg
That is the best image I could find for plaguebearer
Anyhow, coming out the other side of that monstrosity
(I love you poocafe!)
Gamestorm is tomorrow, brother is in town
So I am not working much lately I guess
How is your situation?
Awesome
Yeah, the orientation phase is always a trip
Perl mostly?  Or java?
Ha!  Yeah old organization?  I can't imagine they would start doing things differently : )
Still on the lookout for office space?
Have any cool coworkers?  Didn't you already know these guys?
Ah!  Well I have been sick
He persists for awhile now
I used to go back and find him stopped on blown heaps
Now he is just quietly waiting for input, but missed a ping at some point
That is the next step
quile:  I think you may generally say shorter things? D
Yes, let this be a lesson to everyone.  Leave your broadsword at home
Pretty much!
Yes, lunch
Yeah my last week was decimated
Those are beautiful examples of bad design.  I feel like there is an art to making something perfectly unusable
: (
Who is they?
What kind of security issues?
Right, what issues does it have right now?
Ah, you can't prove security holes don't exist
Right
I think it would depend on what helpers you provide
Sounds awesome
Those are ridiculous
"Girl, you must be an inaction because you are lack or absence of action."
What the hell is that?
Dude
Aha
welcome back D
justin_smith:  Not sure, I remember screwing around with the content types at some point… maybe throw some diagnostics in the handler chain and see what the content type is at different stages?
justin_smith:  Yeah!
Hungry...
quile:  Looks like dinner to me
Direct sea nourishment
Oooohhhh…. burn! D
poocafe:  Maybe you are finally out from under the phantom of your own past errors
Thanks!  good to be back D
justin_smith:  That could be, I don't really remember how the content type stuff was working, though I suspect it may be tortured and could use some clarity and simplification
Yeah seems like an active assassination on the part of google
Starting to dislike google more and more
Although, searching "google rss" yields a bunch of hits D
Looks like you need an extension, it doesn't come by default
I like them both!
The noise stuff is really rich.  The viola is working great as a signal input, it really opens up the range of possibilities compared to other noise stuff I've heard
Yeah, it sounds so much more organic than the stuff I have heard that is strictly electronically generated
Ah, I can see that
The contrast is key
That is pretty fucking crazy
Sound is good yeah
Who is that?
Better than standing there and staring at your phone
So many poocafes!
It reads as you are duplicating yourself over and over, like wandering through a hall of mirrors
"Where is poocafe?  Over there!  No over there!"
poocafe is everywhere
poocafe is behind you.  poocafe is in your mind
In a real way, everything is made of poop
pugnacious is like delicious but with pugs
Wow
just a second
Ah!  Because he is registered to me, he gets ops
He is my alias
wow, that could wreak havoc
This could be a problem
oh boy D
Well, we have put our lives in the hands of a deranged bot
Ha!
Good repo that one
Been awhile since I've spun it up
Yeah, that guy can suck it D
Yeah!  He finally went away!
A loss to us all
Apparently he is aggravating #haskell users now
Yeah!
Speaking of, I really want to work on this graph language idea in Parsec
Lisp --> lists :: ??? --> graphs      D
justin_smith:  How Do I get snowmen characters to show up in emacs again?
☃
Right, but I can't see it!
unifont... D
Have a good one quile
!
Understood
Good luck with the preparations!
justin_smith:  How would I accomplish that?
I sware I have done this before
Also, I must also get out of here
justin_smith:  Good luck with the deadline!  Glad you are keeping the caribou spirit alive : )
Who am I?
D O G D O G
justin_smith:  How goes?
Did you meet your deadline?
Orb Dog
justin_smith:  How goes? !!
Ah, so not a simple process?
I have finally had that show for the Shostakovich sonata I started working on six months ago
That was a crazy ride
Now have bandwidth for other music!
No worries
I seem to miss your shows somehow as well
Want to jam with Gutt soon?
Do you have any bandwidth now?
Have you been totally swamped with work?  Had any time to do anything else?
Understood
Yeah, bummer about deadlines
deadlines in general
Also, terrible name for a thing that is rarely met
Truly beautiful
I have been seeing some pretty awesome examples of bad programming at the new gig
It is impressive sometimes
how terrible things can be
Yeah, random snapshot of the current state of a codebase
Well, two codebases
One is well designed and engineered from the beginning... the other is an accretionary heap that has accumulated over two years
I think that could be abused
I like how every result implies a personality
I can kind of get a sense of each character, just from their list of stats
Always disliked the ->> for some reason though
Right, ->> just seems like an abomination
But maybe I just need to embrace it into my heart
Did you ever finish your deadline?  : )
How many versions is it?
*versions ago D
Yeah that is a jump
I want to meet the bear who wrote this
So, does that mean you can jam soon?  : )
I look forward to having a moment to read all of this
justin_smith:  No you did not!
That is pretty cool
takes a while to load, but if it gives all of csound that is huge
Ha!  Well... at least it would for browser based stuff
overtone doesn't even pretend to work in the browser
Are you anti-supercollider nowadays?
quile:  You can edit his logs if you want to remove certain keywords ; )
How goes around here?
glad to see you guys are holding it down
Been totally swamped with work stuff lately, but seeing the light at the end of the tunnel now : )
quile:  How long have you been back?
Yeah I bet that is an adjustment
So how was the trip???
Awesome, yeah good to be back in the homeland?
I miss that place
Ha!  Look at that
Looks to be about exactly what schmetterling is?
You can inspect locals at least
Maybe not repls, but at least viewing state
I'll have to check out what he is using, probably JDI under the hood
It looks more enterprise than schmetterling : )
Maybe!  I've been doing a bunch of clojure again
was out of the loop for awhile now
Yeah!  good to be back
We have this clojure app at work that shit the bed, I got to rewrite it totally
Now I am looking to expand its functionality
to eventually encompass all things
quile:  You back into full on work mode?
: )  Yeah let's figure that out!
justin_smith:  Aha, yeah not as cool!
Well, I think they may actually try and get rich, whereas we have too many scruples
I bet if we sat down and were like "What aspect of human nature can we exploit for profit?" we could figure something out pretty quick ; )
Here, pick one:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_cognitive_biases
Actually, let's just open a casino
That is the simplest bias to exploit apparently
Classic feedback loop
Actually, looking through that list, casinos are exploiting at least 10 of those biases.  No wonder they are so insidious
quile:  Do it!  would probably take just a little analysis of the previous statement
Weren't we going to do something with low frequency words?
I think we have talked about this many times  : )
I remember certain walks to lunch....
justin_smith:  Seriously!  Looking forward to hearing it
Yeah, the acoustics can really dig in
the electric is still cool, way smooth
but a different thing I agree
"every setback is also an opportunity" - someone in history
I was really enjoying all the stuff you were doing on Tuesday.  I need to up my game to keep up
I have been so crazy busy nonstopallthetime
WTF??
As a matter of fact yes!  I established that early on
Yeah, glad to be just working on a product
Well, I guess that's what I was doing at Instrument also : )
Don't we all
quile:  clojurescript-on-node??  (just saw this)
The internet is just an elaborate name for... humanity
He is going to nuke the channel someday
Speaking of post soviet allegories, just got done reading "Roadside Picnic"
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roadside_Picnic
It was pretty amazing
Yeah, suddenly one of the best books I have ever read
highly recommended
Whoa!
I've heard that guy's music before
pretty awesome
What time?
What is that for??  I mean, I think I know
Wow, awesome
Those are going to be some serious headphones
So you can just plug it?  Do you have to solder it or something?
Got it
(meeting)
justin_smith:  Under the Skin... no not yet!
is it any good?
quile:  What are the issues right now?
justin_smith:  Audio microscope
quile:  Lovely
Ah right, I have used cljx
Right, cljx is just the java/js independent parts of clojure
kind of a bummer you have to have directives in the code for the two environments, but I'm not sure how else you would do it
Wait, how is dependency injection a problem with node?
Ha, echoes from the past
Ah, I see
Ha!
Yeah gnarly
Holy crap, monday
bbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbb
Not sure about monday
Aha, wow
I haven't checked out the transducers yet
That is badass
So you trigger it through currying basically?
Aha, so just for those functions
I like it
That is pretty sweet
FUCK
Not pleased about this really
It is cruel, for sure
Love that guy
A true modern day hero
Have you guys ever used neo4j?
Suddenly totally into this idea
Suddenly I want to use it for everything
I love this page:  http://docs.neo4j.org/chunked/milestone/tutorial-comparing-models.html
(emacs apparently quits unexpectedly sometimes)
Basically they are saying "We can implement any DB paradigm in our paradigm"
quile:  Haven't actually started running it yet
But yeah, I'll be using it from clojure
The clojure neo4j lib has a most unfortunate name
http://www.neo4j.org/develop/clojure
Who did that?
Stoked about it though, diving into cypher now
brb lunch
Yeah that is unfortunate
Also the fact that it is an onomatopoeia amplifies the effect
scared to click
(ponders how justin_smith could have found an image of salty flatulence D)
quile:  He is just echoing your grammatical sentence templates back at you, possibly you say a larger ratio of single word sentences?
Or I am long-winded
succinctness is a virtue
I love embracing things into a problem
That is the usual pattern really *sigh*
:,,,, (       D
Interactive cypher terminal!  http://docs.neo4j.org/chunked/milestone/cypherdoc-uniqueness.html
Alright, connected to neo4j from clojure and screwing around.  With three.js on the frontend (for when I need it).  Awesome
I haven't been this stoked about a database for a long time
How is life over there quile?
Ah right!  Yeah you are seasonal
when is the seasonal window?
Nice, that can be fun
That is the thing about your stack... hard to get away from it once you've built it
an important decision that you make right at the beginning
At least it is not python ; )
Yeah!  Given it is java, you should be able to work things in there incrementally
News on the startup front?
Ah, brb meeting D
Ipipipipip
I hate having something on my wrist
like a shackle
update your repos
First they imposed the U2, and I said nothing because I didn't have to download it...
Then they imposed the coldplay, and I said nothing because the tune was actually kind of catchy...
Then they imposed the one direction, and I could do nothing because the world was engulfed in flames
And everyone was on fire
I think that may be the moral of the story
Whoa, sounds tasty and inspiring!
Agreeeeeeeed
Let's do that
Actually, it has been awhile since I've seen quile's mug at all!
That will be ere the set of sun!
Upon the health
*heath dammit D
If you guys want to meet downtown we could go to one of a zillion food cart pods?
Also, been awhile since I have been to Ate Oh Ate
Also:  Bollywood
Also:  Anything else really
quile:  So many things, it is absurd
Pretty good lebanese by work, by the questionable name of "Hush Hush" D
Also, there is a Mi Mero Mole nearby D
Also, LOS GORDITOS
NO DOGDOG NO I CANNOT
Also, an amazing Thai place
Also:  Little big burger (which is actually pretty gooD)
Also:  breweries
justin_smith:  Ah sql string matching
How does that perform?
Ha!  Me too
I think so though
The links from http://let-caribou.in/ work fine
no https there
So it is really just from google results??
Where else would we be getting https?  Weird
Actually, I just googled it and it was http
quile:  You are right though, we should get the domain
Is this a riddle?
Ah
There is a function to clear it
somewhere
But if not, yeah it is just an atom in config
Or just sorting on a different prop
Ah... hmmm
Got it, that makes sense
Could almost be a setting
Is it just teague specific right now:?
Like a boolean on a model or something
That would be a local change vs a global change... might make sense
but negative positions are weird
justin_smith:  I did not!
I do not follow anything apple
I know this has been bothering you : )
That is kind of hilarious
I am deeply disturbed by apple actually
So yesterday I went into the apple store to pick up that router after talking to you guys
It was like walking into the church of scientology
Seriously fucked up, it is a legitimate cult
I like how the most successful modern day businesses are basically religions
We have not evolved since medieval times really, just the subjects have changed.
find -type f | xargs -i sed -i -e "s/person/orb/g" {}
If only this would work for my whole life
antiorbnel.... the thought saddens me
"Against orbs"
: (((((
That is pretty awesome
That is a self-imposed prophecy : )
Sounds cosmic
Yoyo D!
What was that?
That sounds right
Ah, interesting
I will have to check it out
quile:  Aha!  Yeah what is the situation?
justin_smith:  Right, so making a pipeline of seq operations in a way
quile:  Awesome!
What kind of networks are they analyzing?
justin_smith:  Aha, so it is more like dataflow in a way
quile:  Without a doubt
I want to talk to this guy
That would be awesome
quile:  So he needs people right now, or is he just making connections?
Wow, rad!
Definitely interested in that
So did you get details about what they are doing?  What kinds of networks?
Aha okay.  Well it will be good to talk to them then
Ah!  interesting
I haven't hit its ceiling yet... what are they using instead?
Got it
I would be curious to compare the performance of the two
So:  probably faster
I mean, it is built on titan, so it does not seem necessarily in process/in memory
Titan is talking about scaling across clusters etc
Ah I see what you mean now (just read your last statement... reading is good)
justin_smith:  Hmm... I really like cypher, not sure about titanium's api (gremlin queries??)  But if it is faster it is worth a shot
My erc just blows up emacs every once in awhile
justin_smith:  That is strange behavior...
justin_smith:  Using clojure.tools.trace all the time now
Thanks for that one
WAAAAAAY better than throwing printlns everywhere
It is sad, if the environment was better I would be all over it
I think they are actually trying to deter people sometimes
Like, you must suffer for purity
Truth is pain
I think haskell kind of imposes humility, whereas the scripting languages are all about becoming intoxicated with power
"That looks like syntax, here let me hose your db"
It is a good idea... you should propose it on #haskell ; )
Supplication homology
was that the syntax?  It has been too long
Or he already knows that one of course
justin_smith:  Very curious how this meeting with the aussie goes... try to get some details : )
quile:  What is your plan?  Are you going to try to pick up some work from them?
Yeah, let's set that up!
Maybe an email introduction?
Which reminds me, I met with Spencer about a month ago
Took a tour around the Collaborative Life Sciences Building with him
It was freaking spectacular!
That place is amazing
Yeah, he seemed really awesome
I think I'm going to try to get in that program
So thanks for that
justin_smith:  Yeah, definitely.  I probably have less time than you, but depending on how things go it could work out
justin_smith:  Yeah I would like to talk to them first of course, but it would be awesome to work together again : )
When I turn off the weird machine it doesn't seem to be affected
Ah, interesting idea
So the server provides a spec for its own interaction
There must be some meta-spec of sorts
Got it, does it work?  What uses it currently?
Seems like you would still need a specialized client, but the flexibility could be worth it
Right, but the client would still have to be able to receive these kinds of messages
Ah, so you are talking js where it is dynamically evaluating code provided by the server???  Whoa
I CARE DOGDOG
justin_smith:  So how did it go otherwise?
You probably just intimidate him with your mad clojure skillz
That guy is pretty funny, I like most of his history
Are you on twitter now justin_smith?
I see you posting a bunch of tweets lately D
Do I now??????????
Just found you, right!
I never go on that thing
Yeah, I was into it for awhile there
spouting randomness
quile:  Radical!  Been waiting for these to go down for awhile now
Still waiting for the tech as a whole to plateau a bit... but this could be a good temporary solution
And stay melted
justin_smith:  That is a great idea!
Can we get a spacetime clock already?
No problem!
Well, that is worthwhile at least
Definitely want to have another musical coding session soon
You bastard
That is amazing, really
Can you decode??
This could save your life someday
It is brilliant
Hahaha next base-pretty-cool!-encoding
SEE THE HELL
Dooooooooooooood
Dude, the gravity kraken sounds pretty ominous
At this point gravity kraken is going to be some project somewhere
The next time I need a name...
Anyone remember the old internet thread about the guy who wrote a compression algorithm and was so confident in it he compressed all his data without writing a working decompressor first??
I am trying to find it but doing searches for compression/decompression is almost as bad as searching for a free ipaD
Yeah right??  Apparently everyone is vulnerable??
How did that vulnerability go unnoticed for so long?
It seems fairly simple actually
Yoyo D!
So, you guys may or may not be surprised, but little bird's wordpress site has been utterly compromised
They have altered files on the filesystem and inserted php evals
The sidebar has turned into a pile of russian links
Hahahaha (cries)
So!  This may be an opportunity for caribou ; )
Going to throw up a static copy as a stopgap
Like, they have our filesystem
it is bad
Luckily it has nothing to do with our app, but still
feels dirty
Who the hell uses wordpress for anything anymore???  What a disaster
Awesome!  Love birch
Those are freaking crazy
justin_smith:  This is a game about cookies??
Sounds awesome
That is one of the best
Ominous
three three word poems
Ooops
Hahaha, we can do that the easy way??
If you want to cheat, just delete some lines from your history and restart
Rewrite history, everyone does it
I look forward to arbitrary statements contrived entirely to embiggen sentence length!
It makes me think the Beckett of today has spent all of that effort in WoW and we will never read any of his plays
justin_smith: This sounds plausible as well
That makes me think all of the great artists were really just people who decided to work on stuff instead of fritter away their lives on pointless activities
A parable for us all
quile:  Up to four!  That is pretty good
You have to hook balls the word into balls other words in the balls chain so that balls it will appear balls in a balls path.
I just sabotaged my own tree for a misguided demonstration.  Balls
I emitted noises resembling mirthful emissions from my face orifice
Yes, a fine and sparkling morn to orbastate the welcoming of thine own craggenfeld spurion quile-uhr
Flags is a profound response quile.  Short but packed with density.  A semantic singularity if you will
quile:  Wow, docker looks awesome!
I seeeeeeee......
Where did that come from?
Someone should tell them about the generations of violence and genocide playing itself out in their lower intestine
justin_smith:  How goes over there?
What are you up to lately?
Ha!  What kind of haskell stuff?
Also, we never really dealt with auth did we?
Auth in caribou... our api is wide open if I recall
And logins etc
I thought that was what you were talking about... correct me if I'm wrong
Ah right... that was the consensus.  Don't handle it : )
Aha, okay that is better
Right.  That is ripe for improvement
justin_smith:  Yeah, the docker thing seems like way overkill, but looking into it I think they prune the images as much as possible......  I would have to use it to find out
I think with "dependencies per project" the issue gets into that there is not a clean way to compartmentalize all these dependencies
which is what docker is trying to solve
everything in a little compartment
Supposedly it is simpler?????  I am skeptical that could ever be simpler
Simpler to use???  Not sure, certainly not simpler in implementation
I think it is trying to control the issues that come up across environments... so that things are guaranteed to run the same way everywhere.  Kind of like the jvm but for anything
And it is not necessarily avoiding having to know anything about unix, but just not having to spend a bunch of time screwing with things every time you want to run it on a new machine
At least, that is the sentiment
It is good to remain open to new ideas though, I would at least like to try it out before I condemn it : )
The thing is I don't really need it right now
We get a lot of benefit from having the jvm as a basis, the project just needs one dependency really
at the system level
So you think it is just a dumbification of system level dependencies basically?  Kind of like a mongo of dependency management?
Like "This is way simpler!  Yay!"  without realizing what you are sacrificing?
So you think the problem is shared libs then?  That every project should just use its own libs?  It kind of makes sense
What else is shared right now?
It is very isolationist of you : )
So the system would just be a mediator of each individual environment
Would that work for deploying the same project on any OS?
Or at least any *nix OS?
That is I think the main problem docker is trying to solve
Re:  instrument that is one Damn sexy site
Square space is what justin lewis always really wanteD anyway
That is awesome.
Man I love haskell.  What have you been doing with it lately?
And have you just been playing that cookie game?  Or have you found something new to screw with?  : )
I have also been playing a bunch of dumb games, but more of the tabletop variety
We'll never become Beckett this way
Ah right!  Let's get back into that
Hear from Dan after that crazy update?
quile:  Welcome back!
How was the trip?
justin_smith:  So they are finally getting sane stacktraces for clojure!
it is good news
Dude where do you find this stuff?
that is hilarious
I feel like that just captured a large part of college seminar
Are they doing that intentionally??  It is too ironic
http://butdoesitfloat.com/  is awesome today...  "The Bus" by Paul Kirchner
Haskell and randomness are mutually exclusive concepts
I added a js snippet to the Zalgo repo you can apply to any webpage and it will progressively zalgoify it
javascript:var zalgo=function(){function t(e){return!e||/^\s*$/.test(e)}var e={up:["̍","̎","̄","̅","̿","̑","̆","̐","͒","͗","͑","̇","̈","̊","͂","̓","̈́","͊","͋","͌","̃","̂","̌","͐","̀","́","̋","̏","̒","̓","̔","̽","̉","ͣ","ͤ","ͥ","ͦ","ͧ","ͨ","ͩ","ͪ","ͫ","ͬ","ͭ","ͮ","ͯ","̾","͛","͆","̚"],down:["̖","̗","̘","̙","̜","̝","̞","̟","̠","̤","̥","̦","̩","̪","̫","̬","̭","̮","̯",
n=function(e){var n=[];var r=function(e){do{if(e.hasChildNodes()){r(e.firstChild)}else if(!t(e.textContent)){n.push(e)}}while(e=e.nextSibling)};r(e);return n};var r=function(e,t,n){return e.substr(0,t)+n+e.substr(t)};var i=function(e){return Math.floor(Math.random()*e)};var s=function(){var t=Math.random();var n=t<.4?"up":t<.8?"down":"mid";var r=i(e[n].length);return e[n][r]};var o=function(e){var t=i(e.length);var n=s();return
r(e,t,n)};var u=function(e){var t=e.textContent;e.textContent=o(e.textContent)};var a=n(document.body);var f=function(){setInterval(function(){var e=i(a.length);var t=a[e];u(t)},20+i(50))};var l=function(){for(var e=0;e<50;e++){f()}};l()}()
https://github.com/prismofeverything/zalgo/blob/master/resources/js/zalgo.js
Of course, if you paste a string into your browser that starts with "javascript:" it will strip it for you : )
Apparently too many people were being exploited by being convinced to paste in arbitrary javascript into their location bars
Yoyoyo D
justin_smith:  Sounds awesome!  I will see if I can work it in
quile:  How goes?
I have been busy as fuck but just got a chance to turn on IRC
Max is a daddy (again)
justin_smith:  What are you working on lately??
I think we should all get some lunch next week
I miss you guys
Ah yeah!  Love that place
I don't think I've been there since that guy rammed into us then drove into a building
freak
Jodi finally got a check 6 months later!
Yeah, she has a new car : )
Well, it is an impressive story
Yeah, well those guys are cooler than the people Jodi was dealing with.  It was insane
I think it was because he also ran into the building, so it went through commercial insurance claims and they couldn't be resolved separately for some reason??
Wooooooooooooow ouch
There is never a good time for that image
quile justin_smith:  How do you guys feel about tomorrow for lunch?
Ah, that works for me
Thursday then
How are things over there quile?
Well, aren't you about to have a baby?
Right!
Dude well luckily you will have plenty of time after the little one arrives ; )
You might need to find a hobby or something
When is the little one due?
Thursday it is!
justin_smith:  Awesome!  Yeah bummed I couldn't make it
The guy seems pretty rad
So yeah, how has it evolved?
Ha!  Small (noise) world
Hahaha WTF quile????
Nice!
Dude, your characterization is uncanny
Have you ever thought of going into script writing?  No seriously
Actually, I bet your movies would be amazing
Narrative skill is not to be underestimated.  There is a reason that stuff works
I forget if you have read any Keith Johnstone?
It seems we may have had a conversation about this before
This one:  http://www.goodreads.com/book/show/306940.Impro
Shostakovich : Bach :: ??? : Shakespeare
Anyone know?  I would love to see a modern elaboration on fundamental narrative structure
Yeah I was thinking Beckett...
Don't know much Stoppard
Awesome, thanks for the lead
Beckett : Shakespeare :: Gödel : Whitehead
Hahahaha!  Holy crap alright must read
Oh I am patchwork again
justin_smith:  I have a thing at 2:00, so it is going to have to be a little earlier
And that place is better the earlier you go
quile:  That is what we talked about, though I am open to anything
11:30 would work better for me, though I know that is early for quile ; )
quile:  Sounds good
Indian still sounds good to me...  I haven't been to that place in forever
Duuuuuude
Well, method_missing itself is one of the worst language features ever made, so this just makes it more like what it already is...
quile:  What probability does he trigger with?
33333333
3333333333333333333
Doing a lot of screwing around with vagrant lately... you guys ever use that?
It is pretty cool
Also: tmux
Basically I am tricking out our whole development environment to boot in different tmux windows on vagrant up
It is like playing with toys
part of why it is awesome doing programming
I feel like it is a direct extension of legos
playful monkeys
How goes over there quile?
Oh yeah?
Nice, always wanted to screw with that.  Haven't done any UI for awhile now
Everyone around here is way into angular
It seems like the "new cool thing"
But I thought react was superior?  (though I know very little about either of course)
Hahahaha yeah!  That quote will come in handy.  I'll let everyone know : )
What is the difference?
Ahhhhhh okay... yeah man, the magic
I feel like people use the word "magic" for "assumptions that are a giant pain in the ass to work around"
quile:  That article is hilarious
Yeah, is anyone using python 3 right now?
justin_smith:  Ha!  Do you have a transcript?
justin_smith:  Not sure... it was a while ago
So probably an old one
Ah!  Well then it hasn't been updated in a while : )
Yeah it is a little fussy
Hmm... so it could be an improvement we could make
Hooooooooly crap
Don't make me cry
Ah yeah!  Definitely want to see this one, thanks for the reminder
Which day are you going?
Oh right!  That is right around the due date
I heard it ~2004 I think
Love it
Okay, well I'll get some tickets for myself at least
I guess you will have to play it by ear then : )
As it should
justin_smith quile:  Have either of you tried Austin?  https://github.com/cemerick/austin
Funny
I was looking at piggieback, then I found austin is a wrapper for it
So then chestnut is a wrapper for that??
Ha
Ah I see, it is a lein template
Interesting, I was using a different lein template for three.js stuff
Maybe I can combine them somehow
Oh, and this thing uses weasel, which is apparently an alternative to austin!
Interesting... I have been away awhile
justin_smith:  Being an adult is overrated
All this taking responsibility for your own existence thing is a real downer
But I respect your opinion
Yeah, fun is not something you can ever *make* anyone else do
Fun is something that happens spontaneously
How do you feel about fun in general justin_smith?  Is it just imposed fun (which is a self-contradictory) that is the issue?  Or do you feel there is an issue with fun itself?
spontaneous silence is still spontaneous
justin_smith:  That is interesting.  I also had a very open ended and permissive upbringing (probably not as extreme as you), but I didn't have this imposition on holidays, which seems contrary to that idea
It is interesting to witness how much we are affected by our upbringing, even to this day
quile:  Curious what Callum will say about his upbringing ; )
quile:  That is a waaaaaaay better way to do it
4th of July is the worst holiday
In the US holidays are another excuse to sell/buy a bunch of useless plastic crap
Everything is commodified
justin_smith:  I do think there are strengths and weaknesses to every approach.  Your upbringing seems to have left some scars, but it also made you who you are in other ways.  Jodi was recently criticizing my upbringing (!) for not teaching me some essential things to function as a human.  But then these same things are in other ways an advantage.  So there are two sides to everything I guess
In other news... looks like you succeeded there quile!
Yeeeeeeeaaah
hahahahaha
Also:  I don't think a human can avoid being spontaneous.  Even if you are following some script, you are spontaneously choosing to be scripted.  It is a fallacious dichotomy
And deeply misleading
YOU HAVE THE CHOICE
That is like the Haskell anathema
The Anti-haskell
You guys are playing with fire here
It is true... I was talking to anybot
It was enlightening and strange
quile:  Yeah I am going
quile justin_smith:  Definitely, let's meet somewhere
quile:  Ah, looks awesome!  Never heard of it before
What time can you make it down there?
Sounds good to me
quile:  What the fuck is "gustatory rhinitis" ???
(dec mongodb)
quile:  But what is it???
I mean.... it sounds like a fancy description of the effect
justin_smith:  anybot is okay... I think he is responding to me saying "what"
justin_smith:  Or maybe question marks then!
quile:  Seriously??  So, not an allergy, not a condition you can treat?
Got it, crazy!
Well, good to know
Ahh that makes sense
So how do you treat it then?
justin_smith:  Yeah man!  Sometimes I am so wrapped up in stuff I forget to join here
How goes with you?
Wow!  Sounds badass
Dude, you get to do linux audio for work, that is an achievement
Yeah, awesome situation
brb meeting Jodofon for lunch
justin_smith: So is that how you implemented the audio stuff, with a protocol for reading and writing bytes?
Aha
Yeeeeeeeah
There was only one processor?
And did each one depend on the output of the previous?  Or were they in parallel basically?
Ah, so it was basically parallel
Yeah
Funny!
Aahhhhh, but it seems like you could feed all of those into a clojure program or something to properly parallelize it
Yeah!  jinx
Without a doubt
Yeah that is what it is for
Awesome
Right, so dataflow for actual flowing data : )
That would be awesome
Yeah well you have those problems coordinating any concurrent processes in a way
That would be hilarious, a curses max/msp interface
With ascii wiring between nodes
I would like to see how that performs
But so much more work, and less general
Right, you would need a translation layer
It could be a whole language!
Hmm.... (wheels spinning)
Yeah right!  Still, would be awesome
justin_smith:  What are you up to tonight?  Want to do some code music?
Yeah what is your schedule now??
Wow crazy
So that is what... waking up at three in the morning?
I can see how that would have a serious impact yeah
So it is almost your bedtime then!
justin_smith:  Sounds good
I'll come by your place
What is your apartment number again?  (I always hit the wrong buzzer...)
Awesome!  I'll let you know when I'm heading over there (could be a little later, probably not too much)
justin_smith:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kahn_process_networks
Thankfully
justin_smith:  Yo!  How goes?L
It is good
: )  Yeah sometimes you just need to peel away the abstraction
Always a tradeoff between time saved typing less and raw power of the lower level
Conceptual clarity vs pure flexibility
Well, sql itself is an abstraction of course
Rejects multimethods... of course!  Well, seems like it wouldn't be too hard to find the right predicate
How can you detect a multimethod?
Yeah, caribou queries are really just meant to simplify querying across many tables
That is their main benefit, you can ignore the details of join tables and just focus on the model relationships.  But yeah, huge things missing in terms of generality
I wonder, if we ever fulfilled the dream of targeting many different backends, then the caribou query would be an abstraction over different db paradigms and that would be a benefit... But I'm still not sure that is even plausible
Ah yeah, that talk looks awesome
Haven't had a chance to watch it yet
Really!  Ha
finger issues?
Might be your keyboard : )
evil-mode... Still want to give that a try.  How complete are they?
And doesn't vim have a bunch of chords once you get out of the main proper?
Yeah I never really learned... a good reminder.  Always wanted to
So wait, you just hit ctrl, and it is a prefix?
Ah, I see
That is pretty badass actually
Ah!  I keep hearing about this
Alright, will have to check it out
The other one is interstellar... though it seems more mixed
Ahhhh right : )   It seems intentionally meta
Yeah which is just off the hook
Among other things....  yeah and that movie kind of spawned the entire recent comic book hero movie movement
Cool, I will check it out
Right, most movies are intentionally fortune cookies
To relate to everyone, have no content
let me viewer fill in their own identity
*the
Also, you have inspired me to start listening to all of the Beethoven string quartets
I never really spent much time with them
They are pretty amazing
I think it also depends on how they are played
What recording do you listen to?
I have amazon prime (order a lot of things) and I was able to download the Alexander set
for free
Yeah they are archetypical works of structure in a way
Like, "this is how things harmonize"
"These are organized harmonies"
They are almost works of physics
Definitely proofs, composed of the axioms of acoustics
Wave existence... I always wish I could spend some time and read all the wave math I can find, and thoroughly once and for all transition to the wave perspective of reality
The particle view is so ingrained in perception.  Like we have all these edge detectors to filter wave existence into bins
But the secret is in the waves
Is quile really around??
quile!  How is the little one?  : D
Wow, I said that?
I love the basic idea
Well that is integration for you
Yeah, infinity is great in theory
But for our poor finite mortal existences we have to cut some corners : )
I need an infinity engine
that I could just tap into, like a server
The infinity server
Then I could get some real work done
That is what I thought!  But neo4j thinks otherwise
That is the sane interpretation
But if they are willing to take you to court over it, then you get judges involved who have no idea what is going on... You are risking an expensive battle on behalf of the company
this is pretty enlightening:  http://stackoverflow.com/questions/6500925/agpl-license-question-re-neo4j
And, you still need to buy the license to get any kind of high reliability
That is amazing
But what does it do beyond that?
Send information back somewhere?
Wow, crazy
Of course though, anything that is possible will happen eventually
Just amazing to think of how dependent and open everything really is
How much possibility a general computing architecture really provides
Yeah, there are evil geniuses of the world
http://quietube6.com/v.php/http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g8ei1NF0oic
!
Premium couch oil is hard to find nowadays
used only in the most refined of recipes
!!!
quile!  How goes man??
Hahahaha yeeeeeeeah
In whatever
Yeah that seems like a heavy requirement
I mean a week old, that is insane
I can't even imagine what it is like to be a week old
I will dig deeper then
How are you all holding up?  How's Tara?  How's Callum?
Awesome
Wow yeah, so it's all you then
Yeah nuts!  Well that is what you are there for
You have time off work I assume?
Ah right!
I am listening as well!  Love this thing, so mad
He is in the crazy heavy fourth painting right now
love this one
(I think it is the fourth)
Really starting to get a feel for each painting now, after listening through it a couple of times
Is that the one?  Where is the list?
Yeah it is incredible man, seriously thanks for showing me
It has instantly become one of my favorite pieces of music
You guys use caps lock as ctrl right?
It is insane not to
This does make me want to finally learn vim though, it does seem more elegant
I love the idea
Time to give it a shot : )
I have used vim just enough to know how to get around a bit
but not enough to see the linguistic elegance you speak of
Ordered:  http://www.amazon.com/Pictures-Exhibition-Other-Works-Piano/dp/0486265153
Going through vimtutor right now
Quite a portrait there
And a bunch of other piano music!  Curious about that
Probably some good stuff in there
Yeah he looks fucked up
Okay I get it.  vim is awesome
$ - end of line
^ - beginning of line
d - delete
d$ - delete to end of line
d^ - delete to beginning of line
Iseeiseeiseeisee
Lovely
Yeeeeeeeeahh that is badass
Whoa what the hell?
That is crazy
Aaaaahh yeah
So wait, what is ' , and . ??
' - from mark?
Got it
Ah holy crap
that is awesome
So . composes?
like a pipe or something?
Ahh okay
Right!
screwing with that now
Okay that is super useful
!
Right, registers are always something I wanted to use more of in emacs, this seems far more accessible
Okay, this is enlightening
Freak yeah
Hmm, my marks seem to start from the beginning of lines no matter where I put them
Yeah that part I am fine with
That is why you don't have to chord around
Ah, so how do I mark a specific point in a line?
Or is that not the deal?
Interesting
Yeah being able to just operate between marks and not necessarily the point is rad:  :'a,bd
Or whatever
What about clojure editing?  Syntax highlighting?  Modes?
paredit?
At the moment yeah
Might be nice to immerse myself before messing with the hybrid
Well, ed is the one true editor
Hmm... d% is half of paredit ; )
That is odd.  So you have seen both now?
Hahahaha what the hell?
Seems like they may be targeting a certain demographic....
So they are basically the same movie then
The parallelism is uncanny
Dude this is almost a thesis!
Apparently gravity is not a force (or so I'm told)
Not sure!  I need more physics to know... but it is something about how the "force" of gravity is really all particles trying to move in a straight line through curved space
I feel like they do that every year
It is ingenious... I hope they win
Wow, that is releavnt
I mean, relevant
I MEAN< RELEVANT
Hello!
()
(monday morning meeting........)
Ahh nethack.  Thanks for the reminder : )
I guess they were decoupling the commands from the keybindings.  Makes sense actually
Ooohhh okay, ha!  Well yeah, that seems unnecessary
Someone was overeager in their abstraction it seems
Yeah, just because you can code it, doesn't mean it makes sense
It reminds me just how many ways things could be coded that we dismiss without even thinking about them because they are obtuse and strange
But they are still possible
Rube-Goldberg oriented programming
The simplest thing is such a small point in the vast space of possibility
Which is why it is so rarely found
Where the theme is arrived at by more and more laborious means
And then they are performed in reverse, so that the original theme is the last thing played
Oh quile by the way, my Mussorgsky book has arrived in the mail
I have already been playing through it, what an awesome piece
Bydlo might be my favorite
for whatever reason
But yeah, the great gate of kiev, that thing rocks.  So satisfying to play
Yeah, I can't thank you enough
I showed Jodi the book, she flinched when she saw his portrait ; )
He is quite a dude
justin_smith:  Only pride
I have messed around with that shadershop before, pretty cool!
Yes, being lunch is quite expensive
@wotd
That is always shocking to me
How did they hold up?
Yeah sometimes I am like "This is brilliant!  How did I ever do this?" and sometimes I am like "WTF was I thinking gaaaaaahhh!!"
Always strange to see evidence of thought patterns from a seemingly different person
That would be amazing
Crossing the gulf of time
TNT is awesome
Though I forgot to say just flank and they threw all the crazy stuff in the bowl : )
Between first and second on Ankeny
Right by all the Saturday market stuff
Wow!  That was ... verbatim? D
justin_smith:  How goes?
Hey I wanted to ask you if you were free Sunday?
We are having a dinner party with Annie and Jarvo and would like you to come if you are able : )
Our house, early dinner?
Sweet!  Looking forward to it
What are you up to lately?
What is foundationdb?
Ah, interesting
So kind of like redis?  More reliable than redis?
Wow, seriously
That is pretty radical
Right, I love it.  Giving us an actual tangible way to measure db behavior beyond a bunch of marketing claims and vague situational benchmarks
Interesting
Good to know about, I may find use for that some day
I just found a legitimate reason to have the code here rewrite itself while it was running
Not every day that comes up, could not resist
These people had overridden "method_missing" for the Hash class to do lookups on the method name
So like "foo.bar = 5" instead of "foo[:bar] = 5"
Which is great if your key is not actually a method in hash, in which case everything goes to hell
So I appended the method_missing to look up where it was in the execution stack, find the line, substitute out the sane accessor and write the file back to disk
It is like a self-repairing function
Yeah, it is pretty awesome
Take that ruby
I called the branch "method_present"
Ah looking forward to retiring this poor thing once and for all
justin_smith:  Looking forward to hearing that
As in, BASIC?
Oh man I miss BASIC
GOSUB yo
Or should I say, 10 GOSUB
Always
What do you think?
I have been checking it out, but I'm not sure it has 20 WEBSCALE
justin_smith:  Working for jono?  Awesome!
justin_smith:  Great to hear
I had other obligations unfortunately
What was it about?
Ha, how is he going about that?
quile:  Thanks for the warning!  Pretty calm out there right now, crazy
justin_smith:  How is it working out?
Uh-oh
justin_smith:  Yeah I have noticed that too... I wonder if the history files got reset somehow?
justin_smith:  Are you getting some sound out of those things yet?
Awesome!
Oh man, what is the new `lein push`?
Just did that and it gave me a bunch of gpg errors...
Hmm.... must have been awhile
Ah, nevermind
I just don't have gpg installed on this machine!
Ha!  I think that number is about 3 right now
No, but I'm glad we do
I like that we had hyperbolic before linear
That is awesome
Linear algebra is a form of magic
No he just got back
Poignant
Your mic was recording its own eulogy?
Yeeeeeah, it is like a roadside shrine propagator
roadside shrines that lure people into them to create more roadside shrines
self-propagating
That is dark
Yeah!  Watch out, there are traps everywhere
http://www.ski.org/Vision/Eyepage/Images/insectB.jpg
justin_smith:  Wow that looks like an awesome show
Also the symphony tonight
Also the gamecrafters meetup
Too many things going on tonight
Dingle??   What the hell?
quile:  Hey man, how was the show!
Glad to see that
justin_smith:  How was the show!
quile:  Ah really?  bummer
justin_smith:  Ah really?  bummer!
quile:  Yeah I wondered about that
It is so saccharinized
I mean, still awesome but yeah
justin_smith:  What was the problem??  It looked pretty cool
Oh, house beats
quile:  What was it that Perlman played?
justin_smith:  Hahahahaha
quile:  Okay, I mean, okay.  Interesting!
Yeah last time I heard perlman live it was okay, but maybe because he is so famous I was expecting more
I feel like he really hams it up
He is like the Kenny G of violinists
Ah, well yeah
Or maybe Perlman is more the Spielberg of violinists
Okay
Was really wrestling with either going to that, going to Smitho's ambient show or just hitting my gamecrafters design group
Yeah quile, you have ruined me on pictures!
Also, the piano version is hard to find
Do you know a good recording of it?
Yeah, like it is too polished
Yeeeeeeaaah
I mean a recording just of the piano version
not orchestral
Cool, I'll check it out
Was looking around and searching for it just reveals recording after recording of the orchestral version
justin_smith:  Sorry to hear about the wankery!
I just ended up hanging out with some game designers
Got a great playtest of Sol in
Ah there we go
Thanks quile
Clearly
That would be kind of amazing
and bizarre
You should be able to stream videos into ascii art
and images
!!
Gets me every time
That seems redundant
Netsplit most likely
justin_smith:  undirected acyclic???
I did not realize
That seems...undesirable
justin_smith:  Yeah man!  You can have it any time
Didn't mean to keep it so long... such is book loaning
justin_smith:  Yeah good call!  Next week for lunch would be awesome
About time
Right, but other people have I believe
Happy Monday D
justin_smith:  No I did not.  But I will put it in my backpack and bring it tomorrow... Meet for lunch then?
Oh hell!
Hmm....
Where is the reading?
Okay!  Sorry about that
Sure... well we can still do lunch tomorrow?

Those are spaces
justin_smith:  How about Kenny + Zukes downtown?
Works well to get there at 11:45
Awesome
justin_smith:  How is work going for you lately?
We are looking for a clojure developer actually... More frontend/backend than pure backend
I have been messing with Om, it looks pretty cool
justin_smith:  Awesome!
justin_smith:  Looks like I have something until around 12:30 tomorrow actually, so meet up for lunch a little later?
Ah, I have to get out of here now
Fleeing downtown!
Talk to you tomorrow
justin_smith:  Aha!  Sounds pretty fun
Does everyone read?
I'm sure I could find something laying around...
Ahh awesome.  Yeah I would be interested in that
What else have you read by Jesse Ball?
I'll have to check that one out
Oh, so did you see I have to do lunch a little later today?  After 12:30... let's just say 12:45 if you can still do it
Cool
justin_smith:  You still planning on coming down here?
Getting huuuuuungry
Okay you must be on your way : )
: )
Yeah because cops are always going around recording things
So in other news, neo4j totally fell over when we tried to load it with data
Apparently it is optimized for many hops across sparse networks, and we have some nodes with ~5000000 edges
Which in those cases it has to scan through every edge : (
We were on the phone with their engineers and everything, they basically told us we were trying to do a "global" query and it wouldn't work
So!  There goes that idea
Now to explore every other option available
quile:  WTF!
I guess I see the path to success
Exploding kittens!  How had I never thought of that...
Impressive!
Our company is still trying to raise 2 million... I'll let them know this new tactic we should be using
Contracting is fun... I wish I had time off
I just wrote 93 lines of code to implement betweenness centrality without testing it and it ran correctly the first time
Shit like that makes me feel like a superhero
ha
Then I realize it is just some code and no one's life is saved
https://www.refheap.com/96400
In case anyone needs it
justin_smith:  That is a lot of piss
Why are we wasting all this water on olympic pools!
quile:  For you:  http://www.reddit.com/r/newzealand/comments/2t9vgj/why_i_hate_new_zealanders_and_why_i_always_will/
You guys going to Clojure West?
Getting my ticket now
justin_smith:  Oh, so I went and saw inherent vice last night!
WTF was that, wow
I think I pieced it all together but I am still fuzzy on the real estate guy's role in everything
Pretty interesting flick though... we discussed it for like 2 hours afterwards so that is a sign of a good movie
Right, but he didn't seem to play that large of a role in the larger scheme of things
Was he part of the cult before or something?
Why would they care if he fell into a hippy thing?
But what was her connection to everything else then?
She was hanging out with the fbi...
(at least, the fbi was having a pool party at the house)
Hmm.... but the fbi was also there at the institution with Wolf guy
So it seems like they knew
The fbi seemed to be in on everything
Right
The fbi represented the government itself, sort of orchestrating all of this other stuff
Yeah, that was crazy
There was a lot of textural contrast in the movie
That just came out of nowhere, he kills those guys and then bigfoot is down there...
Ha!  Ooh good find
Right, I feel like bigfoot lead him through that whole thing in a way
That was a great relationship between those two
Yeah but I loved the whole connected industries kind of thing, that the heroin dealers would get into the rehabilitation business, and also dentistry
Cause the problems, then fix them, profit the entire time
It was basically a giant paranoid conspiracy kind of thing
Yeah of course : )
No, what's that?
Ah, that sounds awesome
Sorry I missed it
Yeah that is amazing : )
quile!  How goes?
Hey quile!  Long time no see : )
How goes man?
Aha!  How was that?
Gone all week?
That is intense
Yeah, how does that work?  Did she get some help from her folks?
Ah wow
Oh hell, did you get to see White Mass??
Not really forgivable
Right : )   Well was it good to be with the compatriots?
Inhabit the same space as other humans etc
Well, welcome back
Surely rest is in your future
Oh man, total blast
Maybe largest group yet?
Superbowl was definitely working in our favor
Oh yeah, awesome!
Should be fun : )
If I can get the Bach down that is
some tricky stuff in there
I will have it down over and over again and then just randomly stumble over some innocent passage
Should be fun though
Want to do one of my own compositions for the next one
Whenever it is I fit in composing something with all the other things I'm doing
Yeah, seems more in the spirit of things ultimately
I saw that : )
Good spirited folk the kiwis
quile:  Already have my ticket!
Looking forward to it
You going?
Yeah... how much different is it?
justin_smith:  You going?
Tasty
justin_smith:  Good to see you last night!
That was pretty fun actually
Ah really!  Yeah that sounded really cool
Also curious about this funhouse thing Jed was talking about
Ah rad.  Shell clojure, I love it
Pretty impressive really
Ha!  Cljell
I would use it
quile:  Awesome!  Let's coordinate as the time approaches
I thought Jed had an employer
Ah
Yeah right
I guess I should have asked my employer!
Actually, maybe it is not too late...
Hahahaha a different one each time?
That is kind of radical
justin_smith:  Where do you want to go to lunch today?
I can travel anywhere
Yeah that sounds perfect
quile:  Oh man!  What the hell?
Where from?
Holy crap!
Woooooooooow
Did you have any indication when you were cooking with them?
Wow crazy
Well, since food poisoning can kill you, yeah
Yeah I can imagine
I have a meeting until noon, so probably 12:15?
If that works for you guys
This is the paper I am implementing today:  http://www.emilio.ferrara.name/wp-content/uploads/2011/07/isda2011-k-path.pdf
Ah well, all a matter of perspective I suppose
quile:  It was pretty awesome actually!
Metamorphosis is amazing
And I actually enjoyed Carmina Burana quite a bit : )
I mean, it is goofass
It has this way intense opening fanfare, then... silliness
I can see why for sure
Was he?
It said that Hitler disapproved of the piece
But that doesn't mean he wasn't a nazi
Man, the nazis really ruined everything
It is interesting that Hitler's abomination created also a nuclear fallout in semantic/symbolic/stylistic space that has never recovered
It is like he took out everything conceptually around him, as well as physically
No one names their kids Adolf, no one wears funny vertical mustaches, no one uses swastikas
I wonder if sentiment will ever come around, kind of like how everyone thinks Gengis Khan is a badass now
That took what, a thousand years?
Yeah that is true.  There are also people in this country who wear/tattoo swastikas, just a relative minority
Holy crap, that is amazing!
And the source material is far above and beyond the run of the mill advertising fare
That guy is amazing
For some reason I innately trust him
That is some pretty badass klingon blade ascii art
quile:  Holy crap!  This is amazing
Wow, yeah I remember you talking about this guy
Yeah similar in that it is entirely his own voice and creation, I feel like this is way more out there harmonically
without being atonal
I like it a lot
Seems even more impossible to play than Scriabin as well ; )
What is it?
Hahahahha of course
I don't see how you could avoid that
Also though if you are sweating profusely why be wrapped in blankets??  Wouldn't that make it worse?
Well, the best apocryphal stories capture something of the truth
apocraphyl is a substance that converts photons into photogelatin
There is a reason certain stories are repeated over and over
On the other hand, wikipedia does not contain ALL knowledge, despite appearances
Maybe if you find a reference you can expand the article???
justin_smith:  Awesome!  Thanks for the heads up
Holy animal that is convoluted and strange
What can't you solve with more levels of indirection??
justin_smith:  What was the name of that profiler tool you were talking about at the last clojure meetup?
Also, do you know any way to stop emacs from trying to display a giant output once it's started??  : P
Already tried that ha!
quile:  Ah, it went great!
People seemed to really enjoy it
My hands were shaking like mad in the first movement of the Bach, but I settled down and the rest went of in spectacular fashion
*off
Yeah man, what the hell!  : D
How was the soccer game?
Haha wow, congrats!
You are like, MVP
Well, that sounds pretty awesome though
All in due time!
It is too bad, seriously I have to check with you next time I schedule one
The next one we are doing the Shostakovich sonata for Cello and Piano, transcribed for Viola
So that will be fucking rad
That Arby's thing, once again, just getting at the true spirit of the branD
Thank you internet for continuously articulating things I felt but could not express
What's up #tripartite?
I have been insanely busy lately
justin_smith:  What is the status of polaris lately?
I see we merged in those changes we didn't want to merge all that time ago
quile!  How goes man?
Oh man, what?
Ah, what is the situation?
Hmm, that is a bummer
Is it just being in a different location?
Ah yeah, man all I hear about is docker now
justin_smith:  I just remember they were that grapenthin guy's changes and he rewrote the whole thing
I think R2 was just doing due diligence and didn't realize we didn't want to merge them
Yeah I think I am going to do that
We are starting to use it at work now, and I am using the old ass version
But justin_smith:  My real question is what other kinds of improvements have we made since then?
I see you have done some work on the repo
Are they minimal?
Something about multimethods
Okay cool
I will take care of it
Cool!  Polaris lives
I don't know... I think he added something too
I will talk to him about it
Ah, I will just put the current state on a branch
Then revert and apply any improvements made since then (which I think are small)
I will be doing some work on it now that we are using it also
crux... good name
Well, maybe I will fork just for that reason?  Haha
No, that will be a new lib
Right
Yeah, that is a library waiting to happen
I think I finally understand what this middleware feature is that everyone always wanted
You want to be able to add a middleware to some url, and have all of the urls under it use that middleware
Like, tree scope middleware
So you don't have to add it to each function every time
Cool, for some reason I never got that before
The question is how to fit it into our vector-syntax
We already have the option to provide a map as the handler (with :GET, :POST as keys etc)
Yeah, that sounds right
That example the :base key is indicating the name of that route
It is not a trigger or anything
The thing is that the handler is a map of functions rather than a single function
I think it could fit in there
Or we have some idea of an options map somewhere
Right
So if you just provide a function, call that function
but if you have options provide a map there
It could be the entry point for a bunch of different options
(right now just HTTP type)
Does that work?
So justin_smith:  Your fix was to create the add-handler multimethod... how does this fix the multimethod thing?
Is a multimethod of type AFn maybe?
Was it failing on the (fn? ...) predicate?
Got it
Radical
justin_smith: quile:  Reverted!  You will have to reclone probably since I did a force push to master
Ah yeah, those things are amazing
They really knew how to write with pens back in the day
justin_smith:  Congratulations!
Do you have a link?
I've seen this one!
I mean, I've seen you perform this
Hey!  Nice anybot
anybot does so many things, but does not respond to his own name?
Seems like potential there : )
There we go
So he has already solved the general case
justin_smith:  Just saw all of this... Did you figure it out?
Ah, well that makes sense
So it just refused??
Ha
Well you know, dots are dangerous
Probably a security risk
That was facetious
Probably a dumbass string validator deep in the code somewhere
stingray hive symbol!
Sounds like danger
Yeah that is kind of freaky
Man I just got out of a crazy illness
finally back at it
Rough week
How are you doing quile?
It was flu-like
Yeah?  You open today?
Cool!  Totally down
Oooohh tough choice
Maybe hawaii
Yeah, that sounds awesome
Are you thinking the burnside one?
No that sounds good
Let's do it
Probably... 12:30
Done
Oh man, that soloist had the greatest three word poem when he was describing the Lutoslawski
justin_smith:  I have been wondering about that one!
I'll have to check it out
Let me remember
(something) apocalyptic meditation
When describing the third movement... do you remember?
That was definitely the last two
I think it was searing apocalyptic meditation
Hahahaha
Of course
Ah right... aleatoric
We have been pretty thorough there
I utilized a disk currency to aleatorically determine the outcome
justin_smith:  Speaking of movies, I finally saw interstellar : )
Well, I actually thoroughly enjoyed it
But I wasn't being very critical
There were a zillion things I could have taken issue with
But instead I decided to just enjoy it
quile:  Me neither, but randomly we will hit up the laurelhurst on a whim
justin_smith:  Like, I'm not sure it was realistic
Ah quile, if you are going to see it then I won't give anything away
Exactly
Well, when quile sees it we can have a throwdown on it
Ah!  I have been wondering about that one too
I think I have become less critical of things as time goes on
quile:  It is still at laurelhurst I think
Yep
See you there
What happened?
quile:  Ah!  Ate lunch at 11:00 today : )
Usually down though
I might need more heads up otherwise I will eat the first possible opportunity
Yeah let's do this week for sure
Down for some lunchslow
justin_smith:  Sounds pretty interesting
Reid Urban?   Why would I know this guy?
rings a bell
Vaguely
The past man, it's all a blur
Yeah I remember this whole... mass of people
They were everywhere
swarming around like bacteria
That gif does not open for me
Okay, the site did not open for me : )
Glad they finally made a law about that
Yeah, it was cool
is cool
Simplifies a lot of things
????
quile: justin_smith:  Down for lunch today?  If you guys feel like coming downtown
Cool, Thursday it is
3333333
I don't know man, the docs for `keep` say the function should be free of side effects ; )
Although I guess the exceptions are caught
That is pretty funny though
I mean, it works?
How else would you implement arities?
quile:  No!  But seriously interested in it
What do you think???
Yeah, it looks really rad
I am more interested in its scaling dynamic
Right, supposedly!  I haven't used it yet
And you will never believe the answers it gives, even though they are accurate
One of the lesser known Strauss works
justin_smith:  quile:  You guys still down for lunch today?
Ah yeah!
Well, it seems to have blown up a bit
Originally it was going to be an informal discussion about how to make an algorithm more efficient
I might be working until right before the event
But if not I will head down there/text you and see where you are
333333
justin_smith:  There are no time zones.  We are living in a society of hypnotized delusionists
There is no daylight savings time
Just because everyone is mistaken in the same way does not make them right
That is a feature
As it turns out, our models of reality and reality itself are not necessarily isomorphic
Cool!  I'll check it out
justin_smith:  Yeah!  Last week was crazy
How goes?
That is a rough story
Sorry to hear that!
333333333
SOL
It is happening
quile:  That show was pretty good!
I love seeing music at lincoln recital hall
Man, my bad too I meant to ask you a couple days ago and forgot
Dude shostakovich wrote that trio when he was 16
and it was awesome
Ah yes, back when doing weird shit was a way of life
justin_smith:  That is my favorite joke from the future
Yoyo!
How are you guys doing?
Just got back from a four day board game convention
It was madness
It was pretty off the hook
Sol was a blast
Did 10 demos
Everyone loved it, it was a hit
Got a bunch of sign ups
Met a bunch of game designers
Crazy times, definitely in recovery period
What did I miss?
Haha rad!
Do you have them up?
Oops
Ah yeah, that is quite a conflict
I'm sure she would understand ; )
You could probably make a case for that
What time is it happening?
You could probably make dinner and hit the show or vice versa
Oh man!  How is that guy?
Haha right : )
So wait, he's famous then?
Right, so is it paintings, or performance?  Or "installations"?
I guess I haven't been keeping track
Okay yeah I've seen one of these
That guy is pretty awesome
Always enjoyed his antics
Ah interesting
link?
Maybe useful for a music thing?
That would be my first application
(meeting)
Ah, we should all get lunch soon
Wow
I bet the abyss throat organ has some serious bass tone resonances
You guys able to get some lunch tomorrow?
Cool!
Any preferences?
Sure, old Indian Grill on burnside?
That is still the best indian I've found around town
Ah I did not hear about foundationdb... RIP??
Hooooooooly crap!!
Man, fuck apple
Wow, that is some ugly behavior
This reminds me of a terrible thing:  http://np.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/307ihi/til_that_when_a_cockroach_touches_a_human_it_runs/cpq3jky?context=3
Don't read that
333333333
justin_smith:  That works for me... I can do a little later if need be
quile?
Great word!
I have been committing acts of illocution my whole life without even knowing it
33333
I would like to hear that poem dogdog
justin_smith:  Awesome!  What did you have in mind?
I realized recently that the one thing keeping me from having a blog was the word "blog"
That sounds extremely helpful
So basically what you do on IRC all day
Exactly
Everytime you answer a question, pull the transcription and put it on your site
Or maybe just the interesting ones
Yeah!  I did this recently also
For elephantlaboratories.com
It is a "chronicle", which makes me feel okay about doing it : )
http://elephantlaboratories.com/chronicle/index.html
Hell yeah
I am using cryogen and disqus, which made it completely straightforward to set up
In honor of your Mahler's 3rd party I will put it on also!
Ah yeah this is good
It definitely has some funny stuff in it... but a lot of it is the cool dark stuff
Maybe the time has come to restructure the traditional adventurer/dungeon denizen relationship
So much heartache and strife, for what?  If we all understood each other better, maybe we would find we are more similar than it first appears
justin_smith:  Ha!  Okay, I'll head over there
What is the status?
Hey, cool!
We just started using caribou core to connect to postgres also
Caribou renaissance
It lives!
Yeah if they are using it they are more than welcome to contribute
justin_smith:  Totally
Funny
quile:  Are you using the latest polaris with the subtree middleware?
Yeah we have three projects now using Polaris
New go to exception library
I have a shitty robot... it is called a "chair"
It has trouble getting around, but is still pretty cool
I mean, a work in progress
183
3333
Ah I remember these
Pretty awesome concept
If simple waves can combine into complex shapes, that gives a good basis for explaining how we can exist
Whoa!!  No way... no I did not
Gnaaaaaaaarly
That seems like a way better way to go about it
333333
Hey justin_smith, how goes?
Is it heavy?
How is work going lately?
map of http requests..... Oh yeah!
dechunk was the ticket
weird
So you are pretty open then?
I ask because we could use some help over here
Good to hear!  Maybe you can come by the office at some point this week?
Sweet
What is your rate lately?
(if you don't mind me asking)
No that sounds about right
Sure, well I'm not paying it ; )
Though little bird does not have a ton of cash right now
It will help me sell the idea
We have had to pass on some good candidates because they were too high, which is a real bummer
Cool... maybe tomorrow?
Let me scrounge it up
506 SW 6th Ave #200, Portland, OR 97204
(we are the whole second floor)
Good question, let me find out
How does 3:00pm sound?
Yeah, we are thinking of doing a workshop style thing
We will have a projector and maybe you could lead?
If that is not too intimidating : )
Hmm... maybe not leading, just driving
Not sure what the best format is, I could drive too and you contribute if that makes more sense
But yeah, a Clojure workshop.  You know, like we did at instrument
We pick something we are trying to build or a problem to solve and collectively figure it out
I like how they are interacting
http://stackoverflow.com/questions/172303/is-there-a-regular-expression-to-detect-a-valid-regular-expression
What string quartets?
Another good reason not to listen to pop
I have heard he is a huge D&D advocate
Could it be that Vin Diesel is actually a cool guy?
(the answer is yes)
33333333333333
How do we do expression evaluation?
Yeah that is almost runnable
I don't think I am too familiar with Dutilleux
What was played?  Do you have a link?
Schumann I could never get into
Okay yeah this is good
quile:  Ah... was that Dutilleux?  Yeah that was rad!
Okay this guy is legit
Yeah, impressionistic
quile!  How the hell's it going man?
quile:  : (
justin_smith:  Yeah I agree.  I think the impressionistic term has been abused
(like every other term)
Just downloaded these concertos....   Aaawwwwweeeeeeesome
justin_smith:  Which ones are they?
(headphones)
I would like
I kind of like git jinx pod
I just typed `> git jinx pod` into the command line and now my repository is floating a self-replicating through space
Probably
Or memory apparently
That is really the problem with exceptions
Crickets:  Food of the future
Anything with a bit of teriyaki sauce is not bad
They are food!  It is just our preconceptions that hold us back
in this cricket-deprived reality we have imposed on ourselves
333333333
Yoyo!
What is that?
No, ah is it a "mobile app"?
Ah awesome
You have a tablet now?
Osc is everything midi wishes it was
Wow this looks awesome
Man we are doomed
Watching now
quile:  That is nuts
Just the beginning
We are seeing the birth of a whole new way of life
Robot swarms building buildings
Robot swarms creating the space elevator
Robot swarms sent to harvest resources on other planets
Yeah then robot swarms devouring humanity
Before that though, it will be pretty amazing (the part we are able to witness)
I have not!
Thanks for the link
Oooooohhhh yeah
I have seen this
crazy!
Heading to Tacoma this weekend!  See you all next week
33333333
Yoyoyo
That is amuzing
quile:  Did justin_smith tell you he is coming to work for Little Bird??  : )
It is pretty awesome
Everyone is stoked over here
Well, all in due time ....
There will be much fun
it is true
There is more than enough fun to go around
quile:  Now you can come meet us at lunch downtown... since that will be happening with great regularity
Without a doubt
Pretty much whenever you want to come by ; )
Man I can't believe clojurewest starts this weekend
Yeah not sure how much of the weekend stuff I will see either
*shit
Yeah there is some kind of party at Puppet
Yeah, Sunday I think?
Hmmmm maybe Tuesday night?
Yeah that is the one
I swear I have seen "binary whine broadsword" before......
333333333
quile:  Were you using cassandra from clojure?
Did you use alia or cassaforte?
I guess I did
3333333
quile:  Can you make it to workshop today at 3:00?
(meant to ask you earlier but then... I didn't)
We are doing some async stuff
No worries!  Open invitation on fridays in general
3333333
quile:  Ha!  Yeah.... so happy.  The happiest of birthdays
I think I recognized most of the places that was pulled from
Definitely should be the standard happy birthday theme
I'm not sure of those... did he just make a bunch of stuff up?
Ah, did you see that someone is playing 22 of 32 beethoven sonatas at old church in May?
http://www.portlandmercury.com/portland/beethovens-odyssey/Event?oid=15384850
Postapocalyptic
Did you see that someone is playing 22 of 32 beethoven sonatas at old church in May?
Yeeeeeeeahh
Yeah, first night is May 6
Never heard of him... let me check
http://theoldchurch.org/next-month-at-the-old-church/
Beethoven's Odyssey - Gregory Partain?
Definitely planning on going : )
Yeah, I want to see as many of them as possible as well
7 performances might be hard to pull off
But still, I might try to go to all of them
Ha!  Awesome : )
I'll be there
I think we should see if the guy is even any good yet.  If he is slaughtering the sonatas then we don't need to worry about it ; )
quile:  Hmm... disjoint?
I think it only works for postgres though
I had them in mysql then had to take them out (for some reason I used to rant about but escapes me now)
3333333
quile:  Radical!
Wow, so "spine mantis alliteration" will live for all time
Aha... !  Thank you : )
So does that mean my password is no longer open source?
I have been meaning to change that for.... 3 years now
Ah!  okay then, maybe time for me to fix
No worries there
Thanks for fixing
So the component pattern is not yet seeped into your bones??  ; )
That is the bastard
justin_smith has vowed to refactor caribou to use the component pattern
and add a db arg to every call everywhere
Yeah, it would
that dynamic var is totally cheesy
It feels so clumsy to use
Oh yeah Smitho showed me that crazy web framework thread
Did you guys get any responses?  I haven't checked back
Yeah would feel so good to use it that way
I just didn't know when I started
I am a monster
I thought I was fixing everything........ at least they aren't global atoms everywhere???
333333333
Funny
Ocean motion
Oh hey quile, are you going to Beethoven tonight?
justin_smith also for that matter?
Understood!
justin_smith:  Sonatas 1+2+3 http://theoldchurch.org/calendar/?mc_id=697
33333
quile:  Ah, it was pretty good!  I think the guy may lack a bit of the fire, but it was enjoyable
quile:  That is my plan as well!
quile:  Yeah man, come on by LB around 5pm and we will go from here
Ah sure, well whenever you get here
no hurry
Yep
333
Wow....
Which I admit, was kind of a dick move
I think I am starting to understand the definition of numberwang
Yeah man, that was great fun, thanks again
A totally unique and insane game
Ah, and you left the page open on Opus 28 and I was messing with it this morning, that is good stuff
Ha, what the hell?
"sans tonalite"
Interesting... though it does seem to have a little tonality : )
It just autoplayed this one afterwards:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R7jB5S3FZWI
quile:  No way!  Good find.........
I hate hearing about these things happening months away
Like, I want to go now
Maybe he will have a little more precision than our friend Dr. Partain?
Okay, yeah I have never been to one
Ha, holy crap!  Where are you getting this information?  Wait, I have google
quile:  Never heard of this Perahia character
Yeah these look legit
http://portlandpiano.org/season15-16
What the hell man????
Have you checked the logs?
Yeah... https://github.com/caribou/caribou-admin/commits/master
"Kyle Dawkins" all over the place
But it is a weird non-user avatar
With no link
That is bad
I wonder... there must be a way to fix it
They have always been really helpful when I've talked to them
quile:  Seriously!  Awesome
What is temporary about it?
That is okay it seems
I bet those graphs are way different now... !
quile:  Yeah, let's do that
333333
3333333333
quile:  Did you go to beethoven last night?
Yeah, me neither!  Too bad... was so stoked about it when I heard about it
justin_smith:  Yeah that sounds way better!
quile:  Yeah me too!  At least it sparked a new phase of B appreciation if nothing else
quile:  So... high frontier tonight?
Oh freaking playoffs, yeah
No way!  Awesome... link?
Awesome, looking forward to it
333333
Yes, at times!
quile:  Yeah, crazy!  How goes??
Been at a game conference for a week
No, Kublacon
: )  Yeah it was awesome actually
Best game convention yet
The hotel was pretty great, most of the gaming happened in the "atrium" full of trees and natural light
quile:  I noticed he volunteered some information : )
San Francisco
Whoa.. ?
So, he thought I needed to relax then??
Ha
!
Yeah, we demoed Sol the whole time
Met all kinds of people
People love it man
Multiple people came by to play a second game
Also, we were in the game design competition
Out of 22 entries, we got 2nd!
I have a "silver" Kubla Khan bust trophy I got to bring home
Yeah, it was pretty awesome
Met so many people, I love conferences
in general
Yeah, how many responses does he have?
You win!
Yeah, maybe a way to seed him with responses?
Ah, so they said our big issue was actually the rulebook...
Because people at the conference were learning it just from the rules, and apparently it was pretty hard to figure out how to play
Once they got it, it worked out well
But it was a big obstacle
Yeah I got pages of notes on the rulebook alone
Hahaha that is one of the greatest things he has ever said
The first place went to "Vikings of Dragonia"... which actually lookes pretty well done
I didn't get a chance to play it
but it is in kickstarter right now
Yeah, so it was awesome.  How are things around here?
Aha!  how is it working out?
Ah right
So handlers are not just functions in the node frameworks?
Oh!!
: (
Interesting
I see
That makes sense
So it is working then?  How does it feel to use?  Does it solve your problem?
Haha yeah I was trying to use realistic examples
Things that would actually come up in a web framework
Well, glad to hear
You have a link?
Or is it not up yet?
Ha!!  Nice name : )
Of course
What the hell is crux already in node?
Haha
Looks good man!
Man it has been awhile since I've looked at commas in lists....
So did it map pretty directly into js?
I'm not sure his identification of sentiment is entirely accurate : )
3333
33
Seriously justin_smith, chill out
You are way out of control
So much anger in this channel
(takes deep breath)
Working out on fire is good motivation
justin_smith:  Time to make it sound like objects are flying all over the place!
I'm totally relaxed!!
ahem
quile:  Time for some high frontier soon?  : )
Let me know a good night for you... maybe tomorrow?
That could work
Let's play it by ear
Cool, I've been hankering...  Space calls
33333333
Dude, relax
quile:  What is it called?
Oh wait, that wood-fired cart??
I have always wondered about that place
Yeah, it is a questionable adjective
How goes quile!
Every once in awhile I forget about my IRC client...
Hmm....
3333333!
For the adventurous vegetarian
quile!  Thanks for solving my 5x5x5 : )
Good to see you on Saturday
Ouch!!
That might be the most painful 3wp yet?
quile:  No I was not working on it : )
I solve it periodically, but last time I tried I forgot your special move
Solving the middle is the funnest part anyway
333333
Yoyo!  How goes quile?
I remembered IRC again
The Z still surprises me
Ah yeah, the zoo... Hmm, zoos are half awesome and half depressing
I love getting to see crazy animals, but they all look so forlorn
Maybe I am just projecting
Isn't her brother some kind of director?  producer?  movie star?
This is true
Poor rest of the animal kingdom that is not us
I would like to see the zebras coordinating with the giraffes and hippos
Ah yeah!  Have fun
I can do Thursday
Getting on a train later that day
but not until the afternoon so yeah
Yep!  Enjoy the family
3333333
I imagine a fire snowman would be somewhat incomplete
quile:  Finally watched that video you sent... !
Ha!
Actually catches the spirit of it quite well
Or maybe exactly what he had in mind
3333333
quile:  Noon work for you?
We can just meet here at LB and walk to the food carts
SW 6th and Washington
Sure, text me when you get here
we will appear
You could come up to the second floor in the elevator too
If it is not too awkward to walk into a place of business as a random ; )
3333333333
3333
3333333
DDDD
333333
33333
Kind of upsetting
!
333
We are all doomed
????????????? D
333333
33333
Haha
3e
3333
quile:  Want to get some lunch today?
quile:  Crazy story
333
3333
33333
333
Important to be ordered
about such things
3333
Dude, resonant cataclysm moss ... I want some for my backyard
My arm is back!
Most Definitively
: (
Wait until that wavefunction collapses
quile: That is the current world we live in I believe
quile:  Just got back!
now catching up on real life
Man it was insane
We demoed Sol for 4 days non stop
Met all kinds of people, designers and publishers, artists, wackos in costumes...
It was awesome
Yeah, definitely in recovery mode
How goes over there?
Haha, you mean you weren't just at a game convention with 65,000 people all weekend?
Well, it is good to be back
Been traveling all over the place, ready to relax
Yeah man!  Well that is its own form of insanity I'm sure
quile:  Whaaaaa??
What is the story?
Oooooohhhh
??
Yeah but they can't just replace all those systems right?
Aha
Yeah that is big
Well, you have any leads?
Portland is basically starving for development help apparently
according to stories
We are currently at cap with Smitho or I would offer immediately ; )
Dude puppet might be a cool place to go
Wow
conjoined gum panda
Awesome
Hahaha that is spectacular
Ah I didn't realize when you were describing it it was Planck the unit and not plank the board
Freaking awesome, installing it now
33333
Now THAT is an instrument I want to play
... or maybe not
3333
Well at least he is open about it
quile:  Whoa!  good news I guess?
quile: Will you still be contract, or will it be more of a full-time-yet-remote gig?
That does sound better then... clojure and full-time
Good luck on that!  When do you find out?
33333
33333
Well at least it is optional
That is convenient
333333
Also: amazing D
quile:  Any word on the job front?
Ah, good luck then!
More like a board game renaissance is driving a 196 million crowdfunding movement?
Who knows which way the causal arrow is pointing..... though there are many more board games appearing than just the ones on kickstarter
quile:  Ha!  Weird how it really takes the magic out
So other languages are just cooler basically
English is like troll language
all grunting and glottal collisions
Do they?
Hmm... curious about that
I do, it is one of my favorites!
And:  butterfly is one of the worst words ever invented
Flies are gross
flies covered in butter are even worse
Who thought that up?
Way the hell worse than schmetterling
Schmetterling is an awesome word, just not a graceful word perhaps
3333
quile:  Any word on the job front?
?
Aha
funny, no feedback on that?
Ah okay cool
Likewise my friend D
quile:  Yeah, so things are still going along
It is not necessarily urgent
Ah right!
When will they be here??
would be great to see them
Yeah there will have to be some event
Just some dumb lizards, that's what
33333
333
3333
3333333
33333
Pure torture
jinx
33333
quile:  http://portlandpiano.org/alexandermelnikov/
Maybe they want to go ... ??  : )
I have never heated them live
I didn't see that, but I read some other stuff about the guy
Looks awesome
I can't miss it
Those are some of my favorite pieces of all time
Currently have two tickets for each show
Jodi seems only kind of excited about it ; )
If you could pull one of them off I'm sure she wouldn't mind missing one
Think about it
Hey quile, wondering if your folks would be into seeing the swifts up at Chapman??  http://audubonportland.org/local-birding/swiftwatch
It is quite a spectacle yeah
Ah, congratulations!
Where did that land?
Significant
Woooow that looks pretty cool!
Nice find
Anything you can divulge?  ; )
Ah I see
Yeah that is sweet man!  What will you be doing?  Do you know yet?
Wow, holy crap!
That is a serious process
Seriously, congratulations
That is intense
Yeah looks like all good stuff
Yeah what happened there?
Weird, wonder what the hell the deal was?
Aha, that could be entirely it then
Ha!  Yeah this seems way better
In other news, I've gotten way back into 9 beet stretch: http://www.park.nl/park_cms/public/index.php?thisarticle=118
I think I listened to it for about 4 months straight
Then it kind of phased out
Yesterday I remembered it again and it is all I've been listening to
It may be almost the perfect thing
Hahaha yeah it is not for everyone
something about it though
I feel like I am actually experiencing time slowed down
I saw that one!
Freaking harp concerto???
WTH is that
Love all Ginastera though
His first piano sonata is still one of my favorite things to play
I spent a whole quarter learning it in college
Nothing like it really
So crazy
Whoa... that is impressive
That makes me three!
Two
Ginastera is 0
Yeah, Erdös is zero
You are zero steps away from yourself
Hey quile, just heard about your friend.  So sorry : (
333
I have seen many sonnets, but never a useful one
Probably would be kind of creepy
quile:  We are going to see the swifts tomorrow night if you and your parents and family and loved ones would like to join!
justin_smith:  You are invited as well
quile:  How long are the folks in town?
3333
333333
3333
33333
 333333
Hahaha did I miss crushing apocalyptic cheese?
33333
Having a rough day??
Hey quile!
How goes man?
How is the new job?
Hell yeah
YOU RELAX DOGDOG
So you are working on the app right now... java?
Or is this also scala?
Okay, that makes sense
Yeah I actually really love the first part of a new job when you are immersed in all this new information and trying to make sense of everything
piecing everything together
Cool man!  Good to hear it is working out so far
Without a doubt.  I am out of town Wed-Sun next week
So Mon or Tues sounds good
Yep
quile:  Yeah, what time on Monday?
Just the kind of thing the hivemind would say
33333
333
3333
quile: Ah yeah! Man that was a good one
I ranted for over and hour and a half
I checked in to make sure everyone was okay... they wanted to see more code!
Yeeeahh!!
Awesome
How is the scala going??
I was thinking about messing with it actually
Yeah, there really is nothing like it
I am curious though, apparently you can write haskell in it, which would be cool
I mean, do you feel like functional programming is plausible?
Like, practical?
Haha : (
Ha, yeah not really
but I have been curious
Good to try other things from time to time
33333
Man, the story of my life
3333
Wow, a new entry on my "list of things to avoid"
I feel like we are getting a nice breadth of words in here
quile: Yeah man, time to hang out!
Ah! What is happening with Oregon symphony on Saturday?
Right quile: justin_smith found a pretty awesome mongolian place near here
justin_smith: Yeah I have it!
enjoying your three word poems
I am actually trying to use twitter now and I see all of your poems in my feed dogdog
"we can kill you used"
Indeed
Oh man, it was amazing
It was the same quartet who did the Shostakovich 3 years ago
Those guys have unbelievable mastery of texture and emotion
They really got the spirit of the pieces
Yeah man! Well, too bad Jodi bailed on me Tuesday morning or I could have given you more notice ; )
I really have a new appreciation of the Bartok quartets now
quile: Either way, let's get lunch soon!
Like, tomorrow or next week
Love mirakutei!
Let's do that
Congrats on the new building!
quile: Ah right, that is the plan! Though I may be pushing it out actually... still trying to figure some things out and hitting up against Chinese New Year
Ha, no they are making the game
Chinese people
So, getting quotes on manufacturing and shipping is all up in the air
And I have been changing things on the fly here
Just got all the 3d pieces from the new sculptor guy... today!
Yeah, they are badass!
But now I need quotes for them
Ah yeah! Glad to hear
Yeah it is getting really cool
I'm not sure I feel comfortable launching the campaign though until everything is dialed
I have been wrestling with this the last couple of days
Also: I know waaaaaaaaaaay too much about shipping now
International freight is a world unto itself
Yeah, definitely not doing it to cash in
we would basically be breaking even
Yeah that guy! I think they are actually prosecuting him
First kickstarter to be federally prosecuted
So yeah, I just want to make sure everything is tight
Would be mildly embarrassing to change it now that we've made the announcement... but maybe not as embarrassing as not having everything together and screwing up the campaign
: P
It is crazy man!
Basically just trying to stay level headed and not freak out : )
Thanks!
Yeah, much appreciated
Oh yeah? That is good news
Have you told them about it yet?
That is awesome
How often are you down there?
Have you gotten to play anything with them yet?
Haha, sounds cool?
Colors are cool
rainbows too
justin_smith: quile: Lunch today? Tomorrow?
Okay, Wednesday it is!
: )
333
quile: justin_smith: Lunch today?
I am moderately healed
No worries!
It was delicious ; )
quile: Yo!
Whoa, where is this?
Food is also a number
Which reminds me, happy birthday! (yesterday)
Sorry I missed out on tabla
Ah, well then. Still sorry I missed out ; )
You guys want to get lunch today?
justin_smith: Ha! Yeah I no longer have to answer your questions .....
justin_smith: Condor is using parallel queries? in a way
It should be using pmap
with the thread pool
Hmm.... all of phoenix uses parallel queries if you send in a comma separated list and a "par" parameter
quile: It is hard to talk without numbers!
Apparently quantities play a significant role in our lives
justin_smith: It usually uses "par".....
What call is not using par?
It splits them into groups of 100 at once... that is a parameter you can change if you think it is not sending enough at once
I believe it was 100 because of url length limitations
but if you turn it into a POST you could send way more
Sure
quile: You down for lunch?
quile: Ah! sounds serious
; )
quile: I have news I have been waiting to see you in person for... but I assume justin_smith has already spilled the beans so to speak
Ah! Well let's talk about it in person : )  But I got a new job
Yeah, that is why Smitho is asking me work questions
I am going to be working in the computational biology department at OHSU!
which you set up for me all that time ago
It has taken over a year to set up of course
but yeah, super stoked
So thank again
Right!
So let's go to lunch soon
The only bummer is I won't be working with Smitho (for now...)
Yeah, he introduced me to Margolin, who passed me on to Spellman and then back to Margolin ultimately
So yeah, Spencer was the connect
which means you were the connect, so thank you!
justin_smith: Also, because that pmap is going through a thread pool, you can limit the number of queries by reducing the number of threads in that pool as well. I believe there is even an environment variable for it
Hahaha GOOD! That thing is comfortable
justin_smith: There is a threadpool just for calls to phoenix
so probably, if the load balancer is getting overwhelmed, that number is too high!
justin_smith: I still need to take a shower and then get out somewhere, probably not at a place until 1:00
still down for lunch?
Ha! I think it is the word down
It doesn't get quotes
justin_smith: How about Thai Peacock at 1pm?
3333
justin_smith: Hey man!
How goes
Taken awhile to settle down here, but it is starting to come together
Wow, wtf diet is that??
1200 calories... what does that translate into then?
Are you super pissed all the time?
Or feel starving/lightheaded/dizzy/distracted/unfocused/in pain?
So what is a daily regime then? What do you eat?
Interesting.......
I'm into animalistic states
So at some point, once you have reached a weight you are happy with, how many calories a day will you eat?
What number of calories creates a balance?
Right. In the end, if you are losing weight you will feel hungry
That does simplify the issue
33333
justin_smith: Coming along! Finally getting settled down here
Learning a lot of new concepts/jargon/code
Learning a lot about genomics
How are things back at the 'Bird?
Ha! Well, good to have that stuff done I guess
so people can pay you
3333
Amen
I have never met a rhubarb that is not malformed
33333
Yoyo
Yeah! Lunch thing
Maybe tomorrow or Thursday?
quile ever come around here any more?
Let's do Thursday
Yes I can
quile! What's up man
I'm back in cyberspace
I have never had a problem with cider : )
That is amazing to me... what was your issue with it?
3333333
33333
I wouldn't drink that if I were you
Wow
Watch your step!
Oh yeah? Who were those guys again?
Ah, so was that vacation? Or did you meet up with them on a work trip?
Whoa!
Who got married?
That is awesome. Good reason for weddings then
(seriously quile, cheer up)
33333333
Basically identical
justin_smith: Yep!
quile: Want to join us?
We haven't decided yet
Probably the mongolian grill, that place is awesome
3rd and ... Yamhill?
quile: http://www.yelp.com/biz/stir-fresh-mongolian-grill-and-hot-pot-portland-2
It is uber
über
33333333
Yeah his humor module is a little primitive
Dogdog, knock knock
Ha, that would be cool
Actually that is a pretty good interview question: "What feature would you add to our IRC bot?"
quile: if you do a pull
He only knows four right now
But easy to add in : )
Ah okay, well when you get a chance
It is pretty funny
justin_smith: Still down for lunch?
quile: Can you make it?
Got it, next time then!
justin_smith: I'll text you when I am a little closer, not sure how long it will take me to get there
Ha, me too
somehow that never works out
Oh really? Well she is welcome of course
Alright, I'll be there in probably 20 or 30 minutes
33333333
33333333
knock
Hahahaha worst joke ever dogdog
Uh oh
Hahahaha justin_smith: How do you find all these orb people? Or are there just that many out there?
Orb: the hidden cultural movement
It is a heroic task
Man dogdog, we are going to have to teach you some new jokes
Dogdog I am pretty sure you are not dependent on material sustenance
quile: Yes! But at least the framework is there...
He is infinitesmally funnier than he was before
3333333
That may be the worst one ever
Hey dogdog, hear any jokes lately?
Oh man that is bad
hahahaha
Amazing parallel I never realized
I heart you internet <3
333333333
3333333
Hahaha
You never know what might happen
Conjoined chins...
333333
So sad
It's okay quile, this too shall pass
That is cinematic
the pictures rise out of the music
justin_smith: That just makes the art exhibit that much cooler
If that was not intentional, it should have been
A strange being worships there
justin_smith: WTF... ubuntu on windows????
Something about that just fails to compute
It is so wholly inconsistent
Right, I guess that makes sense.... and is possible
Still, so weird
Just grafting one system on another inconsistent system
Well, glad to hear that at least
I see you have expanded his repertoire considerably ; )
justin_smith: That is sheer poetry
Brün would be proud
quile: Awesome! I have never heard his non-piano music
I think this was before his break
justin_smith: Sounds good. Yeah zookeeper is awesome
It is now a fundamental piece of software IMO
Classic example of "Do one thing extremely well"
Voodoo
Ha! No not at all
seems cleaner
Feel free to make any changes, I don't own that code ; )
Though I do appreciate it, it is my baby
333333
*nsfw
justin_smith: Yeah, interesting. I almost feel like they should be part of the clj-zookeeper library
It is a simple and straightforward layer of abstraction over the basic clj-zookeper interface
Although I suppose it may be out of scope there too
It makes sense to be its own repo, if you find yourself using it independently of ibis
That is usually the test
I mean, all those functions are how I want to use zookeeper from clojure
I feel like clj-zookeeper right now provides the basic calls and that's it
Yeah, that is the fuzziest part
but also it fails without it. I feel like clj-zookeeper is incomplete without handling the reconnect
since you will otherwise just get random unrecoverable exceptions
when using clj-zookeeper
Yeah I hear you
What else would they use besides an atom?
Yeah, maybe it should just be its own lib, since I can imagine people wanting to use the low level stuff in clj-zookeeper without the abstractions
Ha! Right
zoodirector
zoojure
33333
quile: justin_smith: You guys want to get some lunch soon?
How about ... tomorrow?
I have a thing at 1pm on Thursday, so... maybe not
3333333333
"Gremlin realized. The more he did so, the more ideas he created. The more ideas he created, the more they related. Into a concatenation of that which he accepted wholeheartedly and that which perhaps may ultimately come to be through concerted will, a world took form which was seemingly separate from his own realization of it. However, the world birthed could not bear its own weight without the logic Gremlin had come to accept —
 the logic of left is not right, up not down, and west far from east unless one goes the other way. Gremlin’s realization required Gremlin’s realization. Perhaps, the world is simply an idea that he once had..."
That is a serious introduction to a software package
Too bad they called it TinkerPop
!
Well quile, orange you??
Don't just leave him out there
Oh man, they really are
Hahahha
quile: Ah right! Bummed I am missing it
My dad is in town
which is cool in its own way
maybe not as cool as Murray Perahia
Some deep magick going on here
Hahahaha
It is uncanny
quile: justin_smith: Well, how about lunch next week then?
Tuesday?
3333333
Ha! Well, Amie is a rockstar, we just helped her out
Haha up to you man!
Max told me you already lured one of his Idealist people away ; )
Dustin... no
What the hell was that guy's name
I met him a couple times
Ah, oh was talking to quile
Will prefix with name: in the future : )
Apparently premise hired one of his old friends from idealist
At least, so goes word on the street
I told Jodi that I made a service for finding Gene Synonyms yesterday (since every gene has from 5 to 30 different names...)
Today she sends me this: http://i.imgur.com/Y3LF1zl.jpg
Hahaha that is great! Now that is the moby dick I want to read
Which is, by the way, entirely deserving of its reputation
Truly a great book
Usually I am skeptical of these "classics"
especially dickens
But moby dick is the real deal
That's the one
33333333
I have to say, I miss clojure, but I've been really enjoying scala
I basically ignore all of it but the functional stuff
having a type system is ... refreshing
Serious typing, never thought I'd get into it, but I am enjoying fitting everything together
and finding the virtue of compile time checks
Like haskell, if your program compiles, it is probably correct
Basically I am just trying to treat it like haskell, with some success so far
quile: What are the terrible ones do you think? My knowledge of the language is still very shallow
Haha oh man. I have heard intimations of "implicits"
I hope to avoid them entirely, though I'm sure I'm already using them
Yeah, Option[] was a big aha moment for me, I love it
Since NPEs are basically the entirety of runtime errors
Ah okay, I'll have to check it out, though I am already concerned
333333
Ah! How do they look?
Aaaaawwwweeeesome
I think I have CfML
Ha! Well, who needs LB then?
Definitely
Maybe you can incorporate some in then, or make suggestions for features then?
I have spearmans in there somewhere
I used it for something.....
What are the existing data science libs then?
I used weka for a bunch of that gates stuff
but that is a java lib
Hmm... I messed around with incanter but it was pretty heavy, and not really maintained. Unless they have resumed development on it?
It was trying to be R for clojure
Ooohhh tesser does look cool
Cool, I'll have to check that book out
Yeah, tesser looks rad
3333333
It is amazing
brings a tear to my eye-spheres
3333333
: P
even when you're surly
Ha whaat??
Don't we know it
quile: Thanks man! Crazy to see
I think people are really excited about it
quile: That rules man
justin_smith: Ah, good to hear
I will check it out
Yeah that crazy function, it looks way better
This looks good man!
I see what you mean, this zookeeper ns is almost generally useful
Always
quile: How are you doing man?
Long time no see
Yeah man! Let's do game night soooooooooon
justin_smith: Congrats on the patch!
Hahahaha
awesome
Have you seen it yet?
We should go
I could do tomorrow night maybe
justin_smith: Jodi and I are down for tomorrow at 6:45pm
Awesome, thanks for the heads up there!
Looks amazing
We got you a ticket ; )
justin_smith: I looked this up as well
So: no chilling for the Don Julio
Still: it needs to be drunk
drank
We will have to find an occasion for this
!
Hahaha oh man
That was fun guys, thanks for coming out
This is a classic IRC transcript
It's like you guys scripted it
but it actually happened
http://joelgrus.com/2016/05/23/fizz-buzz-in-tensorflow/
Always
Good suggestion
Followed
Wow, that is an amazing idea
You got a bass??
quile: No, haven't seen him! Thanks for the reminder though, I've been meaning to reach out to him
No, he is down in CLSB doing wetlab stuff, I am up on the hill doing research
I think we are in related departments
I still haven't figured out how all the departments relate to each other
There are a zillion of them with ambiguous distinctions
What does it do?
Dude, I encoded so many cryptograms in the trailing whitespace
RIP
Ah Acme:: ... it was a noble age
Fire is normal
what could be more natural?
Awesome
someday I'm going to iceland
Humans are clearly more important than every other living thing
Why do we even have other life forms on this planet?
Seems like a waste
All those things could be people
justin_smith: Aha, looks rad! Though I have rehearsal tonight
That is pretty interesting
Some highly constrained random music
333333333
Yeah, I love the bass
Have any recordings of stuff you are doing?
Phillip K A F O G D O G D O G D O G D O G D O is one of my favorite authors
quile: Thanks! That was a blast
I have had the Pärt ringing around my head all day
1 + 1 = 1
3333333
Finally found a name for my religion!
quile: I am a cardinal at least
Oh man
Nothing is real, not even butter
(just catching up here)
Yo! It was pretty fun, had a good crowd, played a lot of games, made a lot of barbecue, reversed a lot of entropy
How did your 4th end up?
justin_smith: You make it home alright?
Ah, sorry to hear that
Great to have you though, thanks for coming by
Sometimes we forsake the present for the future, sometimes the other way around
Oh yeah?
Hmmmmm
Ah, yeah?
I thought the web server had a thread pool
Although I guess that was some funny php code in the map server
So what about phoenix then?
Does that fail in the same way?
Interesting
I thought that webservers like httpkit were able to handle like 60000 requests a second or something
Right
So you are saying it is network throughput, not processing power
I guess I was mislead by you saying a "4 core" machine was the problem
Good to know
!
Yep, makes sense
&env - nice
Yeah that is awesome. Clojure: simplicity=beauty again
Indeeeeeeeeeeeeed
3333333
Good old ocaml
Well, show me a perfect language
Still need to dive in someday
Destructuring is so useful, I really miss that
That is insane..... so it transmits the local bindings along with the address?
3333333
quile justin_smith: Just got put in contact with someone just getting into code... she seems pretty promising! Either of you guys looking for code people? Or know anyone who is?
What are gadt?
quile: Funny, I am hesitant to send people there ; )
justin_smith: I am not familiar with them
What is the idea?
I thought we solved that with protocols ; )
But it seems like something you shouldn't have to do manually
Interesting, right
It seems if you fulfill some kind of interface and only call functions on arguments from their declared interfaces that should be sufficient
But I haven't really looked into it
Ah I see
interesting
No, no runtime errors!
It's true, I am already totally spoiled by the scala type system
Having no more null pointer exceptions is like a coding utopia
Right, well yeah
That is why the same principle applies as "javascript the good parts"
Yeah, just discovered case classes
They are awesome
quile: You hear about idealist??
Wow
Yeah that is pretty crazy news
Ah of course
Well, I bet he is glad he made the move eh? ; )
Yeah just talked to Max
Yeah, true!
Max was looking around anyway, now he gets a few months to work it out and spend time with his son
So... not so bad
Wait, what?
You did this?? : |
Well, I guess you must have had some influence in it
Ha!
Well, it looks like he finally agrees with you
Bastard
I think it was a fair deal
justin_smith: That's awesome! I thought all the memory came from holding the sentence graphs
How does it sound??
Haha sounds like fun
So, what beyond the header does it need to be a correct mp3 file?
I would assume if you get the header right you can have any arbitrary slew of bits follow..... that is not the case?
Ahhh
I see
Interesting, I didn't realize the format was so undocumented
Wacky
That is insane
quile: Yeah! I love that piece man
Now I want to start a tango band
3333333333
justin_smith: It is quite serene : )
With some good moments of tension....
I'm not sure you can call that d# though
Maybe, d# +/- some cents
This is fairly amazing and thorough: https://github.com/Droogans/unmaintainable-code
33333
A fascinating history of spoon flatulence throughout the world, human and otherwise
justin_smith: So... success?
Yeah that session thing is annoying
I thought I added that into zookeeper.clj
Ah, so a new session
Cool, let me know what you find
I still feel like the session reconnect should be part of the zookeeper library
Exactly the kind of thing you want to abstract over
Well right, but how many different ways do you really want to handle that?
And if anything you should pass in a function to handle it, and not have to build the machinery around watching for it and catching the exception on every request etc etc
Right, exactly
Then sure, expose the low level operation for when you really need it... but for the most part you want to reconnect and retry
True
justin_smith: Sure, coordination is lost. You can never get that lapse back. But this just pushes it back on to the application to figure out the coordination for that lapse, and avoiding that is the reason you are using zookeeper in the first place!
Yeah it is weird
It just feels incomplete
If the application has to worry about being coordinated *sometimes*, why doesn't the application just deal with it all the time and bypass zookeeper altogether, since it is already doing that work?
Yeah
I mean, kafka is awesome
I wouldn't mind using it for everything... but there are other ways I want to coordinate things sometimes
Maybe just one layer above zookeeper
I want the lib I thought zookeeper was : )
Of course
Has jepsen ever been run on jepsen I wonder?
Right
No, you can do things with distributed systems you can't do in a linear one
but that just makes it harder to emulate linear systems with a distributed one
Like doing things in a nondeterministic order?
For one ; )
I mean, I can imagine some synchronized system that only proceeds to the next step once it receives a message that the previous one is complete
But why would you necessarily want to?
The whole point of a distributed system is that you are not bound by linearity
Parallelism is by definition non-linear
Hmmm... not necessarily!
Linearity is beneficial in being predictable and amenable to reasoning, but that is about it
Just so that we can understand it ; )
Right, so it is beneficial for the developer, not necessarily the system
We have still never built anything as robust as a cell
That is our limitation really
We are just not smart enough ; )
True, which is unfortunate
Binary/logical/sequential thinking is a form of violence upon the interconnected nature of the world, in a way
but it is all we really know how to do
(for now)
Hahahahaha
justin_smith: Agreed
we have gone so far down that path, it is hard to imagine there might be another way
Would be an interesting project to make a nonlinear algebra that works even when statements are not sequential!
I might need to dive into some math, I feel like people must have worked on this before
He called you forth to spake truth
This is probably not what we are looking for: http://arxiv.org/pdf/hep-th/0609022.pdf
but interesting nonetheless
More like, non-sequential
I have not, will check it out
I feel like you should be on this list ; )
33333
Wandelweiser eh?
What is their deal?
So whenever you want to update him, maybe it will be a little more pleasant to have around
Or not
justin_smith: Awesome
Well, you certainly have enough material yeah?
Yeah exactly
but that is a good starting point
having a lot of things... then you can prune the best
It is droney... I wonder if for an album you want to go breadth and have every track be as different from each other as possible? Or go with a theme and curate the whole experience
Yeah, I agree. I like the album-as-unit... more of an overall story rather than a bunch of unrelated things
Awesome
How do you simulate a shitty network? Some kind of network fuzzing program?
justin_smith: Kafka question: I have a consumer group with many consumers... do they all need their own partition?
Or can they share one?
I am getting contradicting reports on this
Some say every consumer in the same consumer group needs its own partition, which seems weird to me
So what if I have 500 nodes and want to distribute messages to all of them... I need 500 partitions?
Okay, say I start with 100 nodes... so I have 100 partitions
Then I add 100
Right
Then I go and repartition the topic to have 200 partitions
Hmmmmm
So if the consumer doesn't specify a partition, it gets assigned by kafka?
I see
that makes more sense
So I don't need to claim partitions myself
If I have enough partitions for all the consumers, they will all get one
Right, it is all coming back to me
Thanks!
That is wacky
quile: WTF
Ahh, the second argument of parseInt is the base
and `map` adds the index as the second argument
So it is really passing two arguments to parseInt : P
ridiculous
Monday D
justin_smith: No worries at all
Glad someone is taking care of that guy
It was a pretty fun event though
quile: Great to have you by!
dogoooo
dogoD
quile: That is an awesome idea
He can be one of the Ark's AI computers
"He evolved from an IRC chatbot into a full fledged sentient AI"
Done
quile: Ah! My demo sets are all out right now....
I might have one back at that point though
Hit me up before you go
333333
Now that's a reducer I can get behind!
No true art lacks suffering
justin_smith: Haha, when it rains it pours
Enjoy it!
justin_smith: Yessir I did
Have not had a lot of time to watch movies lately, but when I do those will be the ones!
Have you gone through them yet?
Still can't wait to see Stalker... Roadside Picnic is one of my favorite books of all time
333333
333333333
justin_smith: So your weekend went well then?
That sounds intense!
Hahahaha
justin_smith: Ahh, are you going to anything?
For some reason I signed up for XOXO fest... yet I don't really want to go : |
I wonder if that means I'm getting old
Thanks quile
Really? Is it actually cool?
Haha
I mean, it will probably be fun
A lot of talking to people...
I would almost rather just jam out on the time travel game ; )
justin_smith: Ah no, I have a game design experiment about time travel I am working on
But that game is awesome also
What are you doing on distsys?
I have been doing devops for awhile now... so many servers and object store
Oh yeah?
maybe your kafka is clogged
Ah, that is bullshit
Fuck these dumb machines, I hate them
Bad behavior
It is probably thinking it is doing work
infinite loop maybe?
BTW, I will never stop anthropomorphizing computers
I love it when they think and care about stuff
so modest
It is always an accident
Intention is a great barrier to discovery
How much of my life have I spent importing data into databases?
Ha, what?
Haaaa no! Hadn't seen that one
Wow that music is awesome
Would love to hear a whole track of it... or did they just cherry pick the best stuff?
Yeah I just turned on five voices at once
starting to get cooll
Wow, that is a pretty amazing writeup
Way to take an idea all the way
Truly unfortunate condition
Octagon city collides with reality
Reality is not very friendly to Utopia, with its mosquitos, border ruffians and Thunderstorms
Ha, awesome! Are you designing it I assume?
Ah right, I just mean in terms of the noise part
Or, is the metal itself the instrument?
No electronics?
AI see
Cool!
How long do you think it will take to build?
Looking forward to hearing it ; )
Got it
Ha, literally JUST read that one
Dude, I want to hear that
Oh my
333333
I have seen that philosopher's game night
I think those people should make a game
Or maybe, I will make a game
33
Yo, awesome!
Where is the show?
Man, haven't seen that guy play in forever
Right right, the end of williams glory
Cool, I'll be there
What time?
Dude, sounds amazing
You guys have a name? ; )
So that is Thursday night then?
Followed
3333
a3333
Ha
Lurking code...
It is like the old zen koan: If broken code works, is it really wrong?
Nice!
Funny. There should be a name for that kind of queue vs stack error
That is really weird actually... I feel like that is the real bug
All collection operations on a queue should return a queue
Well, just saying it's not a bug doesn't make it not a bug ; )
I see the rationale, but in practice transforming collections out from under you is a bummer
Interesting
Right, I am saying that is an unfortunate choice
Man, how many times to I map over a map and have to turn it back into a map
I have been getting way into type signatures using scala... it makes a lot of sense to be able to declare what your arguments are and what they return
And using type parameters too
So you say "this takes an argument of type T (any type) and returns T"
So you don't know what it is necessarily, but you know it takes and returns the same thing
which is what would help here
Agreed, I am loving the type system the more I use it
It is a tradeoff of course
but having those guarantees is really helpful
You are in a state of always relearning ocaml : )
Some day I will take the plunge ther
*there
Vaguely... what did he do?
This is awesome
Yesterday I played the same fugue 18 times in a row
It was like a trance
My mind gets absorbed and I am not even a person anymore, just timeless patterns of tones and resonance
Then I am surprised when the song is over and I find myself with hands and features and stuff
I know! Clearly he gets it
A worthy goal
DOGD
DDDDDDDDDD
DDDD
Poor lib, victim of gravity
Hey quiile! Long time no see
Whoa, my i key is acting up
quile: Oh man! Brutal.... food poisoning is no joke
Oh no, I've triggering dogdog's joke subroutine
Ah!
Hmmm I don't know this one
Hahahahaha
Definitely
justin_smith: Yeah! Planning on going
Wait, are you telling me about a show before it happens??
This may be a first
Good to know
Anything going on before you?
Man! Restarted my computer a bit ago and forgot to fire up IRC
What did I miss?
quile: Yeah! I knew it....
justin_smith: Oh yeah! I haven't talked to you about the show
Hahahahaha
There's your numberwang quile
Dude
Okay, what kind of ensemble?
What is the plaaaaaaaaaaaaaan?
Sounds awesome
Has your group-without-a-name met again?
No I have not seen one
So it is played all through overtones I assume??
That is cool man
Living the dream : )
Of course
If you can just nail stuff down and actually do things you will be way ahead of most people ; )
That is wacky
Harpsichords... kind of cool, but lack *dynamics*
Alright, headed to Sasquatch tomorrow, see you guys next week!
333333
Yes
Hey, yeah! Link?
Nice
That is a good tone there
I can hear it ringing throughout the world
That is spectacular man
All in is the only way
It is like: this life is the only material we have to work with
What do you want to make out of it?
Clearly, you should be making music
Let me know when the next show/rehearsal/event is
justin_smith: All of these things! Though, cancer is turning out to be a tricky nut to crack ; )
We are in full swing production mode on the game
just got some physical proofs of our pieces.... they are badasss
A miracle
Learning a new fugue, from the second book
Haven't spent much time on the second book, it has mostly been the first book my whole life
There is one part where he starts the same theme twice as slow, while the original plays above
Then there is another one where it is upside down and in major
Then at the end, the theme overlays itself eight times, one on top of the other
Like how in the firework show they just start lighting everything off at once
justin_smith: I think given recent events, the time for the world to embrace harsh noise music has come
This is your time man!
Well, we can, but you have to go through 3 volumes of pain and suffering and strife before middle earth is saved
Whoaaaaaaaaaa : (
That is tragic, man
Don't worry quile, luckily this doesn't effect the rest of the world...........
quile: And I appreciated your election joke
quile: Jodi and I are looking at options
Yes!
Let's figure it out, I'm serious
I've always wanted to build a dome........
This is happening
Whoa, yeah!
Nice man
Are you getting any kind of payout on that?
Who is acquiring?
Aha, makes sense
When does the transition take place?
I see : )
So, has anything changed? New manager coming in and making everyone write PHP?
Tyrannical oversight?
Wow, what office? Where are you now?
Ah, good spot!
Crazy man
Congratulations??
Good news
Hahahaha yeah, that was always kind of a weak point at old OB
*LB
Hahahaa yeah!
Snacks are key
3333333
3333333333
33333333
quile: Why implicits. Why??
: (((((((
Seems.... batshit
Finally having to reckon with and understand them now
and it is insane
Yeah I have avoided them until now
but a feature I am working on now kind of demands them (bunch of type level fuckery with HLists and shapeless)
I mean, I am getting into all the cool type level things you can do now
Did you see the guy who implemented the lambda calculus in the scala type system?
If you wanted to calculate l-values during compile time........
33333333
justin_smith: Crazy!
How does it sound?
How does it play?
Awesome
Man, let's play some music!
...... next week
What is up with the group? (Annie and Stephanie (?))
What does Kyle do?
Ah
Awesome
Sounds interesting... I am a big fan of the harmonic series
Worst case data mutation... that sounds bad
Ahhh that makes sense
Always wondered why
Everything is a tradeoff
Yeah, blowing up the universe is satisfying, but then you miss out on all of existence
quile: Ha! Yeah... so someone already did that
Well, I guess we enjoy the show then
Actually, we are kind of part of the show
We are the edge of an exploding universe!
L
O
L
Hey quile: you know the answer to this one? http://stackoverflow.com/questions/40754229/scala-gremlin-scala-hlists-poly2-rightfold-and-a-missing-implicit-prepend
Current scala fuckup I am trying to figure out
That's me man! This is my life!
quile: No worries at all, I more shared it because after I spent an hour typing it up I reflected on how utterly batshit it is
and wanted to share
I have been getting into HList and shapeless... it is kind of necessary to do this feature I want to do
and I have been learning a ton of stuff about the type system
But also: it is maddening these opaque errors
Of course, I would have been done long ago in Clojure.........
Yeah, entirely
I am starting to understand why they use implicits... it is a way to pass arguments on the type-level
All part of this type-level programming
Still, I hate implicit crap
Basically they have hacked a bunch of haskell concepts (like type classes) into the scala type system with this convention of sealed traits, implicits and type parameters
In a way it is cool.... in a way it is horrible
Like: I should just be using haskell where this stuff is native, instead of whatever weird conventions they have to use in scala to get the same behavior
It reminds me of the acrobatics people do to get a package manager in javascript or something
Hackhackhack.... something resembles a package manager
but it will still never compare to a language environment with a real package manager
Man, seriously
One more case supporting the benevolent dictator model....
Now I want to go to Singapore
Whoa!
I did : (
She lived a long good life, and created many amazing things
May we all be so fortunate
justin_smith: Yeah, I was into a Deep Listening phase at some point
It really is pretty amazing
What is this device you are talking about?
Ahhh I haven't seen this
Interesting
That sounds awesome, I'll check that out
I miss C++ from time to time : )
Nice
Or you could write directly in C++
But probably screw something up
Usually when they are generating code, there is a reason
Yeah that is probably a big part of what the code generator is up to
Hmmm.... where would a memory leak be coming from? Probably in the markov graph of tokens/parts of speech
In other news, I just used the phrase "monadic coproduct" in a sentence and totally meant it
I am worried for my psyche
I know! I feel this transformation taking place... like a werewolf. This is how people become category goons!
I just want to recast everything in categorical terms... my tea, the fountain outside
It is sinister
Soon I won't even write programs, just lattices of types that never evaluate to anything
justin_smith: Would love to hear that
What category theory book?
Also yes: going to the OBR show tomorrow
see you there!
And yes, I feel some measure of resentment
Though: it is very small
Really I blame myself. If I hadn't taken this long detour down the world of programming I could commit my life to making music and maybe be worthy of being in that orchestra
But probably not
That
is rad
33333333
AKA computer
Hey man! Haven't eaten yet so screwed up my schedule... getting food soon so probably won't be going to dinner
Also, I was planning on going late if there are other bands playing
Or are there?
The original is great too ; )
Dude, hobos don't play viola at bus stops
Funny to see those olywa guys again
Jodi and Annie have a pretty amazing therapist who might help you out
I have seen her as well, she is a pretty great lady
333333
quile: Message.... ah, right!
Yes I did, sorry I got it then something happened, forgot to respond
I have two tickets for tonight!
Can't wait, looks amazing
quile: I will come prepared
justin_smith: Sounds badass!
Brandon's ghost haunts many places...
HAhahah that's fucked up
quile: HOLY SHIT
That was an insane spectacle
And yeah, glad I sat in the balcony!!
Whoa
Also, was super high
Which helped I think ; )
So thanks for that advice
I was kind of in awe the whole time
Have you found the best recording yet?
justin_smith: I want to tell you you didn't miss anything, but you totally did
Sorry
It seemed like these people were a kind of traveling show?
The pianist and the whatever the hell that instrument is?
Ahem
Lots
"No solid reality"
"Only walls made of fluid"
: (
That thing was amazing
It was like a pre-digital synthesizer
Funny how different things were coming out of the different speakers
It seemed so *versatile*
But they patented it ... are there any being made nowadays?
Or is it some musical dinosaur?
33333
Whoa
justin_smith: Awesome! I'll check it out
Classloaders... gnarly
3333333
Yeah! Always meant to do that
Well, that equation is formulated as a delta, so it should be possible
Ah wait, I was thinking of modularity
Any performance improvements?
That is awesome
incremental betweenness hmmm... so you would have to check to see if the new node creates any new shortest paths
I mean, the algorithm is trivially parallelizable, you can compute each node separately
But it depends on the structure of the entire network, since it tracks all shortest paths through that node
I'm not sure how you could get away from computing each shortest path again just thinking about it
but there might be a way
Nice, link?
justin_smith: Hey man!
How goes over there?
That sound awesome
I have been thinking a lot about audio programming again, mostly generating compositions
This idea... I just need to take a year off and do this thing
Nice!
Sounds like my kind of new years party
OH yeah?
Definitely interested, I love that place
Haaaaaaaa
!
Dude, that sounds amazing
Okay, I'll have to check that out
: )
Yes definitely
Are you saying Highrise was not explicitly feminist?
Whatever that movie was awesome
Alright well don't give away the whole thing
I love it, thanks for the lead!
Cool, so you will be by on Friday then?
We can work through the Don Julio then : )
Yeah totally
I have been doing way too much stuff and am ready to scale back into hermitage mode again
DOG
Ha
Even you yes
Wow, what do you do with a torn rotator cuff?
Is there some kind of treatment for that?
We are such fragile animals
333333
Hey justin_smith: Funny jvm question you may know
I have an uberjar and I can run some main class in it like so `java -cp ubercode.jar path.to.MainClass`
But if the main class is in a dependency (from a library) it fails to find it with `Could not find or load main class path.to.MainClass`
How do I run a main class that lives in a dependency? Or am I doing something else wrong?
Seems weird
Aha, just realized that.... the dependency was not included in the uberjar
Total PEBKAC
It was one of those things where I could almost smell the PEBKAC
I knew it was PEBKAC, but not how
Awesome!
Should be fun
You have the day off?
Nice
I took all my vacation in November, so I am working this week
I think this is the first time I've worked in the week between xmas and ny since I got a real job
It is kind of cool actually, no one is here!
Man, just found out Raynes passed away :, (
Tragedy
Kind of weird when internet fixtures disappear like that
For some reason I assume all the weird characters on IRC do not share normal human mortality
Oh yeah? Always interested in that
Not sure I follow
Ah, I see
Right, that makes sense.
It sounds like something that should be configurable then
Classic "introduce a layer of indirection"
I guess the trick is identifying where that needs to happen
Right, I can see that. Similar to the principle of least power
which for some reason I have to constantly educate people about
Everyone here is always adding javascript interpreters into data-based configurations
Power is good! But messy
It is that old adage of power: great power is knowing when to withhold it
or something like that
No, power is pretty cool. Nietzsche told me so
justin_smith: I will give that a shot!
Current status: yaml configuration with random js code in them!
I have held it out of my project so far, but it is too late for things established before I got here
I feel like it is a kind of laziness
"We don't know how/don't want to implement the functionality that would take the data from this config and generate the behavior we want during processing, so we are going to shift that burden onto the configuration author and have them write code to do things our system should really be doing"
Nice!
Then run it over every jar in clojars and give them a ranking
That makes sense yeah
Cool, thanks for sharing!
I am going to print out that principle of least power quote and hang it on my wall
Hahaha a great service to humanity that
I'll come back to clojure one day. It has been fun learning scala and all the type astronaut stuff.... but really the difference is either being effective or learning a lot
I love learning stuff, but sometimes I just want to get things done and not spend three weeks learning about free monads
Does this make scala > clojure on the Blub scale?
I feel like I've heard people say similar things but replace "scala" with "clojure" and "clojure" with "ruby"
Really though I feel like scala is just half-assing it and I should really be writing in Haskell or ML
If only they had the JVM
At this point the main dependency of the project is the tinkerpop api
which is pretty a pretty badass interface actually
I just swapped out our backend graphdb and didn't have to change any code
I love it when design principles work
A lot of people are getting into Go though... looks cool really
Have you messed around with it?
It is like C plus asynchronous channels
I want a language with Clojure's native immutable types and concurrency primitives, Go's channels, Haskell/ML's type system and R's native vector/matrix operations, plus native graph operations
Then I would have the perfect language
Looks like I should get started on that
Oh, and it would be homoiconic
Oh yeah?
Alright, I'm downloading it right now
That sounds pretty badass
I like the binary tree implementation on the home page : )
That sounds like the way to do it, awesome
Native graph operations?
Dude, this dream of a `list : graph :: clojure : omniuberlanguage` is still alive in my mind
Awesome
Maybe I will write this language in ocaml
Oh interesting, hg and darcs!
That's how you can tell the language was invented before 2010
Oh my
: (
GIL is why I can get away with dismissing python
but that is more because I don't want to use python
Which is for the best anyway
jinx
You mean leaner than this 200MB jar I just compiled?
How is that possible
Yes oh my
That is a conservative estimate for the http libs btw
Which reminds me: there should be some formalization of dependency management
so that every new language doesn't have to reinvent it from scratch and screw it up in some (multiple) unique ways
Yes
Always always always it is some menagerie that grew organically into a bad pattern that now can't be extracted without destroying everything
A blight upon every development environment
Someone must have done a formalization for this
It is in some paper somewhere someone has solved this problem
but no one reads it
When I write omniuberlanguage I will find this paper and implement it
Followed
3333
Oh yeah?? How did the show go?
Congrats! That sounds awesome
I might be interested in that yeah
Right, the nice warm fuzzy sound
Nice!
Sounds like a solid approach
Yeah, csound is so cool, but it is an audio driver first and programming language second (or third, or fifth or whatever)
Sounds cool man, I am interested in that
333333333
Too late
Already working on my master torture cheese formula.......
Okay all set. Now taking over the world
Long time no see
Hey quile! Welcome back man
That seemed like a hell of a trip (from all the digital signatures it left behind)
No worries at all! Totally jealous you were hanging out on the mother island
Ha yeah, I can imagine
Recovering now?
Ha! Yeah good time to get back
Well, at least you made it
That was out of control
There is still snow everywhere
Basically it was a long soul searching journey into my inner depths... and lots of fugues
Also, saw Alban Berg do the Dutilleux Whole Distant World cello concerto
justin_smith: Awesome! Checking it out now....
quile: Can't you tell? The greatness is exuding out of trees like syrup. The air is basically drugs now
That is awesome
333333
3333
Always a good thing to ensure dogodg
You wouldn't want to release anything into the wild that wasn't broken
Wow, wTF
Wait, is someone still using caribou?
Sounds dramatic
Now THAT is sinister
Hahaha I think smitho got to that one first
Adjusting him for the current political climate?
It is true
He could weight them based on current events searches
Oh man, I think you went too far there
Haha
quile: Is this a cathartic process?
Awesome about the symphony! Just saw Kodo last night
I guess its not really the symphony, but it was in the Schnitz
It was pretty amazing man
If you get a chance, it was truly spectacular
Just the sheer athleticism of banging on those giant drums, whoa
I would join you this Saturday but we have tickets for some other event
quile: Hey, great to see you on Monday!
Thanks for coming out
Just learned another fugue last night, XXII in B♭ minor (book 1)
Well, I've been learning it for a couple weeks, first time I played it through from memory last night
It does something to my mind
I wander around the rest of the day with a fugue simmering behind all of my thoughts
Yeah!
It is going on right now
That may be true
I have developed this new perspective on them, I see each one as a kind of transformation
Like, the initial theme is where the spirit begins
Then it travels through all of these different forms and circumstances, being continually altered and forged
Until the final ending the theme is resounding but in a new context
The theme recurs, but it is forever changed
While learning them I can feel my spirit being reforged. It is beyond music.
What the hell? How did he do that?
Just got my ticket for Clojurewest 2017 : )
You guys going?
Coooooooooool
Dude, that is my general thought process
Happy birthday!
These are amazing
I want to live in the Avian Crouton Multiverse
Ah, we finally know the identity of the simulators!
Yes, I fear to enter that chamber
But I must
Ha!
I will start integrating it into day to day usage
Alban Berg biography would SLAY at hollywood
Maybe they could make it a musical?
333333
Oh yeah?
Ah! Good to know. Somehow I thought that was how it already worked (retrying rate-limited results)
What??
Could be... so you don't know for certain?
Funny man! Love to solve that, though it is really weird
That does sound like fun
Glad to hear it is still enjoyable! I was worried after the acquisition
they would try to make you rewrite everything in PHP or something
Maybe F# is cool?
Everything is relative
So as harmonically distant as possible, at least
Coding with harmonies is the future
??? You should always be able to install xcode
Either way, checking out Planck now!
justin_smith: Ah, well true
Are you avoiding upgrading just to stick it to the man?
Ha!
Man, you should see my Yak gallery
Just last night I decorated three more yaks
I love yaks
If it weren't for yaks we would all still be clubbing eachother with splintery branches
So wait, should I not be reinstalling all my emacs packages from scratch right now?
Too late
Dude, planck rules!
Ha yeah, but having fast cljy scripting is awesome
No such namespace
So, apparently they are still working on it
There seems to be: http://planck-repl.org/dependencies.html
333333
That sounds super fun
Sport of the future
333333
33333333
I wrote some planck this weekend as well! It is now my go to scripting language
Haven't had to do that yet
Ah I see... no incremental output?
Probably because they don't have real system access in there
Ah, well in that case it shouldn't be *too* hard
I just mean evaluation is probably happening in a sandbox environment or something
Right, but can you do any system access at all? ls? pwd?
execute subprocess?
Ahhhh I see. That is inverted from what I was thinking you were saying
Yeah, it is still in its infancy
That is the problem, making a prototype that proves the concept is easy, making a real system takes years
All because of countless dumb details like you speak of
I thought you were telling me that when you run a planck script, you can't see any output until it is complete
which would be a much more serious limitation
Communication is hard. You never really know what people think the words they are saying mean
That is badass
Man, is that crazy work on the fretboard to add those extra steps?
I thought fifths was okay on the cello because of how much shorter the fretboard is
(even though they don't have frets.... what the hell is that word again?)
(neck?)
True
No, classical bass is in fourths
Okay, I played a bunch of bass in school and it was always fourths, at least
Ah okay
Didn't know that!
Hahaha the only way to watch romcoms
Actually, I wonder how entertaining you could really make a romcom just by supplying an alternate soundtrack
Lots of booze would be necessary
Still rather watch Tarkovsky though
Ha! Rad
I always meant to do that as well ; )
Once I got some time to learn enough java to do that right
He didn't fix one of the main things I wanted to fix though.... the damn key should be a Comparable or something, not a number
What if I want my keys to be keywords? Or strings?
600% though, that is pretty good
33333333
Well that would explain everything
justin_smith: Ah interesting, I'll check that out
Right now I don't need libraries really, just happy to be able to process data etc
but that will come up at some point
Well, I suppose something needs to run the macros
Right, macros man
Maybe someday I will have a revelation and embrace them into my heart
Right now I just value simplicity too much to mess around with rewriting my source code
That is a sign I believe
Maybe.... that sounds awesome
Followed
Given a md5 hash, can you generate a list of all possible strings that hash to that value?
Well, you could iterate through every possible string and hash each one and create a kind of reverse lookup table
No way. Smartest answer
That is how I code everything: start with a generate-every-string-generator, then cast my program as a fold across this list
Or the list the thing it generates generates that is
3333333
Hahaha that seems like it would be very satisfying
Something about pushing things down the potential energy well
That is a virtuous quality for sure
Too bad the viola is so destructive : (
Could it be redesigned? I feel like these instruments need some modern ergonomics updates
Mappings are cool man, embrace mappings into your heart
It might need a translation into something more concrete
justin_smith: Just create a mapping in your mind between mapping and "overlay", or something
I mean, that is kind of true
"Use alexander technique to map alexander technique onto the applications of alexander technique!"
Cool, good to know
I'll check that out
Hey so how fucked are YOU guys that s3 is down?
Has LB just ground to a halt?
So, would you consider that an obstacle in delivering service to your customers then?
Hahahahaaaaa
Sorry, couldn't help it
It is kind of awesome, a good reminder of how much we rely on other people's infrastructure
Well, they probably will be after this ; )
Dude, best way to be out of a job ever
Don't worry, soon I will start protecting and hiding cancer to ensure I continue to always have a job, as role-modeled by every for-profit industry ever
360 indeed dogdog
Do either of you understand react?
Trying to figure out this one: https://github.com/bmeg/webpack-react-test
quile: Does my reproducible example make sense to you?
Do you use webpack also?
justin_smith: Thinking about switching, might be able to make the case after this one : )
quile: Oh yeah??
No refs?
Okay...... what if I want to refer to one of the elements in the component? Just select by id?
What is the idea behind that?
(behind never using refs that is)
Well, the example is the dumbest thing ever
it is just a lib package with a component with a ref
Then an app package that imports the lib package
I intentionally pared it down to isolate the problem
quile: Okay, so you are saying you never access any elements in your component?
Crazy, I guess I can see the motivation behind that
Everything should flow from state then?
Okay, so maybe it is my use case then
I am using things like d3 and cytoscape and plotly etc
and trying to wrap them in react.... which as I say it maybe that is also some kind of react sin?
justin_smith: Right, that is what I do
Basically something like cytoscape binds to an element, so I have to refer to that element to get a reference to cytoscape I can use to draw with
Okay, funny
So why do they have refs then?
Here I'll link the actual component
https://github.com/bmeg/ceto/blob/master/src/js/ceto/components/schema.jsx
Tell me how horrible this code is
quile: Do you use any third party libs, or is it all straight ahead DOM UI stuff?
Setting the ref: https://github.com/bmeg/ceto/blob/master/src/js/ceto/components/schema.jsx#L131
Calling the ref: https://github.com/bmeg/ceto/blob/master/src/js/ceto/components/schema.jsx#L41
Better way to do that?
Okay, so you bypass refs by accessing the element through some DOM access
I thought refs were preferred over `document.getElementById....` or whatever
but I guess I am wrong about that!
justin_smith: I think the benefit of a ref would be that you don't have to do a selector.... the element doesn't have to have a class or an id and you can still access it from your component
quile: Okay, so don't use refs is the answer!
Gooooooooooooood to know
quile: Cool, I'll try that
What specific purpose is that?
Yeah I think the issue is that I am using these non-react based libraries and trying to get them to work with react
quile: Ahhhh that is a helpful distinction
So ref means: reference to actual dom node
Did you check out the actual code I linked above? The one with the real cytoscape component, not the test component
Basically I am trying to put together a slapdash viz library using react, maybe I need to just create all these visualizations from scratch out of svg nodes so I can use react how god intended?
quile justin_smith: Well, this was illuminating. Thanks for the help!
Dumb js h#$^*#$!&@(
On it
Sounds rough
3333
How are things around here? Just got back from a retreat at the coast
Ah man, bummer
Ah, that is a super bad time for it to be then!
That is a recipe for one dejected parakeet
Surely parakeet you can find purpose elsewhere in life?
Hahaha is that not how you spell it?
Don't do it
Oh quile, BTW, turns out my webpack issue was that it was including two versions of react
Well, here is the deal: when I package my lib, webpack packages react as well (because it is a dependency)
So, you download the lib as a dependency
and in its list of dependencies it finds react
so downloads it and adds it to the project
WTF???
What kind of harpyshit is this?
How am I supposed to do dependencies then??
Like, how do I make a JS library in this backwards medieval age we live in, if declaring a dependency then imports it at every point along the dependency chain?
Sorry that sentence took awhile to type
So, you just don't include dependencies in libraries, just declare them?
It should yeah!
That seems like the sane way to do things.....
But how could they be incompatible if they literally come from the same dep declaration?
The lib declares the dep on react
app declares dep on lib
says nothing at all about react
Yeah
I have a repository that reproduces the issue in the simplest terms I could find: https://github.com/bmeg/webpack-react-test
No, haven't heard of that one
Oh okay, do you guys use webpack then?
justin_smith: Yeah, so you can reference elements internal to your component
Yeah it seems useful for interacting with blob-of-state js libs
from react
quile: Check out that repo then, it does the simplest thing with react and webpack and fails on the refs (because two versions of react are in the project)
Currently trying to figure out what the hell to do there
I'll check out Lerna
At the moment extremely annoyed by webpack's model of dependencies if all this is true
Yeah, it does look relevant
This ecosystem is a total disaster
Also, trying to look for any help on google is like trying to separate out different lineages from an archaeological dig.... most of the information is already out of date, and the stuff that works is hacky and experimental
So weird
Whoa, what is greenfield?
Oh, hmmm. That is just for building
Yeah, I did that so that app can depend on lib in the same repo
quile: How could I do that instead then? It has the same problem when I `npm publish` it then `npm install` it in the app
Sure
Right, but the lib package has been compiled with webpack, so I assume it has a webpackified version of react in there
What, packaging the lib with webpack?
Right, that is what I'm starting to figure out
But then how do I use webpack for libraries then?
So you can only use webpack at the end of the process then?
Webpack cannot depend on webpack compiled libs then
Wow, that is super unclear
I don't think I've actually read that anywhere
Okay
So how do I run the lib on its own then, if I can't include the deps?
To test it etc
Yeah, so include all the deps in the old way of script tags in the headers or whatnot?
This is all so bizarre, I guess my expectations of what a package/dependency manager are do not align with what is happening here
I am expecting it to behave in a certain way, but really that way does not exist in JS
Ah okay
I see
justin_smith: Where is the movie? I have a call with my brother tonight, but if he bails I may wander out there
justin_smith: Definitely thinking about dehydrating myself to skip the next few years
Hey quile!
Well, if by sorted it out you mean moved all of my components into a single file then yes
You were correct btw
I was trying to use webpack as a package manager
but really it is a final step once everything is complete
The thing I don't understand right now is how to release a regular npm package that I can pull into another project
Right that is what I want to do
Yeah, I have looked into that
Right now we just have a lib and an app, but it could still be useful to apply
Right! So what I don't understand now is how to release a regular JS module
As in, how do I package a js project so that it can be pulled in as a dependency on another project?
There are two sides: how do I package it, then how do I call it from another project
and it has been devilish to attempt to figure this out, because each time it doesn't work I'm like "wait, did I package it wrong, or am I just trying to call it wrong?"
Anyway, it is kind of a nightmare so I punted on it to get other things done
Truly man, I can say as someone trying to get into the modern JS tooling, it is a freaking disaster to figure out
quile: Yeah? Do you want to have a session on it at some point?
I could really use some insight on it. I am stumbling in the dark really
Aha, good to know
So, is the problem I am trying to make a web library but using npm for it?
Still don't really know what the problem is
so weird
Ah
Okay, that might be my problem too. I don't know what is expected in writing a node lib
There seem to be a lot of unspoken assumptions (or spoken 18 different ways assumptions)
Right, I guess I am saying I don't know how to build a node module then
I thought I did
but then it doesn't work
I am sorry too justin_smith
Anyhow, yeah! Let's have a session on it, that would be rad
Well, I suppose that requires you having some time at some point ; )
This weekend open at all? I am going to a planned parenthood fundraiser Saturday night, otherwise mostly open
Might be having some people over for games tomorrow night actually
quile: Anyhow, thanks for offering. I got to a certain point where I imported my unwebpackified library and then none of my components could find their dependencies
And I just started laughing
for a really long time
I think it is the sign of a mental breakdown
Sunday would be rad!
Yeah! Thank justin_smith
*
*s
Whoa s key not totally working this morning
Woooooo!
WTF monday
justin_smith: Awesome! Congratulatons
If you have a commission then you are a real composer now, that is the test
Still though
Hahahahaha well joke's on that guy, I have a job!
Hahaha I knew it was coming and it was still funny
Yeah I saw : )
So apparently functional programming is okay again?
Happy Pi everyone
Today we get to appreciate the timelessness of universal truths
and the inanity of homonyms
We should though!
Totally celebrating e day
so, April 12th
One day February is just going to keep going and going...
When time becomes exponential, february 71st will just come out of nowhere
That is an awesome idea and the first executive order I will sign when I get into office
The next will be to abolish dates and rewrite all history books in terms of seconds since epoch
Who knew the secret to fixing zookeeper was hidden in the zookeeper namespace all along!
Not dating an occordionist
Never dated an accordionist as far as I know
Although really anyone could become an accordionist, and maybe some of them have latent or since-blossomed accordion abilities
justin_smith
Hi to Alexis!
I hope you have all seen this: https://aphyr.com/posts/340-acing-the-technical-interview
Do you guys know of any examples of homoiconic languages that aren't a lisp?
Ha
I guess so!
I mean, I would have to think about it more, but I think so
How do you break it to your boss that they don't understand what a "fold" is?
That is my usual approach, thanks for validating!
I was wondering if there were something more elegant, but apparently not
33333333
Created a universal language to unite all humanity this weekend: https://github.com/prismofeverything/femto
Just compiled a python function to femto then evaluated it in js
Going to become a monk now
3333333333
justin_smith: Awesome! I will donate in that case
justin_smith: Thanks!
justin_smith: Just heard another person talking about PGP encrypted email.... time to revive this idea I think
As long as I am converting everything in my life to metric, might as well set up encrypted messages while I'm at it
Hey justin_smith, thanks for the key!
Now I realized, it is on my machine at home
first obstacle to the cryptosocial revolution
Ah no I mean my key I made last night (my old one was expired)
I have your public key because email
Aha, I suspected I was not the first with this problem
Cool, I will do that
Also, I need to push my new key to a keyserver somewhere yeah?
And, is there some kind of client for composing/reading messages?
Or do you just use the gpg command?
Ah right, I think I remember that
Ah yeah, the show!
Thanks for reminding me
I'm not sure I am the solution for your transportation, but I will try to make it
justin_smith: How does it work if you want to send a message to multiple people?
Can you encrypt it with everyone's key in a way that a single recipient can decrypt it?
That is kind of magic
It is the real magic
Doesn't everyone know your public key?
Awesome. So, tell me how plausible this is: an irc-like system using kafka where you can subscribe to topics and all messages are gpg encrypted
You would have to sign every message with everyone's key who is subscribed to that topic
and people who joined a topic wouldn't be able to see history
Right
I'm not sure there is a way around that
Right
So, plausible?
I am going to make this thing, it should exist
33333
justin_smith: Good to know
That may affect Jodi suitability
Cool, is it still running?
Awesome, I was worried I missed it
How was that last talk on Friday?
Something about validating programs?
Okay, that is cool if not immediately relevant
How was the 40,000 messages a second one? Any insights?
The physics one was amazing
Ah yeah, I can see how for those applications you would need something like that!
Are they using kafka basically?
Sweet. Oh yeah! So I spent the weekend rewriting our application in clojure
Aleph is awesome
along with manifold etc
I love that guy
Ha! Sorry I missed it
I was coding instead
Did he tell you about his reimplementation of the core collections?
that is what he was ranting about when I saw him
Ah, that may be more effective
Have you had trouble working with zookeeper directly?
Ah yeah, it is a pretty explicit abstraction
Right, awesome
So kafka is the abstraction we want
Nice, that sounds right
So if you want to build kafka, use zookeeper
Otherwise, use kafka
Man, I am loving manifold
I just took a pipe from the database, hooked it into a manifold stream, mapped a couple of functions over it and got http streaming results for free
Ha! Agreed
There are those timeless libs that afterwards just seem essential and like they couldn't have been defined any other way
That is the way to write code (if you can)
I feel like ztellman writes all his code that way
3333333
justin_smith: (just got back from lunch, not sure if I missed other messages from you)
Right, so replace all zookeeper stuff with kafka directly
Hahaha it is surreal and true
I mean, things were kind of crazy before, but now they have reached a whole new level of unreality
33333333
More fuel for the grumbly neckbeard fire
So what is the general idea for a petri net?
Wait, how can you push to master without running tests?
Ahh I see, that is fairly awesome. So it is a mathematical model then?
Or more of an engineering one?
Like, does it have an algegra?
I see, now I am curious
*algebra
Very interesting, going to do some research on that
So you are making a petri net lib then?
"There are two AADT in this model, one for the forks algebra, one for the philosophers algebra"
This is hilarious
Cool man, so then you are going to cast your system into a petri net description and run maths on them?
Ah there we go. I was wondering how you were doing the analysis
Right, you don't need to reimplement that, just verify your system
Kind of an awesome project, let me know how it turns out
Ah yes, there we go
I only trust math now
the only thing in the world that can be counted on
Don't lie, you aren't sorry
I was curious about that
I have been wanting to make a neural simulation that incorporates timing of spikes
do petri nets do timing?
Hey justin_smith!
How the hell is it going?
Ah okay! So am I going to get to see this performance then??
Let's go back to that bar and set up
That sounds rad
Totally down.... I have been looking at digital pianos actually
Either way, let's jam : )
Aha, giant blocks
Always giant blocks.... though there is a risk of someone getting crushed
There we go
Then we can paint crazy stuff on them
and rearranging them can be part of the performance
Even when you are standing there, the little engines are whirling in frenzy
That would be awesome, some kind of musical replication of the Pong experiments
I have not. I did some osc thing but I think it was just directly with the messages
Oh rad, I see
Yeah a lot of potential there
Hey quile!
Long time no see
How goes man?
Ha, hardly
just bandwidth limited ; )
Yeah how is that going? How is premise land?
Nice
Good man, crazy
Way too much stuff to do
I get the impression that institutional computer departments are chronically understaffed
Ha! Of course
Good old poe's law
There goes all my attempts at sarcasm (and extremism)
That does sound like fun.
When am I going to stop screwing around with all this other stuff in life and get back to audio programming??
justin_smith quile: Do you guys have a good recommendation for a good hosting/server/vm?
I have had this rackspace cloud instance for 10 years and I want to migrate off
The rackspace thing has been fine, but it is about $25 a month and I know there are better solutions now
Also, rackspace is kind of lame
justin_smith: Some day man, you will be the next pop idol
justin_smith: How do you feel that compares to EC2?
I was wondering about just getting an amazon instance vs something like digital ocean
Is ec2 OSX?
I see, and what ec2 features are there that could be useful for hosting a simple site? Wondering if I need them
Ah yeah
Screw web control panels
Hate those things
Is that what you mean by "ec2 features"?
No it will be a tiny payment portal, so we need a server
Yeah totally agreed there
Okay hmmm
Cool, thanks for the perspective
Sigh
I swear, kids these days
Dude, can't wait to hear it
: )
Yeah, I don't want software anywhere near my gas, water or electricity
Okay, digital ocean set up
AWS had just toooooooo many features for me
Ha! Somehow that is amazing
followed
Followed
Hahaha this guy is hilarious
Juice DRM
Kind of awesome actually
"You are not buying a product, you are buying the privelege of using our product, which we can revoke at any time"
justin_smith: I was just thinking this. We have lived long enough to see the trajectory of things.... and it is not going in a good direction I feel
333333
Really enjoying this paper: https://arxiv.org/pdf/math/0411418.pdf
Pick any real number, the probability that you can actually construct it is 0
I think I knew that, but never had it so clearly demonstrated before
If you can't actually construct a number, how can you use it?
I think I may be a constructivist and didn't even realize
Something about code and incomputability and the halting problem really put these finite vs infinite arguments in a stark light
Right!
So apparently you can still reason about things that are provably unstateable
That is a pretty cool trick
I think this gets into the nature of the gulf between formal systems and things that can be thought/imagined by human beings
Great Ramanujan quote: "An equation for me has no meaning," he once said, "unless it expresses a thought of God."
reminds me of Bach
Dude, that equation for 1/π!
quile: Yes, I love that one, thanks for reminding me
It is beyond comprehensibility I think, which is part of its charm
I have been working on fuga XXII (b-flat minor) from WTC book II for over a month now.... I am a different man from the one I knew before
(now listening to great fugue) What the hell time is this in? I think it is fractal time, I can't tell
Themes will recur with extra notes in them, or fewer notes, what the hell
Truly
Ah there is a transcription?? I was just plotting how to get a pipe organ
Hahahaha but how could you get anything else done?
Well, sweet man. I was just wondering where the hell to go after XXII
Nice, listening now
justin_smith: Yeah! So do I get to hear this performance after all??
Congrats man, just let me know details (unless I was the jinx, in which case tell me nothing)
Nothing wrong with that
Flaw in option 2: "finding some way to deal with the loud fan noise"
justin_smith: It is the soul's uncontainable yearning for the infinite
Then you should do more of that
I am pretty certain I would enjoy playing with convolutional reverb
Paths are converging on working on the endless music generator as my next large life project
I just need to see this board game thing all the way through (delivering in June/July)
then I am open for musical creations. Just about making the space
quile: What is the issue?
Was just thinking about buying a house ; )
!!
So you own the sidewalk??
I did not realize this
Any casualties?
Right, that is annoying
Hey quile: In other news, do you want to jam on some JS tomorrow night?
I basically punted on that issue and just put all of my JS in one file
with the idea that I would fix it someday
And yet, time continues to pass and I can't seem to bring myself to reapproach it yet
Okay, great fugue sheet music acquired (thanks to the wonders of modern day printer technology)
3333333
I think liquid crunchy ganglion could be delicious
https://docs.google.com/document/d/1lFFW0AtnWVto8zpfDAQYU1DCIcYVE0t5PgbjYG4FEXI/edit?usp=sharing
https://docs.google.com/document/d/1lFFW0AtnWVto8zpfDAQYU1DCIcYVE0t5PgbjYG4FEXI/edit?usp=sharing
Can't wait to hear this thing in action
333333
That looks like of rad
I went and saw wildflowers on tabletop day
*kind of rad
shifting priorities
Worst three word poem yet
Interesting, so my work machine woke up for a minute?
How does that happen?
That was quite a run
I am less good at this game
: )
I would be very interested in such a talk
That is a slide right there
Alright quile, it is happening. I am learning the Great Fugue
2 pages in so far, it is bonnkers
Though I will say, compared to the WTC stuff it has WAY less key modulation
Which I actually kind of like
some of the WTC stuff it will modulate like 8 times in two measures
which can be fun, but it is kind of refreshing to just play in a key for awhile
Ah right, that is the difference isn't it
WTC was proving a point
He was saying "even if you are tuned to this key you can't play this song because I modulate three keys away"
Oh man where did that patchwo__ guy go? What a bastard
Never has a tree been more fit for extermination
That is madhouse
Are you guys still token pooling?
That sounds right
Glad you worked that one out
Hmmm it seems like my work machine is unnecessarily active when I am not there
3333333
33333333
333333
So you are playing jazz then? Or is this the bass show you were going to do last time?
justin_smith:
Nice, are you playing right at 8pm? Or is that when the whole show begins?
Ha, yeah I had shut that out
Pffff
Cool I'll look it up then
Nice!
I assume you were doing this manually a lot? : )
Just wait for the endlessly unfolding prism to appear
333333333
justin_smith: Ha! Actually, that should be how all defns work
That should really be a language feature
quile justin_smith: Hey guys! Suddenly it is my birthday tomorrow.... didn't realize that was happening
Either of you want to come by tomorrow night for some chill ass mild celebration?
justin_smith: Hahaha no not at all
Probably around 7 I am thinking
It will just be you guys and annie I think (though I am reaching out to Max as well)
Just want a small quiet thing, no large event this year : )
quile: Awesome, no worries about lateness
Hey guys, awesome to hang out last night! Thanks for coming out
3333333
333
333333333
33333
justin_smith: That cover is badass
That is how I imagine programming in my mind
Hahaha justin_smith: the importance of naming
The trick is to exceed the actual reality of the thing by one order of magnitude
Like "neural network"
Yeah, just call it reality
"In this computer, I am creating REALITY, something most of us will be witnessing for the first time!"
That sounds awesome, link?
Haha I love the metaphor man : )
Don't listen to the haters
3333333
Ha! Those are amazing
3333333
Horrible
3333
33333333
quile: Thanks man! They are a lot of fun to write
It is kind of funny, never threw a KS to do that stuff, but it turns out to be pretty fun
Thanks for backing!  : )
Very soon now
33333
3333
3333333
Hahaha good stuff!
Did you pen that yourself?
Missing something about scrounging bitcoins out of the mattress or something
Watching infomercial TV in your VR world, looking for bitcoins in the virtual cushions, microwave glitchcorn, something something
justin_smith: I have a coworker who is encountering subtle timing issues while trying to construct a distributed system, and I thought of you and your rants on this topic
I suggested he use Kafka to synchronize everything, but he seems determined to not accept any additional dependencies
he wants to "keep the binary small"
I thought about inviting you in to consult with the guy ; )
justin_smith: Thanks, I'll pass along the advice : )
justin_smith: Really looking forward to this show!
And thanks for the quine/borges connection
As for Max, I think there was an email I sent to both of you ranting about some vaguely defined notion in the middle of the night
but if you don't have that I can send a new one
I just replied to it
justin_smith: I am totally down for that
Want to go into the woods tomorrow?
I am thinking about taking the day off
3333333
Hey justin_smith: might have to take a rain check on the walk today, lots of work to do
could be open tonight however
justin_smith: That crazy movie looked pretty good, where was it playing again? (I don't have IRC history)
Ah yes. Are you still thinking about going?
Okay just checked, it is actually on their site
Yeah I would be down for dinner beforehand
Let's do it
Ah, I just went straight to clinton street theater: https://cstpdx.com/
Yeah churchoffilm.org looks dead to me
Or at least, delayed
These things happen
Apparently all information systems are not in perfect synchrony with one another
Cool! It's a plan
What is the place to go?
I used to hit up Savoy a lot, before I started trying to lose weight ; )
Have you been to that hawaiian place?
Night light is good
Night light it is
quile: That is a badass suggestion
Yeah I feel there is a general sluggishness in information propagating from the world into our arbitrarily constructed information systems
There also seems to be some manner of warping or distortion as well
Funny, I'm in here twice
justin_smith: Which night are you going to CMG?
Cool, I think I am down to go with you. Let me know what time you are going! (looks like it starts at 3?)
Awesome, thanks for the link
Wow, that is a great talk
Kind of amazing in its simplicity, though running every query through from the beginning of time may get tiresome after awhile....
Cool for global stuff, how does it work for tiny simple queries?
I guess you create a db as a projection of the data
Yeah exactly
So you keep one sequence/log for all time, but you don't interact with it directly, you interact with its projections
Kind of awesome idea
BRB rewriting my whole application
So basically, you run Kafka on never-delete mode
It does simplify a lot of things
Ah haven't gotten that far
but yeah makes sense
Sounds tricky ; )
quile: Just got to page 7 on the Great Fugue
it is pretty magnificent
Hmmm interesting
3333333
33
sounds painful
333333333
Sounds good! I have plans tonight unfortunately or I would go
333333333
3333
C is great
something timeless about it
I kind of miss it at times, though that could just be background level nostalgia talking
I have taken your advice and started learning about audio in java
specifically, the sampled stuff
I think C is another level there
That seems wise
Just always pass by reference
Ha!
I feel like you can't really program C unless you embrace mutability, but I am open to be proven wrong on that
Or, if you adopt FP sensibilities and never modify your function arguments, it doesn't matter if everything is a reference ; )
Ah yess
Definitely don't share data between threads, that is just madness
IPC is good
Simpler times my friend
I mean, using IPC directly is not simple necessarily, but in a way it is. We need new words for this
Simple == no abstractions vs simple == easy to use
Ah that sucks. Does csound do GC or something?
Probably some kind of buffer cleanup routine
Exactly
I like creating abstractions, not using them
That sounds badass
I'm going for moderate abstraction with java sound
but I like the hard metal approach. You will probably have to solve many incidental problems.... but it will be a great journey and you will probably end up with something better if you persevere
Ah I think I've seen this thing
It's like if you zoomed in super far on a monitor
That is why iteration is so powerful. At each step, you have a working system
Awesome, wait the 26th....
So NEXT wednesday
I think I can do that
Yeah, then you can be as ambitious as you want, and still have a workable system when the deadline arrives
Looking forward to it
Hey justin_smith: would you be interested in a profiling session where you show me the secrets of profiling?
I have a good puzzle for it
33333333
justin_smith: Sweet! That sounds good, let's do it this weekend
THanks man
How does Friday night work? Too much after work?
I could do it Sunday during the day also
I could also do it Saturday by rearranging some things
Cool! Sunday is good
(sorry computer failed there for a minute)
Yeah let's do that. We can even get some lunch beforehand or something
Alright will do
Well, I have many of those
Still doing open source these days
I'll see what they say
33333333
Link does not resolve
Though, good to know you are using nginx ; )
3333333
Pffffff wow, good question!
Fugues upon fugues upon fuguesssssss
333333333
333333
3333333
333
3333333
I feel like I've gotten that one before
Or maybe I am just in a state of perpetual deja vu now
That may be true actually
I feel like I've been in a state of perpetual deja vu before....
Hey justin_smith: good to hang out yesterday! Thanks for coming by
justin_smith: Do you know when you are going on on Wednesday?
I want to come but I don't want to just hang out at Twilight for hours
Well, I am close enough
Maybe give me a heads up when you know, I can just zip down there
Sounds itchy
Dude, think if you had that thing on your >>face<<
3333333
Right on man!
So if you let it slip back over that weight do you have to pawn it?
Or is it more of a ratchet?
Ah, that is a good thing to know about yourself
I was thinking of it in purely logical terms
Also, the wifi here suxxxx
Yes I see that
I have a network of my own right now ; )
Sometimes it works
Right on, it is funny how hard it is to figure out how to get yourself to do something
Seems like it would be more convenient if everyone was born with an iron will
*iron discipline I mean
Hahaha well I guess there is that : )
Maybe that's why
I know some people like this
333333333
Oh hey man, yeah! I was stoked on the music
I was just kind of upset that guy cut you short
Oh really?
Man you could play for 45 minutes
Seriously, I was just getting into it. I thought it just started
Ah okay, there was a lot of confusion at the end there
Maybe I was triggered because of what happened last time as well
Okay, well this is why you go out and do things. So many lessons every time
Performance is its own kind of practice
Hmmm I wonder if that is it? I think there are many possible emotive spaces noise can inhabit, are you usually approaching it with a specific one?
That would be awesome. Seriously, the craft is there, I think you just need to perform all over the place
Yeah! Go on a journey through the emotional space
Instead of a point make a path
Well, that seems like a worthy activity : )
I think your mindfulness practice will help here
I think if you relax and take time to inhabit the spaces you create it could go to interesting places. There is no rush
Looking forward to the next show, when is that?
Awesome
3333333333
33333
Oh nice!
I haven't gotten to spend much time with her, but the encounters I have had were very positive
33333333333
Very dangerous
Oh yeah? Awesome man, glad to hear that
How long was the show?
I find it is a constant practice to actually inhabit the time and space I find myself in
Sorry I missed the show, was out at the ocean this weekend
Sounds rad!
Ha! : |
Ah, where was the place?
I don't know man, I can't deal with that saxophone
Right, but doesn't Brian play sax?
I thought he was the sax guy
Ah, different Brian then
It is
One step down from Saxophone
Hmmm I don't know that one
Seems like I missed a lot of things this weekend!
Oh yeah! I think I know which girl you are talking about
she was a badass
So is Niekrasz back in town now? Or is this another of his tours?
The problem is you have these brilliant people who ruin the instrument for everyone else who tries to emulate them (guitar and sax)
Cool, I'll check it out when I'm not at work
33333333
Sweet, glad you captured it!
I will give it a listen today
That is an achievement
Not yet no
Ah, it is a movie?
I thought it was some kind of novelty application
What is the idea?
Oh yeah! That thing
Didn't know the name
Crazy
Can't tonight, though let me know how it turns out
Hey justin_smith: Did you check out the Jodorowsky last night?
Haha yeah!
Okay good to know
Will do
I do KWYM
Alright, I'll probably head out next week if you want to see it again
Ah, how is that working out?
quile: Great fugue memorized, now I just need to play through it 200 more times
Let's jam next week : )
justin_smith: Do they make phones that aren't vendor locked yet?
Oh yeah? I am interested in that
I have an S5, but I hate the verizon vendor stuff
I just want a machine I can do anything with, this spyware bums me out
Hmmm that is not a bad idea
Have you tried any cyanogen stuff before? It seems kind of hairy last I checked
Oh yeah? Hmmm I may give that a shot then
My only hesitation is that it seems like something you have to get way into, ie know a lot about phones
I'm not sure I want to know anything about phones
Weeeeeird
Yeah that stuff just seems annoying
It is like all these specific details that generalize to no other area
I'm sure there are general principles, but mostly you are dealing with dumb details
quile: Rad! Yeah it is quite a piece
justin_smith: What do you mean by "mandatory google bs"?
quile: Kind of amazing. Did you know the theme was based on an old Dutch folk tune?
Apparently it was issued as a challenge during a job interview as organist for some giant church to test his improvisation abilities
justin_smith: Yeah screw all that. Cool, thanks for the lead! I will check that out
quile: Yeah they were like "What can you do with this theme?" and Bach said "Great Fugue for all time"
Love it. Though I think Jodi may be going insane from hearing it over and over for two months now
Yeah? I am kind of into the idea. Really weird how phone "culture" has evolved into these locked down pseudo-devices
Right, which is totally at odds with what is good for consumers
Weird how incentives put us at odds with the companies that are supposedly creating products for us
Almost like the system itself is flawed....
justin_smith: Are you using the "project fi"?
Or did you just swap in the simcard from your galaxy?
33333333
Hey justin_smith: Did you still want to see that movie again this week?
Sweet, how about tomorrow night then?
Hmmm wait, it is only showing on Thursday night at 7:30
Ah yeah, I remember her
Not that I can see, but I acknowledge I may have failed some basic internet test
Can you do Thursday then?
I think I can swing that
Hahaha good plan. It is good to know something of yourself
Awesome, looking forward to it
AH nice. Welcome to the world of in ear headphones ; )
I have the BOSE noise canceling ones
I do a lot of walking for my commute, really nice to shut out the traffic noise
Oh yeah? Haven't heard that one
I bet there was some kind of feud between two people at some point
quile: You able to hang out tonight or tomorrow night?
Totally. Cool, let me know!
333333333
Ah awesome, good call
Appreciate that
That is kind of badass
Ad hoc dropbox
Yeah but then you have to have a dropbox account
3333333333
Ha! Sweet. It's on
Dude, see dogdog's most recent 3wp!
You are smelly naked music
justin_smith: Hey man, awesome movie! Thanks again for the ticket
This sounds a little like the curse of perfect pitch
It seems lke a gift but really it just makes you see how wrong everything is
Right! Reality is fairly brutal and unforgiving thing, I think that's why people are seeking refuge from it all the time
They want to be swaddled in fantasy and told everything is okay
Right, so if you can master things to satisfy even this level of fidelity you know you have achieved etc etc
You guys have plans for the eclipse?
Apparently the place Jodi is working (Washington school on Stark?) has roof access
thinking about heading there
quile! You able to hang out at all this weekend? I have a new prototype for you as well ; )
This one may actually be playable
justin_smith: I used to listen to those on repeat during the beach house days. I think they made it into my bones at this point
quile: No worries! Totally understood
Let's try for Sunday night then
if that is doable for you
I have some plans tomorrow night
3333333333333
Those are my favorite kind of tautologies!
Is it also self-referential? That might be the greatest 3wp yet
That does sound kind of amazing
It sounds like Alice in Wonderland done right
Hahahaha
Like all things deserving of love, induces nausea
33333333
I think I spend more time with headphones in that not
Totally, unlike these iron-maiden spike-teeth bose I endure
Actually, the bose are pretty nice too
333333
33333333
Are one of you guys burning something? Kind of smokey out here
It is like regional dandruff.
Those are all of my favorite places to go burning right now
I think I am feeling actual mourning for trees and small woodland creatures right now
justin_smith: No way! That is some worthy work right there
I have long dreamed of getting a cello specifically for that reason
Ah right, nice. Yeah I have always avoided cello because of how much it is supposed to injure you
That bass is broken until I fix the action
which I have been meaning to do for apparently years now
I do have a great violin! Man, I need to learn that thing
I spent some time with it a few years ago and got somewhere, would be fun to break that out again
It is a lot of painful work
but so awesome once you get it down
Ha yeah! Well, if you are looking for terrible waveforms you couldn't do much better than a violin/viola
I believe in the power of iteration
That is awesome
Thanks for sharing!
33333333
Better than an omnipotent fowl bear am I right?
justin_smith: Did I see that guy?
It rings a bell
Awesome! Keep me posted, I definitely want to see that
justin_smith: I will have to give the ZTellman talk more attention, I started it at work and wasn't able to finish
They had recorders though yeah?
Or something like that
I expect the temperature would be around zero
As far as the Shosty quartets go, I switch back and forth between the Emerson and Fitzgerald
I feel like the Emerson really gets the spirit of the thing, but the Fitzgerald is so rich and powerful
Ah yeah, love those guys. Recording quality is the only reason I don't listen to that one more
That and the Beethoven quartet are amazing but the graininess sometimes spoils the immersion
Totally
Maybe I am just spoiled on modern day fidelity
Right! That is a funny sensation for me. I think too much fidelity is almost a curse
jinx
So apparently I am just an auditory goldilocks
I think that is wise
Putting on Borodin to heal my wounds
3333333
: )
In before loin octopus is a worldwide phenomenon
Hey justin_smith! How did the show go?
Fuck yeah
That sounds right
Did anyone record it?
Yeah like video for the masses, doesn't need to be pristine
I'm interested in Shosty!
Seattle symphony is pretty good, I saw some great Mahler there before
Dude did the mindfulness thing work for the show? Were you able to inhabit the spaces and let them happen etc? Or did you just freak the fuck out?
3333333333
Good to hear!
333333
333333333
Ouch man why are so many 3wp thinly veiled descriptions of medical conditions?
justin_smith: Thanks!
Good to be back
How are things around here?
Nice! Does it carry along with it some measure of satisfaction or enjoyment? Or is it some kind of perverse self-flagellation thing?
Yeah life has been crazy
Really enjoyed our jam out session at the wedding ; )
Well, that just means you are on to something
Yeah, awesome!
I am doing this with drawing right now
I suck so bad
It's all the journey my friend : )
Looking forward to playing
If you want to do some simple piano/viola stuff I would be totally down for that
Okay well, whenever you are ready then, just let me know
It was good! Lopez island is super sleepy and beautiful
Like, the whole island is almost silent
Not a party island (which is good for us)
They are not really welcoming tourists, I think all the tourists are supposed to go to Friday Harbor
Yeah we were just on Lopez
Explored the whole thing though, pretty awesome
Ha congrats!
I'm glad you found a system that works for you
No shame in bribing yourself
quile justin_smith: Yeah! Celebration is called for
Let's get some lunch this weekend perhaps? Would be great to see you guys
Also, I could have to guys over tonight or tomorrow night
*you guys
justin_smith: Oh yeah?? I am going to that show!
Are you actually in the orchestra?
Let's do tomorrow night then.... quile?
Also, Jodi and I are splitting up and I haven't really had anyone to talk to about it
usually I talk to Annie about this stuff, but I haven't wanted to disturb her new wedding happiness
Maybe let's hang out tomorrow night then? That would be awesome, thanks man
If you want to come by we could just jam out or whatever
Thanks man
About two weeks
pretty much right after the wedding
We had a fight at the wedding and it was pretty much the final straw for me
That is a good call. I'll see how I do here
Oh yeah! Did you get to hang out with that guy after the wedding?
I'm not sure about tonight, might want to keep it low key
That is a good question
Some kind of dinner would be good
I was just going to invite you by the house if you want to do some music. Or I would be down to wander around the streets as well
That sounds awesome
How about 6? I should be home by then
Ah yeah, 7 is great
The FOMO is real
Don't worry we won't do anything cool
It does make me think of creating some kind of FOMO-wheel to harness the power of FOMO
It is a powerful force but difficult to couple to an energy-generating process
3333333333
How is sweaty gravity selected? How does viscosity, density, salinity etc relate to survival fitness?
justin_smith: Yeah man, it is kind of amazing
They all say "look engineers can build bridges what's wrong with you people"
But this is like building a bridge that is also moving and shifting and needs version updates and the queues get full etc
justin_smith: Oh yeah? I might join you if you think they wouldn't mind
Also, you usually have to change the design five times while you are building it
justin_smith: Ha! Not really
But I am down to go to weird parties on Halloween
Halloween is I think my favorite holiday.
Identity is made up every day, but Halloween is the only day we collectively explore that idea
The Jerboa
: )
Try with 1 first
Ha! Did I see that show? I don't remember it
justin_smith: Awesome! Link?
Yeah!!
Sweet man
I am down for any and all master plans
3333333
justin_smith: Wow man, that is some serious commitment
Now for some occasions to record
Dude, you should take all your riches and buy a plot of land to record on next
Next weight goal
Aren't you only in the owning class if you make other people pay you for owning stuff? I think it is okay to have land and build a dome etc
I thought it was about power relationships in general, not just owning stuff
Got it
I didn't know you felt that way
I see, that makes sense
Ownership is a pretty weird concept really
For me I just want a dome
with a giant organ in it
Really?? Did not know that
quile: You are the problem man, all the ills of the world I just tell people "All quile, he did all that"
justin_smith: Awesome! Sounds like a great project : )
When are you going?
quile: You know, *that* way
Nice man, practice is a magical thing
333333
Ah rad, would love to hear iit
Sorry to miss the show, how did it go?
Oh shit
Hahahaha denial is a powerful thing. Come on man, don't force reality on people I think that's impolite
Leave us to our delusions, it's all we have
Are you antimillenial? You know phone is source of life now, and more importantly, meaning
It is funny, most performance is poesing
It is rare to find a performer who performs truth instead
Still, the show sounds badass
I think we should record everything yeah
especially since you have the gear now
333333
Is there any other kind?
3333333333333
Please do
Man story of my life
Might end up reviving caribou here, at least the model/sql part
Still relevant apparently
really the biggest problem with that codebase is all the dumb config stuff
I just need to take an evening and fix all that
then this thing will be ready for the modern era
33333
33333333
Highly adaptive for certain environments
333333
Is there any other kind??
33333
Well that really takes all the fun out of it I think
Hey justin_smith: do you use protocols much?
Having a weird protocol issue, not sure I am using them right
quile: Yep
I think I figured it out
I tried to put implementations into the protocol also
Hey nice!
What are you doing?
That is rad
Perfect use case
Currently building my own data pipeline
Are you modeling it as a dependency network?
Or DAG or whatever?
 333333333
Nice, I will check it out
Those Madagascar people are astounding
Yes, I think they have a plague going on as well right now
http://www.who.int/csr/don/02-november-2017-plague-madagascar/en/
No it is actually a plague
I know the internet gives all facts an air of unreality
quile: Oh yeah! I remember learning that. So somehow they made it all the way to Madagascar in their boats
I can only imagine how many were lost
It is such a depth of complexity that is so alien to our whole musical tradition
I seriously can't even log into facebook. Every once in awhile I try and comment on something.... then I feel bad about it
I can't even define what my issue is
just an overwhelming sense of existential dread
justin_smith: I see how you use it for good
weird I can't bring myself to do the same thing
justin_smith: Maybe that's it!
Maybe I just need to clean out all these "friends" who I don't even know really
I might try that, because I am starting to want to be connected into all the music stuff around town
and it seems so much of that happens through facebook
I am just going to start muting all these people
Yeah man! You created your own curse there
Your headphones are higher quality than most recordings now
There needs to be some kind of synchronization between these two trajectories
Yeah! The magic of practice
That is how notes become music
I love that process actually, it may be the primary drive
quile: If you want to switch for a day we can arrange that
quile: No man but I will for you being able to practice ; )
: )
Alright then
Maybe trick them into loving piano too? Then you can all play together
There it is : )
Oh man unfollowing all these people feels so good
I might actually use facebook after this
Only posts from Justin Smith
So if I just say "add friend" it will follow them, or is that a special operation?
I feel super dumb asking this question
Okay, that looks much better
Nice, okay timeline looking more like something I care about now
333333
333333
33333
justin_smith: Awesome application of the rhythmic ratio, I'll have to set that up
What I want is to get a listenable song that follows the 60-circle 3/4/5 so I am not listening to a metronome : )
Yes indeed
We should design the ultimate polyrhythmic metronome
That sounds like a fun project : )
I have actually, sounds like a cool problem
though these things always depend on what your preconception of "composition" is
Trying to apply music theory like rules kind of misses the point
I heard that!
I will have to visit at some point
Amen my friend
Really it is just a collection of rules of thumb that people have canonized as law or something
Yeah, we should have an intervention where we discuss the impact of the choice of compositional model
Man, everyone just wants an anchor so that they know their creative endeavor is *correct*. Of course this is impossible and wastes much time and energy
Ha!
This happens in the board game design too, where uninformed designers-to-be pick from a smorgasbord of "mechanics" and cobble them together and think it is a game
justin_smith: Oh yeah?
Ah the blade, the universal symbol of action
I like your mythos, I am sure it will continue to develop
That makes a lot of sense actually
That's why they start kids on those rainbow xylophones that only play right notes
"right"
Eventually if you continue to sharpen your musical theory you end up with Physics
just checking
I think the rules are good
Yeah why not 5wp?? Fight the power!
(not really)
Awesome
Well that explains my prediliction to Bach
Or vice versa
C++ is Beethoven, Java is Brahms, Python is creedence clearwater revival, and Ruby is those weird generative nursery rhyme vidoes that have taken over youtube
Shostakovich is just bleeding into your computer
Yessssssss
Have you guys read this? (especially quile as you have kids) https://medium.com/@jamesbridle/something-is-wrong-on-the-internet-c39c471271d2
It is pretty insane
The idea of using generative algorithms to automate the production of youtube videos is of course inevitable
It is like the markov-generated tag cloud of videos
justin_smith: Yeah well that would actually make sense, unlike most of everything else happening
What I find amazing is who are these live actors making all these videos?
It's like if we took a three word poem and made a video out of it
Ah yes, good call
It wouldn't even have to be a human, the markov generator could just make an API call to mechanical turk and a bunch of people are dancing about at the behest of machines
Truly weird
Dude, I love that stuff. So satisfying. So much at odds with the day to day frustrations that it feels almost like magic
darcs!
Thus is the insane potential ratio of effort to outcome that is programming
Maybe the widest swing of any endeavor
33333
33333333
Oh?
Sorry to hear that man
My place may be contaminated by alien virus
It may be, do you know of any allergies you have?
justin_smith: Nice! That crew is doing some pretty cool stuff
quile: Right, let's do science on this
3333333
333
33333
33
33333
333333333
Nice!
3333333333
Ha! Nice story : )
justin_smith: Welcome back man!
How was the trip?
quile: I want to hear these improvised fantasia's "like liquid fire"
3333333
Quite a feat in this day and age
Well, we are slowly covering the space of all possible sentences in this room. I'm sure we are not the only ones
Someone is doing a "9 billion names of God" with sentences somewhere on a large scale
Someone
3333333
An ideal we can all strive towards
333333
It's like we've opened an actual portal to this place
33333333
justin_smith quile: Okay how many bitcoins do you guys have?
Hahahaha don't do that though
Not saying it's not a bubble, but if you're wrong there is no limit to your liability
Just saying, in case you are seriously considering it
quile: I do
Well, it is still yet to be determined, but it looks like the real deal
quile: No I was saying "I do remember that"
not "I do have bitcoins"
I have exactly 3 one hundredths of a bitcoin
just going to leave it there
Ah nice!
I have an ETH coin, really just for fun
I am not an investor
I know nothing about this stuff
It really could go either way, curious to see
If this were a real commodity that had some kind of real world corollary I would be much more confident saying it is a bubble
but this could just be the historical point where the world realizes the value of non-forgeable non-government-controlled entities
It is either a historical transition or a dumb tulip craze
Who knows?
justin_smith: I saw that
Yeah it is pretty wacky actually, let's put all of our money in code/data form? I know how reliable code is in general....
I did a little investigation and the bitcoin culture has basically built a religion around "HODLING" their bitcoins in the face of any volatility. Kind of a red flag I think, but once again I know nothing
Oh hey justin_smith: Have you bought into spec yet?
Nice
I will be looking forward to trying it out
quile: Yeah man, you see what I mean?
It is kind of insane
I think it might be the real deal, but I am not willing to bet all of my cash on it : )
Actually it is back under 10k
That is volatility for you
justin_smith: Yeah I hear you
It feels weird
You do have a bit of that New England self-punishing puritan thing going on
I do also, I think it is part of the cultural heritage
I am coming around though
I think the difference is that if I was in the owner class I would just try to make everything as cool as possible for everyone
Hahahaha and many other things I'm sure
The mayflower was only 102 people??
I guess I didn't realize that
justin_smith: Hahahaa
I want to see that in action
justin_smith: Question - do you have any mp3's of the recordings we have been doing? Applying for this artist residency and need some examples of work.
You mentioned last night you had been going through them, just curious
I might have some other things laying around as well
No feel free, no rush
Deadline is 15th of December
It is something in NY that Caitlin sent me
You live in this rehearsal space with instruments and other artists
For a week or two
No harm in applying yeah?
I can't imagine I will get it since I have no real history or content, but worth trying
It is the kind of thing I want to do
3333333
Hey how do you guys feel about a national strike?
33333
33333333
33333
I have systematic systems preventing me from getting my hopes up about this stuff until it is actually the real deal
He was wiggled out of too many obscene things for me to believe this is the end
Ah, so my cynicism fuels my optimism, and your optimism fuels your cynicism?
I knew we were duals of some sort
Hahaha no I think that is the burning node of harsh noise that lives in my heart plays that role
333333333
33333333
3333333
justin_smith: What are you doing with holly?
This sounds way too traditional
Nice, it is good when leaves grow out of the ground
they are constantly renewing themselves
33333333
Where?
3333333333
I don't recall that, though I guess there has been plenty of time to copypaste since my departure
That is what functions are for.... ; )
someone should tell him about functions
I am kind of the opposite, I will waste an afternoon refactoring something to avoid like a line of duplication
Ah yeah, that is a bummer
config man!
no joke
You know, I have even forsaken the component pattern now
I read the config from disk on boot, then those values are passed down to the functions that need them, functionally
It is so much simpler, and really just using the same compositional pattern at every level
it is really satisfying
Why? If you want to test with different values, they are just functions so you can invoke them with whatever
Maybe the idea did not translate in my description
Everything is a function, so you just call it with different arguments
config is arguments that come from outside the program, but once they are inside the program they are values like anything else
Initialization.... you initialize things in the order they depend on each other
What kind of resources are you talking about?
I don't have any contentious resources I am dealing with perhaps
Sure, it claims a port while running
Well, you still have to tell it to release the port during lifecycle
it is not automated really
Sure, but if you know the order that is not so hard to set up
Sure, I understand component and I have used it many times
I am saying I don't really need those things
When I want to release something I release it
explicitly, during the normal operation of the program
In general though I don't really release things until the program terminates. Most of the things I write are designed to start up and run indefinitely.
Any temporary resource is allocated and cleaned up explicitly, which to me is more clear what and when things are happening
Testability comes from coding functionally. I feel like these systems are *more* testable now that everything is functional from bottom to top
I can see the value
I have discovered that it is cleaner and more direct to just call functions
Also, more composable, since I haven't imposed some arbitrary "top-level" where components are defined and initialized
Well, in practice I have taken what was previously the top level of a program and combined into other another project seamlessly, so I would call that an increase in composability personally
What is more composable than functions?
I can work with the code more flexibly if it is all of the same form, rather than having some values with special behavior that break the symmetry of the design
It is cool if it helps you out, for me I have had great success just making everything functions
and config is suddenly not a giant pain in the ass
Exactly
no globals
Really this is all the long tail response to the config snafu in caribou
it has been quite a journey
Not sure what you mean by this: `because you don't have explicit and automated data dependencies separate from your code`
Do you consider component separate from your code somehow?
Kind of like the dependency an expression has on the bindings in the surrounding let block?
Yeah totally, that is what initially sold me on component
Isn't there an implicit relationship between the code that calls stop and the stopping of a given component?
Okay so you are saying when you just want to initialize a subset of the components this makes it more convenient to track?
How does your program still work with only a subset of the components available?
Hmmm I have something similar but they are just functions that take arguments
Right, just call the function you need
I'm not sure that actually simplifies things, but I am glad it works for you
I feel like we are solving the same problem two different ways, I think that is okay
My way simplifies some things but makes other things more complex, your way simplifies different things but makes other things more complex
We are each probably simplifying the use case we encounter most
33333333
justin_smith: Interesting, I am enjoying this reconstruction of the past
That does seem weird, but there is a lot of metal play going on in welding, you never know
That is kind of awesome
Aluminum is the most fun metal
in that it is the easiest to do arbitrary things with
"aluminum, will you do this also?" - answer is always yes
That sounds like fun. Are you still using the tuner?
sounds like you are about ready for ear training
It was dead when we gave the results of all of our publicly funded infrastructure to private companies
333333
333333333
333333
3333
: (
333333333
https://mobile.twitter.com/NBCNews/status/942827387682787329/video/1
Me too! Wow, kind of terrifying
Chanserv has left IRC?
That sounds bad
Ah nice
Okay so Chanserv did not abandon us
333333
justin_smith: Saving video for later
Where was it?
I've had this dream
justin_smith: Do you mind repasting that last link? My IRC client crashed as I went to click it
It is actually the OHSU network. It is fussy and constantly reconfiguring itself (or something)
My wireless access is .... intermittent
it doesn't jibe well with the IRC client
Something about enhanced security
quile: No worries at all! I was also on hiatus for awhile
the faithful noisesmith has been holding things down : )
Good to be back
Hey justin_smith: what is the name of the clojure schema library?
Is it just the plumatic schema?
Or am I thinking about something else?
That is the one, thanks
Have you used it yet?
: )
We are looking into it now
Yeah I think it might be okay to declare a certain key is always constrained in the same way, if those keys are namespaced
I see the existing data issue though, you would need some kind of transformation layer to work with old data
but for building a system from scratch it seems like a fine constraint
Yeah all of the automatic features seem pretty awesome, once your spec is defined
Yeah, once again you need a transform layer from raw data into the spec world, which I think makes sense
It does add a bit of work though
I agree it seems like the "right" way to do things
Yeah, enforcing a layer where "past this point all data has been verified" makes the system more stable as a whole
and let's you detect immediately when those expectations are violated, at the point where you should detect them
ie, before they are actually rampant in your system
Yeah screw that
I think this goes into the law of not trusting any external input ever
justin_smith: I think we agree on something!
mongo is almost the same thing as a hostile external web site
Wow nice
That is badass
I love core.cache, exactly what I always want in a library: simple idea, no surprises implementation, direct and straightforward
A model library
Yes, functions: the original interface
That is how you can tell things are well designed
usually because of everything you *don't* need
Agreed
Those are beautiful
The history of music theory is so ruled by arbitrary inconsistencies, it seems necessary to do so
If music theory were physics, we would still have Apollo in a chariot explaining the Sun
Yeah, this is why I always appealed to acoustics and ratios etc
but that is really just the beginning
I don't know how you can claim universality to something that is not even fully defined in scope
Yeah exactly, good way to put it
The part I love about music is inherently biological and messy
That sounds like a universal statement to me ; )
(referring to your statement, not mine)
Exactly, we can have a true universal music theory once we understand how throbbing works
Well, they didn't have all the millenia of accreted intellectualism to get in the way
They had just discovered rationality and it was still pure
"when you risk your life for twitter likes and don't die"
IRC4lyfe
Luckily I am content with alienation and isolation so I don't need to convince anyone of anything
Not too far from the truth really
Or: baby bear discovered by mother owl
Bear gives birth do owl, licks it into shape of bear
*to
That is amazing
I feel that way every day
Sometimes I just sit there and let it spill out of my eyes
33333333
3333
The agony of reactionaries is evolving
I saw it on CNN
3333333333
It's an expanding field
Found anyone else you haven't heard of?
Nice
That is badass
send me some names of the more interesting ones
Funny, I can see that
Yeah, it's not Pärt's fault
he is just making patterns
When art collides with consumerism.... sigh
Even state funding is problematic, same problem as physics or any other research area. Public funding is not immune to fashion and marketing, possibly even more susceptible to it in some ways
Yeah totally, I was thinking of punk as well
That is its whole ethos
Now we have youtube which has solved all problems
Right, like how I listen to mostly functional ambient music that intentionally avoids grabbing attention as a background to coding
I listen to very different things when I actually want to pay attention to music
The best music you have to make time to sit down and listen to.... which means I don't play it as much : (
Yeah do people listen to music these days? I don't have a good gauge on that
Right agreed. Transport is good for that, though I listen to a lot of audiobooks in that time now
Now I will actually intentionally sit down and listen to something at home, it is like an event
I can see that
Everything is a tradeoff : )
I have listened to about 100 books since I started.... all books I never would have read otherwise
(though some are more worthwhile than others)
but that is all time I'm not listening to badass music
3333333
Hey Smitho, synth question for you
So say I have a bank of generators, each normalized between -1 and 1
and I want to add them together to create the output signal
What is the convention for the amplitude scaling on each one?
Say I have 16 voices.... do I just multiply each signal by 1/16, even if there are only usually 1-4 playing at any time?
justin_smith: Forgot to use your name
I feel like there may be a smarter more adaptive way to scale the signals based on how many are playing simultaneously, but wouldn't want to create weird amplitude jumps when other voices come in
I figure there must be some standard approach to this
So you always scale based on the expected max signal then?
Okay
Yes, that is what I'm discovering
How does compression help?
Right, I follow
basically I am implementing signal generators from scratch, very illuminating
How does compression transform the signal?
What is the algorithm, so to speak?
Okay, then it scales the signal by that average?
Ahhh awesome
Cool, I will add that in. So I could add all the signals together and run it through a compressor then
Ah so by segment you mean partitioning the amplitude axis?
interesting
Okay, so partitioning the RMS
Thansk man, that is a great explanation. I love signal processing
Makes sense
justin_smith: Any features you wish these various signal generator frameworks had?
I'm setting it up so it deals with cyclical graphs
that is already in
I have a cool delay where the delay window accepts a generator that can smoothly increase or decrease the window
Yeah checked out pink, it is cool
I am implementing all the signal stuff in straight java, then doing the composition in clojure
Also, you can change up the generator graph while it is playing without interruption
which is a feature I always wanted
Oh nice
That seems way better than my funny limechat thing I use
justin_smith: Any cool generators you recommend building?
Nice!
I am also all digital ocean these days
finally set my old rackspace server out to pasture
justin_smith: Yeah I have the delay, I'll check out the fft
I mean delay is basically a special case of table lookup
No surprise there
We can make things work before we understand them ; )
justin_smith: Where do you read about DSP?
I am at the point I could use some reading materials
the things I've made so far are straightforward applications of my preexisting understanding of signals
Also, curious if there is a way to create a control variable in a noise generator to seamlessly travel between the different noise colors
Interesting
Ah cool idea
definitely going to try that
I was wondering about feedback, when you mix it back in you have to weight it.... do you also weight the original signal? It seems like if you don't mix the feedback in right you could quickly overwhelm the signal
Right exactly, so do you use compression here also then?
Okay that makes sense
So how do you avoid blowing up the signal applying layer after layer of feedback?
Yeah I have my eye on waveshaping
I love that stuff
Yes dogdog, more awesome word poems
Awesome, I think I have that too
though my frequencies are not normalized to anything beyond abstract "rates"
justin_smith: So when using feedback, how do you avoid blowing up the signal applying layer after layer of the previous signal?
Ah nice
Yeah right now the signals are generated, so no sine table, I am just integrating the formula for the harmonic oscillator
HA!
Nice
So is it usually some mix of weighting the original signal and feedback signal and adding them together then?
Is that the general form? Or is it really all over the place?
Oh yeah, karplus strong was my next thing to implement
I can use that as a simple feedback generator
to get a feel for how they work
I can imagine
dB is logarithmic yeah?
Cool man, thanks for the download, that is a lot of helpful information
once I get the basic generators down I want to implement some basic diffusion models and get some systems dynamics signals in there
mostly as control signals, but maybe audio ones as well
Ha, good to know
looking forward to that
I love how screwed up the signal can get
Audio bugs are awesome in their own right
"bugs"
When you do your RMS, how many samples do you usually look back on?
(for compression)
That sounds like fun, I'm going to try it out and see how it goes
3333333
Hey justin_smith: really enjoyed the show on Friday!
thanks for the invite
How did you feel about it?
333333
justin_smith: From the outside it seemed pretty coherent
I thought there was a lot of good constrast between the voices and the viola
as well as symmetry
3333333333
3333333
justin_smith: Thanks for the synthesis advice the other day!
I ended up making that interpolating table lookup
pretty sweet
karplus strong is next
justin_smith: You planning anything for your birthday?
or are you still feeling under the weather?
3333333
3333333333
33333333
3333333
justin_smith: Happy birthday!
good to see you guys last night
How are you doing?
Ah yeah, I've messed around with that before
having a lot of success with coding the low-level parts in java and high level in clojure
really satisfying to finally just be writing samples.... I think this is the level I've always wanted to work on
Ah yeah, nice
Yes, there is a buffer
4410 samples wide
trying to strike a balance
Totally. So far I am making them buffer agnostic, but karplus strong is tricky that way
Like right now the table does interpolation, so the table's buffer size is independent of the signal buffer
Right, trying to work in the ideal space as long as possible and translating them to samples at the last moment
333333333
333
333333333
33333
33333333333
How goes justin_smith? What is the status?
Ah yeah, I can imagine that could be a challenge
Where are you at in music theory these days?
That is kind of awesome actually
I know I have said this before, but I think you would benefit greatly from ear training
Are you getting closer to where that would be an entertainable idea? : )
Or should I just never bring it up again?
Understood, yeah me too
3333333
Well justin_smith what do you think? Do you want to continue with the music project as is? Should we switch it up? You just want some free time?
Cool, I'll be on chat later
333333
333333333
You have to start somewhere
3333333333
Hahahahaha
Yeah that is kind of funny
I think they got this move out of some corporate motivation handbook
So sprinklr just acquires LB to snuff it then? I don't understand this stuff
Ah, good to hear
Whereabouts?
Ahhhh
No way
so weird
Why not just use yours though? Still doesn't make sense really
Cool, good to hear there are other clojure jobs around
Say hi to jeffgodd for me
Oh shit
Oh wow
Yeah that would do it I suppose
It does seem bad form
It is good to switch things up from time to time
It sounds like since it became sprinklr it kind of went downhill
Yeah, what do these other companies do?
Perhaps he doesn't really care yeah
I think Jeff is working because he wants to, not necessarily because he has to
Oh! hmmmm
Then maybe he just really doesn't like India ; )
But will there be mongo?
In the end what are the tangible issues with mongo that you see?
and what would you use instead?
No
is it a movie?
Awesome
That is amazing, I'll check it out
I would watch that.
Funny I just went to an improv show
I was thinking about getting involved
Oh! Ha, I meant theater improv
That is how I took your suggestions
I guess I have it on the brain, so interpreted your scenario that way
I think it would work either way
Have you ever done it?
I think you would slay at it
The thing is you don't try and be funny. If people try and be funny it sucks. You just get in the flow and respond with the obvious thing and it seems funny from the outside
That's why I think you would be great at it
could be a fun evening, even if it is a total disaster
I was always into the surrealist over funny improv anyway
justin_smith: Hmmm interesting, so does the repo referenced need to have a jar associated, or does the system build the jar etc?
justin_smith: Yeah I can see jeffgodd not wanting to hand over control, that is like his baby
"clj standalone deps tool you can specify a commit hash on a github repo as a dep"
Oh, so it clones in the repo and you use the source?
Hmmmmmmmmmmmmm, is that better? Seems kind of weird actually
Hey quile!
Good to hear from you again : )
Let's jam out soon man, it's my turn to treat you to a show now
Not at all, no worries
I go through weeks at a time where I forget to boot my irc client
Oh really? Okay, I can see that
Yeah, I am starting to come around
Go does this, but they just pull from master
I hate it
but referencing a specific commit seems like it would solve those problems
33333333333
333
Ha! Yeah just saw that, I enjoyed it a lot
It reminded me of Stalker.... a lot
Have you read the book?
Ah I have been curious about that also
That sounds cool actually, what projects do you have in mind?
I looked at wavelets at some point
I came away with a vague understanding of "fourier transforms with non-sine waveforms?"
justin_smith: https://twitter.com/mysticfaechild/status/971610057833091072
I am down with that idea
3333333
3333333
Wooooooooo!
Back in real life
How are things around here?
333333333
Oh yeah! Where is the new gig?
I have been missing out on this channel
Yeah! nice man, congrats on that
Funding circle looks pretty cool
I like the idea of p2p loans, will have to see how that works out in practice
Oh seriously? That is rad
I didn't realiize he worked there
Seriously, great news
That is a key sign
It is alright, I am actually looking around now
I have determined having a boss that knows some code is worse than one who doesn't, as they have opinions about how things should be done
instead of just appreciating the results
He is trying to force everyone to use Go, which IMO is an extremely unfortunate choice
I may be. I am going to see how this lead in CA goes, they are doing exactly what I want to be doing (full cell models)
If that doesn't work out I will probably be hitting you up
though it is looking promising. The only obstacle now is I am wondering if I can still live in Portland and work down there
Oh nice! It is at Stanford actually, so a little SE
not sure how the geography works out down there
3333333
quile: Hahaha yeah. I have never really hung out down there
What is your experience with it?
Haha well, I have heard similar stories from others
333333333333
Saw Flash Gordon last night at the academy theater.... holy shit.
I don't know how I ever missed that
What was going on in 1980
It was an amazing confluence of forces
That's just the long way to say "plant"
Wooooooooooo!!
333333
33333333
Hahaha wtf
333333333
Oh nice, yeah distsys is becoming your specialty it seems
Are you going to be constructing a new distributed system or improving an existing one?
That is beautiful :, (
It is
33333333
That one is dark
I like "sharp omniscient bottle"
33333333333
Hey justin_smith, how's the trip going?
33333333
333333333
Ah nice, so you are being productive right away then?
I love doing that stuff actually
bringing order to codebases
That is the craziest bat ever
I like the image of a bat smashing things with a bat to determine where things are
33333333
Yoyoyo
How goes justin_smith?
Welcome back!
Hahaha in what way does it improve your typing then?
thanks, good to be back
Nice. I still love my kinesis, not sure how it can be improved
I'll have to see a picture
Ah yeah, that does look cool
completely split halves
(nice my paredit was about to freak out)
The problem with keyboards is they live below the level of conscious thought, so there is this retraining process you have to go through
kind of like learning a language
I would love to switch from qwerty, but dvorak has other problems
and it would be a full on commitment
Yeah, that too!
Or like when I play piano in my dreams and the keys are always distorted in some weird way
too narrow, too long, sticking out at random angles
Yeah I can see that
333333333
333333
333333
33333
333333333333
I can see that, they are kind of sewn together: https://www.google.com/search?q=sydney+opera+house&source=lnms&tbm=isch&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjWjZe_wOfaAhVFzGMKHbHEBrMQ_AUICygC&biw=2560&bih=1316
I feel like this is more of a cosmetic feature than a fundamental structural unit
it seems like you would lose some tensegrity by compromising the sphere like that
Arg is a form of art with more frustration
I would like to give that thing a spin and see how it feels
Oh nice! I have had a regular event on Thursdays for so long I haven't been to the clojure meetups
So are they tele-ing in then?
3333333
333333333333
Nice
I just hope it is benevolent
I think if the theology is about the pursuit of truth and harmony perhaps
justin_smith: I think claiming to be the truth and actual commitment to finding truth are two different things ; )
Ah yeah! Leila is great
never got to hang out too much with her unfortunately
where is she living now?
333333333
33333333
Oh.... really?
Where is this API?
Ah, so publicly facing but not free
Who is using this API right now?
And why?
Kind of reminds me of fullcontact
but worse
I remember you resisted a smartphone for a long time
Are you going back?
It is weird to willingly carry a spy device around with me everywhere I go
Right, so you would have to go total savage then
Yeah that seems pretty severe
Well, good information to know
I feel like as a human being now we are generating so much data just by living and there is such a demand for knowing all of our data that there is really no way to avoid it at this point
Even if you never owned a phone or computer, there is still a ton of data on you out there
I mean, there were tracking mechanisms in place going back awhile now, back when everything was paper
digital reality has just amplified this exponentially
Back in the day investigators could pull travel records, bank records, housing records etc and get a similar picture at a far lower resolution
The thing is, government agencies already use all this data and have had it for awhile now. This is just notable in that anyone can get it.
Yeah, I feel dystopia is being relentlessly generated all around us while leaving day to day life relatively untouched, and once critical mass is reached the transition will be sudden and complete
We will find the walls were being built all around us while we were paying attention to superheroes or whatever
Hahahaha
That is a pretty great idea, you need to find the right person to pitch this to
333333
Oh hey
Well, I just gave them eight references
I think they are still checking them
but once that is done I should have an offer?
Kind of a maddening process actually
Has been going on since January
Thanks!
How is your situation going?
Ha, hopefully I won't need to turn it down ; )
(should it ever arrive holy christ)
Ah yeah, that is mad
That is awesome
Ah yeah, privacy concerns are a bitch
I get plenty of that with HIPAA at OHSU
justin_smith: It is, though I don't really use it
33333333
Ha, yeah man!
That is getting pretty ultimate there
Power station
333333333333
Hey man! Yeah, more delays basically
They want to bring me in at a higher level, but that means they have to open a new job posting for it and do due diligence etc
Yeah so it is good news, but it means I am still essentially waiting for an offer
We'll see!
quite a saga
How is your work thing going?
3333333333
Nice!
justin_smith: Hey man!
I took a look at it, it seems pretty cool
Haven't integrated it into the flow yet though
Ah, you will have to share your insights
Ah that is badass, I see what you're saying
If you have the spec, you can just generate the data
in that form
Have a good article to point to? Or maybe write one? : D
I would like to try that out
I could probably figure it out from your description
but there should be something that describes this process
Do you have a blog yo?
Ah that place is delicious, I miss having more than two food options
Hey quile!
NZ, badass!
I miss that place
So wait, you are coming back?
Nice
Yeah
Always access to bath salts
I'm not sure the last time I walked into target
but also, I don't have kids
I can imagine target becomes an important source of items in parenthood
33333333
333333
3333333333
Yo
justin_smith: Thanks man! Looking forward to it
3333333
Hey man, thanks for coming out to the beach! That was a blast
Hahahaha awesome
3333333
Dude those buffalo goats are out of control, this isn't sustainable
Oh nice!
I might be going down to look at a place here soon
My first day is July 16
Good to hear you are getting back down there!
33333333
Hey justin_smith: Looks like I am moving down around the 7th of July, first day is on the 16th
When are you down next?
we should hang out down in some other city
33333333
33333333
I'm not sure that's possible
justin_smith: Back on a computer after a generous break : ) How goes over there??
(it's true, that was sarcasm)
Oh! Nice.... are you saying this hasn't been done yet?
Awesome, that sounds like a great problem
Checking it out
have you looked into it?
Hey man yeah, this is my first week
in the lab
getting everything set up, finding out how they do things around here
Pretty bonkers! This place is awesome
They are building cells. It is amazing
I have a lot to learn ; )
How is your gig going lately?
That is awesome
Kind of like typed clojure, in a way
33333333
Man how many aardvark corollaries went into the creation of this carpet
Carnage
3333333
I want to hear the tonal thunder
Hey justin_smith: Looks like I'll be setting things up on google cloud, you ever used that?
Right now they have a jenkins continuous integration deployed on a local cluster.... basically emulating a server (they restart it every week)
Implementing a server on a task execution system.... kind of interesting ; )
I have told them about the existence of servers, which they currently don't have : O
though they do have a google cloud account that one person in the lab is using, so I am thinking about spinning that up
Yeah, I am wary of all these hosted services.... seems like it provides similar functionality but doesn't give you control over deployment
I would much rather just have a vm and install what I want on it
justin_smith: That is surprising.... what country was it originally from? Was this a conquistador cultural appropriation thing?
I didn't realize that
Right, they loved trying to incorporate "exotic" cultural motifs, but it was mostly pretense
I like how we have become so accustomed to being able to access all information generated throughout human history that it is surprising when we can't
that is remarkable
Kind of like go ; )
Yes, just make something else of the same term orders of magnitude more popular and erase it from history
3333333
Ah yes, been meaning to see that one
definitely going to check it out
Fuck yes
That is what I like to hear
Oh yeah? What is their medium online? Twitter or other?
Link to the game?
Games are great : )
lots of potential for modeling and structuring human interactions
Nice! Not sure how I missed this guy
3333333
I need a bouncer
this is ridiculous
Smithaxe I am copying your setup right now
Sweeeeeeeeeeeet
weechat is the way to go
should have done this years ago
333333
justin_smith: Yeah heard something about that (twitter)....
What are the changes? Are they locking down the API? Is LB in trouble?? ; )
since it has been hanging out in plaintext for awhile now : P
How would you like to receive the new password?
I do somewhere
yes I remember when I was into that, let me refresh my memory
That needs to become a habit
non habits do not survive apparently
(just got back from lunch)
Hmmm emacs did not ask, perhaps I need a mode enabled?
Also, I assume there is a better way to do this than to attach the encrypted file to an email....
but there you go : )
Yeah not in package-list-packages either
A rogue script apparently : O
Nice, got that set up now
GPG is great
Yeah the integration with emacs kind of cinches it for me
So if I pick your key and my key we can both decrypt then?
Awesome
So any alternative to sending as an attachment in gmail?
3333333
Is there any other kind?
33333
333333333
It is never complete
quile: Sorry man, just went through that!
totally understand how things can go south
Do you have some leads?
I can reach out to some people, what kind of thing are you looking for?
Actually, send me your CV and some details and I will ask around
Yeah, best time to look IMO ; )
33333333
justin_smith: Pretty good! I just gave a demo yesterday of my first big feature
Before this they didn't have a way to run multiple simulations in parallel
and they have a guy coming from Virginia in September who is going to try to make a kind of agent based model out of multiple whole cell simulations
So I set up a distributed system where each cell has its own process and communicates with a larger environmental context through kafka
So basically the environment sends messages to all the cells as to what their local concentrations are
and the simulations run for a given time period, calculate their new local changes and report those back to the environment
the environment waits until it has received messages from all the registered simulations then integrates them and comes up with new concentrations to send back to all the simulations
You can even add or remove simulations while it is running (necessary for cell division) and it takes it in stride
Kind of cool yeah!
good to come in and feel like I am contributing right away
this is something they have been wanting to do for years and didn't know how
basically everything has been bound to a single process
How about you? What are you helping out with lately?
When are you coming by the Bay next? : )
Pretty stoked about bigraphs lately: https://www.cl.cam.ac.uk/archive/rm135/Bigraphs-draft.pdf
reminds me of when we tried to make the graph language like lisp is a list language
going to try to implement that
(the milner)
it seems like a pretty great abstraction
43333333
dextrous hunger algebra sounds interesting, though I hope I'll never have to use it
333333
3333
No better place than #tripartite
3333
celery facts are the worst
justin_smith: Whoa! Link? Gist or repo or something?
Nice! Let's definitely hang out then
I have a caltrain pass so I can come up to the city
Where are you staying?
Ah, well you could come down here as well, I have a (digital) piano : )
Also I could bring the trombone or bass clarinet your way
There is always the waterfront or something
3333333
3333333
justin_smith: Wow man, insane!
Let me know how it goes : )
Good to hear
Congrats man!
justin_smith: Hey man! Welcome : )
What's your plan?
How long are you here?
Awesome, Saturday during the day is probably the most plausible time for me to hang out
Caltrain is an hour+ each way and lets me off in the southern part of the city
Sounds good! Looking forward to it
If you feel like coming out this way one weeknight I would be happy to have you, understood if not though
I'm right off the California street stop
Hey quile! How goes man?
333333
Ouch
Ah, congrats on school! Man, I never appreciated how awesome elementary school was at the time
and sorry about the job, that sucks
Any good leads so far?
(I think I would rather have my cheese null moist than indentured unitary, just because I feel liberated cheese probably tastes better)
Never again
A profitable startup?? Whoa
Lots of crypto going on, I have a friend who keeps bugging me to get involved in his ICO
If I wasn't busy I might try it out, why not?
Turns out you can't avoid gambling in life, you are betting on one thing or the other
Me, I'm betting on ammo and food
(not really, I'm betting the system keeps going as it is as I have prepared for nothing)
Though I did just get a 55 gallon water drum, just in case
Also, crypto has been falling steadily since the big rush last year
but that doesn't necessarily mean it's over
I personally think the crypto thing may take over in 20 years, but the tech is not there now
you have to start somewhere though
justin_smith: Yeah! I think I read that too
From what I hear, the best thing you can do is forge good relationships with your neighbors
and have stuff like chocolate and salt yeah
There are so many different scenarios to prep for
I think the most immediate and plausible is probably the quake
in which case I want to have some water and food
Annie is doing a bunch of canning of all the stuff in her garden, that seems smart
justin_smith: That is a beautiful story
Reminds me of, have you read "Man's search for meaning" by Victor Frankl?
A similar theme of finding beauty in your fellow human beings in terrible situations
Second story, not so beautiful : O
That lady is an amazing writer btw
So once again, make friends with your neighbors
I think it still makes sense to have supplies, so you can help where you can
I have avoided ever buying a car or a gun in my life.... I know perhaps it is a privilege to do so, but I hope to never have to deal with these things
Cars are different I suppose in that I use car rental services, and I have never used gun rental services
Hey quile: gig is awesome
I'm actually building cells
my first project was to take the simulations and run them in a distributed way, through message passing with a shared environmental context
It is awesome, they have been wanting to do this for years
Last week I got an animation running so you can see the cells moving around consuming glucose in real (simulation) time
It is an agent based system, where the agents are whole cell simulations
It is like the coolest agent-based simulation to ever exist
Basically, completely stoked to be working on this stuff, what I've always wanted to do
Living in the bay area, well.... it's not why I'm here ; )
I've had a lot of remote calls with people playing distributed board games
developing a new one with my dad and brother, a sequel to Sol I think
which is the same since we worked remotely even when I was in Portland
Playing a round of Space Empires 4X with Anno
Working on a game called "Chronovore" with Mohammad
etc etc
All of my friends still live in Portland ; )
Miss you guys
On the plus side, I get to bike to work
the week is great, cause I'm building cells
weekends are weird
quile: I think I went on a long response to your question yesterday after you had left ; )
Ha no worries
I'll send you the transcript in an email
Ah yeah!
That would be a cool feature, hmmm
justin_smith: What time is your flight on Saturday?
quile: sent you the transcript
How is the job hunt going?
quile: Yeah agreed. It is a fine balance, confident but not arrogant, humble but not submissive
and yeah you have some serious experience
That's awesome. In a way this is a good opportunity then
at least, I always try to look on the bright side : )
Good luck man
quile: Oh yeah of course, please do
and would love to have you by!
justin_smith: I am the same way
always way early
So we can hang out until what, 3?
Awesome, looking forward to it
I'll try to get out of bed that day ; )
Oh rad!
All of slack?
It is kind of great, new job doesn't really use slack so I have forgotten about it
Feels good, not going to lie
I love counterintuitive things
Were you able to make it a library? Can you share the code?
333333
It never left
justin_smith: What kind of things did you intuitively expect they did not provide?
3333
3333333
Ha! So apparently zalgo is stored as separate strings.... ?
3333
That escalated quickly
justin_smith: client app! Bah
How extensive was the issue
?
Haha phantom dollars, that sounds undesirable
3333333
justin_smith: Yeah man! Me too
got an idea of what you want to do?
Where should we meet?
Also, there is a pretty awesome improv show tonight: http://www.improv.org/shows/tickets/?eid=29348&edid=113092
I was wondering if I shouldn't come out tonight and crash at your airbnb and we could catch the show?
(if there is room somewhere)
Otherwise I can just show up tomorrow morning
I'll be taking the caltrain in, but from there I can catch the redline I think would be the best?
What's the hotel? I'll check it out
That seems reasonable
Let me see about tickets
justin_smith: Looks like if I take all the transportation I will arrive at the theater at 7pm even
not sure I have time to walk from your place
want to meet up there at 7? There is probably somewhere to eat around there
Yeah looks like a few places
Hmmm though I might want to check into the room first and drop stuff off, might have to leave earlier
Are you going to be at the hotel?
Yeah that could work
Maybe I will take transport to the hotel and leave time to walk to the show
planning backwards....
Yep, if I take the bullet train 20 minutes earlier I get to the hotel at 6pm
that sounds better
justin_smith: ETA at hotel at 6:06pm
I'll have to check in etc
so we can just walk from there
meet up at hotel 6:20?
3333333333
33333
3333
333333333
33333333
justin_smith: Congrats on that man, a new level : )
333333
good to have range
333333333
333333333
33333
33333
33333333
33333333
justin_smith: Ah interesting, I am in Portland on Friday!
33333
@justin_smith: Okay what is the consensus, best book to learn clojure?
copypaste wants to learn
Haha
So, no consensus then
I thought about asking in the #clojure channel but didn't want to be annoying
asking a question that has probably been rehashed a thousand times
Maybe I'll ask then
I just call him copypaste in my mind now
3333333
quile: Happy birthday tomorrow!
How old are you going to be?
Hahaha congrats man that is a solid age to be. Prime?
Prime years are the best
3 x 13 is not so bad, 13's are pretty cool
It's all the even birthdays that make me nervous
333333
333
3333333
justin_smith: WTF! that guy you didn't get along with? Paco or whatever?
Oh shit, that sounds serious
Curious how that works out in practice
you'll have to let me know how it goes
They must have had trouble getting teams to cooperate ; )
quile: Badass! Glad you were able to decide : )
What was the other group?
Ah plangrid looks cool
Yeah that is a tough one
Looks like it, this looks like industry changing endeavor
Haha disruption has become a cliche now
At this rate what is not cliche? Can anything avoid becoming a cliche?
I feel like the rate of digestion of whatever into a cliche is accelerating as life goes on
Looking at both I think you made the right choice ; )
Right "cliche-resistance"
When do you start?
Nice man
So what went wrong with old premise? Started to go off the rails or something?
I feel like there is always highly instructive insight in business failures
Or did your boss turn out to be an asshole and the org is still fine?
quile: Understood, I realized after I asked that maybe it's not the most delicate question ; )
Total bummer how someone can come in and screw something up like that
glad you were able to get out
justin_smith: Great show man! You guys are awesome
Do you have recordings of these shows?
Well, intonation comes from the ear first : ) it is a constant adjustment. If you can hear it you can make the adjustment
3333333333
33333
3333333
3333
Hahahahhaa
3333333
3333333
It's good to let them age a little
3333333333
33333333
3333333
justin_smith: Oh? Never heard of that guy
Do you have a good first piece to check out?
33333333
3333333333333333333
justin_smith: Aha, welcome!
What does your new team do?
Ah nice, I like how you get to see different parts of the city
333333333
333333333
33333
333333333
Hey justin_smith: how is your visit going?
Oh nice, that sounds like interesting work
justin_smith: Yeah, the subject is fairly deep. What are you thinking of?
Ah I think I know what you're talking about, this happens all the time in code
along with its converse "overabstraction"
3333333333
Hey justin_smith: sorry I didn't get a chance to come by the city during this visit
Are you back in Portland?
33333333
Ha! Yeah man
welcome to the future
That stuff will probably turn out to kill you or something, but for now it's great
This sounds like real life
justin_smith: Hahaha oh so it wasn't just clojure that made him an ass then?
3333333333
33333333
33333333
Thanks for taking care of our humble bot D
333333333!
3333333
333333333333333
33333333333
Hey justin_smith: how's the music going lately? Am I missing any shows coming up?
Ah, sorry to hear that
I mean, I understand
but sorry to hear that the side effect is losing touch with the music community
Sucks that is so tied into facebook
I have an account, but I can't stand to log into it
3333333333
3333333333
3333333
Hey quile! Welcome back : )
Totally
I think I've just started to emerge from this process
How is the new gig??
DDDDDDDDD
33333333
quile: Just saw your question.... (lots of holiday travel) looks like air is back to normal!
I left on the Tuesday you asked actually, apparently they ended up canceling classes that week
it was grim for a bit there yeah
Apparently this is just what the future is like now
Oh yeah, and python is fucking horrible yeah
You know, it is not even so much the language I hate (though I could rant about it for a bit)
it is really the environment stuff
the proliferation of virtualenv, pyenv, pyenv-virtualenv etc etc is a huge red flag
You are basically writing C, in terms of linking and dependencies go
I don't think we are getting around python for modeling and scientific computing, but at least our servers and distributed architecture can use something sane
justin_smith: Oh yeah? That is awesome to hear about fennel
Yeah totally, but if they are starting on the right foot with deps and packages that is a good sign
usually that stuff is ad hoc established at the beginning and then you are stuck with it forever
(at least, that's what happened with python)
(and ruby)
justin_smith: Did you have your fennel con then??
quile: Agreed. I have had far fewer problems with JVM dependencies than any other programming environment
Maybe the whole goal of designing a VM forces you to solve problems about your environment you don't have to face until later if you are using a native language
3333333333
It is basically a longform phrase for "vaccine"
What is all this clojure hubbub about? I am out of the loop
I mean, Rich is not wrong.... technically. But languages live and die on the community, not the creator
by announcing that he is supreme commander and doesn't care what anyone thinks, he weakens the fabric of the community as a whole, which is ultimately bad for the language
How did js and ruby deal with the social problems well?
Ah yes, that is true
333333
Steam engine?
Is that about those crazy hats?
3333333
That one is great, I think I saw that star trek movie
and you are right, it is about the interaction not the badassness of the individual words
333333
3333333
333333
quile: That sounds rad! Recently saw Hilary Hahn in solo concert perform the Bach partita's for violin
It might be the most amazing thing I've ever seen, not sure
Yeah, something about the whole show being solo made it extra amazing, like we were entranced the whole time
she lives and breathes those Bach pieces
amazing how much music can come out of that tiny little instrument
Yeah, especially the Chaconne at the end of the D minor one
Yeah, just to be able to play it is mastery, then she plays it effortlessly and like a soul transcending, it may be the single greatest solo performance I've seen
333333333
333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333
Haha
Did you guys see the Giuliani tweet? https://twitter.com/RudyGiuliani/status/1068570837459050496
(hint, click on the link)
3333333333
33333333
3333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333!
Must be an even number
3333333333333333
3333333333333333
Every religion ever
3333333
33333333333
justin_smith: Not sure about the first error, probably swallowed somewhere in the IRC framework?
justin_smith: The second one means he is not getting the username/password I sent you in GPG at some point
justin_smith: bllleleeeeeerrrrrrrgggg man what is up with that guy
Tried to use cider/nrepl again recently and it throws all kinds of errors?
3333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
I have so many new nouns
33333333
33333333333333
*shudder*
Don't miss scala ho boy
3333333333333
Someone's got to do the dirty work
quile: Hey man yeah! I am heading up on the 23rd, you around?
justin_smith quile: Hey guys, I will be up in Portland from the 23rd to around the 3rd or 4th, you guys around at all?
Nice! Let's rock out then
https://sciencenotes.org/wp-content/uploads/2017/07/Periodic-Table-JustMetals2017-1024x576.png
Yeah me too! Pretty much totally open that whole time
justin_smith quile: Nice! Let's hang out for sure
excited to see everyone
Hahahaha at a hotel or something?
Ah, some people stay at the airport : |
Cool man, I'll make the trek out there then
Also, if you want to come visit stanford let me know ; )
Totally yeah, it is actually far enough away to be kind of an obstacle I've discovered
Also I think I'm picking up annie's hand me down vehicle so I will be mobile, if people want to go to the gorge or coast or anything
3333333333333333
3333333333333333
quile: Definitely. Or it could be the essential particle for stupidity, kind of like the graviton for gravity
Hmmmmm you should not be storing my 3333333's dogdog
333333333333333333
33333333333
33333333333333333333333
Happy solstice everyone
Alright, shutting the computer down for break
quile: No worries at all man!
quile justin_smith: Sorry I missed you both. Spent most of my time moving out of the 11th street house : (
333333333333
3333333333
quile: Ha! Yeah I'm out of there.... piano still there for now, I need to find a home for it
Also, lots of board games available if you want any ; )
I sent three boxes of games to my family in Tacoma, three of them went to Annie, 7 are coming back down to me and 17 boxes are going away
quile: Ah yeah, thanks for the lead! Yeah you don't want a giant baby grand in the middle of your living room??
33333333333
3333333333
33333333333333333
3333333333333
justin_smith: quile: You guys ever use FPGA's?
I am interested in an application
Looking at this paper: https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/19162916
seems super cool
Verilog seems insane
justin_smith: That sounds like a lot of fun actually, would love to write something that spits out verilog
what do you mean by "collapsing abstractions"?
Ah I see what you mean now
Yeah I can imagine that is pretty tricky to design
justin_smith: You have any shows coming up? I've been playing with Danny Sasaki (the drummer with the rototoms from that show you guys did) and we have been talking about doing a show. Would be great to do one with you guys!
I mentioned it to Stephanie but as a kind of hypothetical, but we met up right before I left and he is into the idea also
They have that great red piano at the community center you guys always play at, I think it could work
Who's Mr. Flato??
Ah yeah I remember this guy. I don't think I've met him but I've heard you talk about him. Let me know if you guys get a show together and want some experimental acoustic music : )
3333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333
33333333333333
3333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
(too late)
That's a cause I can get behind
3333333333333333
Oooooooohhhhh that sounds amazing
A bunch of divine bears singing?
count me in
333333333333333
33333333333
33333333333
3333333333333333333333333333
33333333333
I am hoping more will come around
3333333333333333333333333
Hahaha perfect
Wait where's Nietzsche?
3333333333333333333333
That's just tautological
Hahahaha wtf
3333333333333
Just wrote a python extension in C
I think I love C
it is so antifunctional it becomes beautiful again
Seriously
Like, cool I have this block of memory and I can navigate anywhere inside of it? Who needs abstractions??
Yeah, I just took all this garbly numpy code with a bunch of fancy operations and turned it into a few nested loops
It does way less, way less code, way faster, and actually clarifies what is happening
I mean I appreciate numpy
but nothing like raw pointer access and loops
333333333333
3333333333333333
33333333333
333333333333333333333
33333333333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
Hahaha nice
@justin_smith: Hey man, in town next week! Want to get some lunch or something?
Cool, you have a favorite lunch spot lately? Been awhile since I've been downtown : O
Ah that place is delicious
Is Thai Peacock still a thing?
Well we can work it out, Indian place sounds good. Thai peacock I have warm memories of. I don't remember anything else about downtown Portland, but that is probably sufficient knowledge
3333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333
33333333333333333
justin_smith: Cool! Let's do 12:30 or 1 then
Maybe let's just say 1
justin_smith: Ah awesome, I'll let you know when I get there then
or heading there
33333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333
333333333333
Hey justin_smith, great to see you! Thanks for dealing with Abhi, he kind of followed me to lunch : ) I like the guy though, he has a phd in physics and builds some serious tools. Learned a lot from that guy so far.
Oh yeah! It is sitting in my driveway now : ) I finally have a car
Really the only way I would get one is as a handmedown from a friend, we'll see how long it lasts!
33333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333333333
Hey quile! welcome back
(nevermind quile is no longer here)
3333333333333333
3333333333333333
I still use postulate thumb mathematics in a bind
quile: So you are partially responsible for the air trombone apocalpyse then
Hahahaha
Hahaa
There we go
justin_smith quile: Okay, what do you guys use for devops? Puppet? Ansible? Whatever the F else 300 options? Just ssh in and install stuff??
About to do a large google cloud deploy
justin_smith: Do you dig mesos? I mean, you called it a rube goldberg machine but that is like all of computers
quile: What did you use at premise then?
Apparently there is also now Terraform (sigh)
Yeah totally, I don't think we need the whole CI thing
Ah okay, so terraform is a kind of meta-ansible or something?
(been awhile since I've had to deal with this stuff and it seems like they've invented a bunch of stuff in the meantime)
Ah okay
interesting
Oh yeah, happy birthday!!
Which is highly serious
Ha yeah, congrats guys!
I am working for a giant bureaucratic organization ; )
No stock options here
There are lots of scientists in lab coats, which is a tradeoff I guess
I would buy into that venture for sure
blurry omen turtle, the only honest kind
3333333333333333
It's either delicious or it kills you instantly
33333333333333333
Rambunction is highly prized
3333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333
33333333333333333
Hahahaa
Kind of the loser of the searing morlock club
searing laser morlock and searing meteor morlock play pranks on him
333333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333333
33333
3333333333333333
33333333333333333333
333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333
Hey quile/justin_smith! General concurrency question/puzzle for you, wondering how you would solve this problem
We have a state which is a giant vector of integers (counts). Each time step, all the processes read from this state and separately determine their updates (additions or subtractions at each index). When updates are applied, any negative values at any indexes are invalid.
The only way this could happen is if two or more processes subtract from the same index enough to pass zero.
How do you ensure no values drop below zero?
: )
quile: No, you want to do the best thing you can, ie honor the updates of each process to the fullest extent you can
justin_smith: That is interesting
Ah that makes sense, it seemed like a familiar idea
justin_smith: That makes sense. So what if you want to still want to apply as much of the updates as you can?
Like, just rejecting the update is not an option
So one option is you do it in order, and the later processes just get shafted
This introduces a bias towards earlier processes
which is an artifact since there is no essential ordering
Yeah that is an option
The other potential solution is to reduce the time step so that these two processes need less and less until it works out that together they leave a total of zero
which would involve recalculating some stuff
Right, I think I want a kind of "multi-compare-and-swap" where it gathers all of the potential updates and then resolves them as a collection
justin_smith: What kind of state model did you have in mind?
So I think I want to encode updates as messages
justin_smith: Exactly, this is where it is leading me
Yeah there is a reconciliation burden between all these processes which I don't think can be avoided
Yeah totally, very similar situation actually
It is generating a signal basically, a complex vector signal
Yeah very much so, this is entirely dataflow in a giant cycle (actually many cycles)
Now I am wondering about implementing this as a DSP algorithm
Yes true
Yeah, like different time scales
It has definitely come up
and we currently have certain submodels which proceed to "steady-state" during a time step which basically means they are miniature simulations happening inside the larger simulation
justin_smith: Hahahaha
That is my daily struggle
Hahaha oh man : O
WTF
Well, I suppose you could get a throwaway windows laptop for like $20
Yeah, it is surreal now
I am so steeped in *nix culture it is shocking to see what people do on windows
Actually, it is shocking just to see people navigate around in finder on their macs to do something with a file
Like, terminal bro
Seriously
I am too!
started on commodore64.... took a bad detour through windows that put me off computers at all
Saved by the *nix, thank you justin_smith
(Or damned, one or the other)
justin_smith: Oh yeah, that is a classic pattern
How many times have I seen that
Also, gets at a key truth in software development: It is easy to make a program do what you want, in comparison to making it comprehensible to others when it goes wrong
That is almost my definition of software "maturity"
Basically it has been used enough for long enough that enough people got frustrated enough with its opaqueness to actually build tools to gain insight into its operation
Hahahaha yeah and then after the initial rush the reality of how vast the effort is to actually make something usable sets in
which mostly continues from that point ad hoc until you end up with everything being PHP
33333333333333333333333333
Yeah that is a painful one
33333333333333333
justin_smith: No, never heard of the guy
What is he up to?
33333333
Wow, how did I miss out on that guy
I didn't know anyone else doing clojure at OHSU, in fact there was moderate hostility from some parties
33333333333
3333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333
"gracious paraprosdokian gibberish" is amazing
Hahahahaha my life in a nutshell
333333333333333
333333333333333333333
333333333333333
33333333333333333
Wow, that is a true poem
That, is not
333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333
There we go
That is the most outlandish poem yet dogdog
quile: Hahahaha no way! Well, not quite our idea but getting there
Soon creation will devour itself
33333333333333333333333333333
Agreed
justin_smith: Hahahaha I think you showed him man, nicely done
You should be proud, even if he does not understand enough to be
at the end of March and beginning of April if you guys want to hang out
quile: Maybe I can give you a few days heads up? Or is it better to play it by ear?
Cool
will do
justin_smith: You have any shows coming up or anything? Maybe we can go to a show or something
I have a show on the 29th, which may or may not be either amazing or a disaster
quile: I found the ultimate drummer and we are going to do some improvised pattern kaleidoscope music
At Leaven Center
Yeah! Should be fun
I've been practicing
3333333333333333333333333333333
Oh is it Bach day?? Nice!
I will be honoring him with some fugues later tonight
333333333333333333
I'm going to have to remove all the threes from your history
Thanks for bringing him back up justin_smith: what was the stacktrace this time?
I periodically get inspired to update him
but then forget what the issue was
Huh, so his ping just fails at times
sounds like something deeper in the lib
connection recovery man, the bane of distributed systems
(well there are probably lots of banes)
Hahaha
You know what's reliable, crushing things with rocks
people shouldn't be using computers if they want something reliable
Ah okay! Yeah seems like a lot of people are in other countries (?)
Dude you are going to London???
Wow
That sounds amazing, I hear there are some good people over there
Isn't Sam Aaron a londoner? And bodil perhaps?
Hey man, congratulations! That is a huge step
good luck out there
Have you met her yet or is she an internet person?
Ah that is even better
Another poem dogdog
333333333333333333333
3333333333333333
333333333333333
quile: Oh you are going to autodesk? Did your company get acquired or something?
We recently met with one of the guys there in charge of systems research or something
This guy: https://www.autodeskresearch.com/people/azam-khan
That is awesome, congrats!
Had you been there long enough to get a bonus of some kind?
Fuck yeah
that was good of them!
a good sign
33333333333
This is the story of my life
(not really that just sounded like a badass thing to say)
It did happen to me as a child though, several times, waking up with the pillow attached to my ear from bleeding out of my ruptured ear drum (can't hear very well out of that ear)
so is true in a way
It may have happened right after I saw that movie for the first time now that I think about it
3333333333333
Wow, talk about self-referential
3333333333333333333333333
ouch man
Who put discharge in there
> git blame
3333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333
333333
3333333333333333
333333333333
3333333333333
That's like what a forehead is
333333333333333333
3333333333333333333
333333333333333333
justin_smith: I think I started it and got kind of weirded out
trying to remember
Didn't the protagonist just start having random sex with people?
Yeah : ) it seemed random
Like, I just didn't follow the motivation or what was happening
but that may be because I'm such a vanilla
Apparently some people live this way and it is normal to them?
Right, very much a product of the 70's or whatever
That makes a lot more sense
I think if I went into it with that perspective I may enjoy it more
Yeah I remember it being very interesting, and the prose was kind of crazy and gritty and surreal
Yeah, so that just keeps going then? Hahahaha
I don't know when I became such a puritan
3333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333333333333
Every three word poem is just another euphemism for the internet
No one liked my question about oracle.... did I touch a sore spot unwittingly? Or some other kind of ignorance? I have been doing this lately
3333333333333333333
It seems pretty rough actually
Nothing concrete, just seems like they are making it harder and harder to access the jdk without oracle's wacky license
I fear for the future, is all
333333333333333333
3333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333
Whoa there universe
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
justin_smith: No way!
Wow man, crazy!
Enjoy the mayhem, whoa : O
Yeah that is a pretty good phrase, don't even need to be from another continent! Always applicable
How long are you there?
Ah okay, welcome back! So you were there a week then?
Nice man, you have assembled some kind of clojuremacs
That is pretty badass. So fennel feels usable then? I haven't tried it yet
Awesome that lua is still getting some love
I thought it was on some kind of decline, though it has found a niche somewhere? Embedded stuff or something?
Nice. Yeah everyone squawks about the 1-based indexing but ultimately it wasn't that big of a deal. Like, pick one it's fine
Julia also has this feature
I found it way less disruptive than I thought it would be
How is fennel performance?
So the data structures are not persistent then? That would be a mental shift
eeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
3333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
Usually you want those things to be stable
3333333333333333333333333333
LOL
3333333333333333
33333333333
Awesome! I'll check it out
3333333333333333
LOL
33333333333333
333333333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
3333333333
dogdog not sure about your poems today
33333333333
3333333333333
3333333333333333
justin_smith: Hey man, you around the bay?
Not going to daft punk tonight after all ; )
Was thinking about heading to the beach tomorrow perhaps
How long are you around?
Haha awesome, okay good to know
When do you take off Saturday?
If you can make it down here at all that would be awesome.... I was up in Berkeley last weekend but this weekend I think I am here
Wow man, I didn't even know those existed
I'll check that out
I am also up in Portland next week
Have you built some kind of instrument with it yet? I would like to see that
Ah nice, yeah! this thing looks awesome
Hanging out with Samia this Friday night but totally down to meet up for a bit if you come out, you could meet this person
333333333333333
33333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
: O
justin_smith: LOL that is beautiful
So, I had some influence on you after all? Or perhaps just a ghost lurking in your mind
It even has the quasi-biological function names
Yeah, DNA sequencing is nuts. They only have little fragments and then overlay and piece them all together in the most parsimonious way
it is very non linear
and relies on a lot of statistical findings
but all the shards come pre-cut
Well, they are cut before they make it into the machine. It is more that the process of separating and preparing the DNA for sequencing also splits it up into shards. By the time they dump it in the machine it is a bunch of fragments, and the output of that machine is like a giant array of subsequences, which is the input to the sequencing algorithm
So by the time the code gets there, they are already cut
LOL
justin_smith: Yeah, denaturing is just like a protein unfolding because of temperature or pH or something, not actually lyzing anything
lyzing is the cut
yeah
: )
Almost an assembly or recruitment
justin_smith: Link to ; or, the Whale ?
Looking around, it is a hard thing to google for
That's it! Thanks
someone wrote a PR with a title that is uncannily evocative of the title
of that book
33333333333333333333
I want to hear the tonal ones
333333333333333
Are there any other kinds?
33333333333333333333333
3333333333333
3333333333333333333333333333333
justin_smith: I have not, sfw?
sfs?
LOL yes! I have seen this somewhere but forgot those were the words
I want to draw portraits of arbitrarily generated sequences of letters
Well, sound is essentially related to structure and motion and ultimately resonance, so it makes sense really that different shapes would make different sounds
side note: I believe the word is onomatopoeia
you put a tomato in there : ) maybe because you like tomatos?
Perhaps it is more acoustically parsimonious with the definition
LOL
333333333333333333333
justin_smith: Yeahhhhhh!!
Listening now
unreasonably satisfying
3333333333333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333
justin_smith: Oh yeah! I had wanted to go to that, of course I lost track of everything in the intervening time
that space junk project sounds pretty awesome actually
As I understand it there is a *lot* of space junk
Oh wow, that distsys talk looks awesome
Did you meet any good people? It seems like a pretty great conference for making connections with interesting people
That is badass!
We are horrible animals
look at what we've done
How long have we been in space?? smh
Wow, great idea
33333333333333
LOL quile, give us a chance to respond man
justin_smith: badass!
What game are you making?
Great
justin_smith: That is pretty spectacular
So on the game, is it just you guys or is there more of a team?
3333333333333333333333
33333333333333
333333333
3333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
33333333333333333333333
3333333333333
33333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333333
Don't eat at taco bell
Let's go with not
justin_smith: Yeah, great to hang out! Glad you got to meet her : )
justin_smith: Awesome news! What did you guys do?
That is awesome man, happy to hear it
It's good just to find the fun there
Haha yeah man! Feels good
there is a feedback loop there for sure
33333333333333333333
justin_smith: Like a weapon??
I have downloaded ableton and now I am making a bunch of wacky songs this week
it is absurdly fun
Not sure why I resisted digital music for so long (oh right I hate computers)
Oh yeah? Same conceptual model?
I didn't know ableton doesn't support linux
still hacking on my old mac (though I will never buy a new one)
I'll check it out, thanks!
Do you distribute on soundcloud pretty much?
trying to figure out where to post these songs
I'll send them over, they are pretty maximal so far so may offend you ; )
Ah okay, I'll check out bandcamp then
We'll find out, looking forward to feedback : )
still trying to figure out how to compose everything, but I think I have some good material here
Okay, bandcamp registered
Thanks!
333333333333333333333333333333333
LOL congrats man what!
nicely done!
I have my first track, I am subverting the pop genre: https://soundcloud.com/youdonotexist/platform
(it even has a beat)
Thanks for checking it out! I like the silence at the end : )
Yeah still very much an improvisation
I laid down a bunch of tracks and then you can turn them on and off as it records
so kind of an incoherent mass
Lots to learn
Good to get some feedback, I'm going to keep trying stuff
33333333333333333333333
33333333333333333
3333
333333333333333333333333333333333
justin_smith: So you use bitwig then? I downloaded ableton from ignorance, are they comparable?
Have you used both?
Wanting to learn something that works on linux also
333333333333333
Interesting, yeah it looks like bitwig has more built-in synthesis
I was thinking about putting instruments together with supercollider or something
Any new progress in programming audio synthesis or is supercollider still the way to go? : )
I still have all this overtone code
I kind of want to code sounds and then control them through midi
I also have the beginnings of a modular synth in java
Always
333333333333333333333
Okay new track: https://soundcloud.com/youdonotexist/imdbon
Warning: beats
Nice! Probably because of all of my default synths ; )
Thanks for listening, still trying to work everything out
definitely being stuck with built in sounds is a limitation, I keep wanting to code things
Turns out overtone was updated last two months ago?
someone is maintaining it, at least for bugs it seems
33333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333333
justin_smith: Is there a simple clojure work queue server? Like, one client puts messages in different queues, other clients make requests to a queue and claim a single message etc
otherwise I'm about to write one
justin_smith: I have been using rabbit but it is heavy to create and destroy queues
wanted to make something more lightweight, but I hear your warning
Just imagining it it feels like using atoms and atomic swaps gives the behavior I want, but there are probably gotchas yeah
LOL right, I see
So it is not about making the queues behave correctly, it is about making the queues behave correctly in the face of unpredictable network behavior
Well, I feel like that can still happen when I am using rabbit
but I hear you
I wish kafka worked for work queues
Right I follow
Cool thanks for the advice! So make rabbit work or use redis, don't try to implement a super simple work queue
Cool, back to hunting through the rabbit docs
For some reason it seems so simple : )
You have some good reading on these issues?
You read that whole book etc yeah?
Interesting, what state about other servers do you think a work queue needs?
That is crazy though, I see what you mean. It is like the communication problem with the two generals as a fundamental obstacle
Really there is no way to make that guarantee
I feel like this is some kind of "information can only travel at the speed of light" limitation for distributed systems
That said, the work queue I imagine only needs to know about its queues and what messages are in it, perform an atomic operation when a client requests a message, and perform an atomic operation when the client completes the message
Failure modes: client doesn't get the message, client fails and never says it completed message etc
Yeah I am already convincing myself it would end up a hairy problem
good perspective on that
Agreed
de acuerdo
justin_smith: Awesome, that makes it pretty clear
Planning things out with the other engineer today, this will make good discussion
Yes, I feel like I've done this before
LOL I'll check it out
Interesting! It is kind of mathematical philosophy?
Still working through Robert Rosen's "Life Itself" (for the third time)
and Samia and I are going to go through her old quantum mechanics book, which I'm pretty excited about
It's like math poetry, I love it
This is how to make the world a better place
Okay yeah, verified this is one of the greatest things ever. Ordering a copy for myself
Also, kind of inspiring art form!
Yeah but I need one to wave around and quote out of etc
seriously, great find, thanks!
Right, those books that are a kind of essential creation. This is one!
3333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333333333333333333333
3333333333333
3333333333333333333333
Wow dogdog those are some pretty bad poems, kind of all of them
Nice try shifting blame, but you made these poems dogdog
3333333333333333
3333333333333333333
333333333333333333333333
3333333333333
3333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333333333
justin
That didn't work
I was typing then my server went down
Apparently it took about ~26 minutes to work it out
but it did somehow send my partial message across?
I was going to tell you I have 11 tracks total now ; )
Entertaining possible names for this new genre (if it really is a new genre)
333333333333333333333333333
333333333333333333
perhaps
3333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333
welcome back
justin_smith: LOL
If only
the world
made that much sense
3333333333333333333333333333
Welcome back
justin_smith: Oh hey! Yeah let's hang out
I was thinking about coming into town tomorrow night actually
going climbing with Samia
Want to try climbing? ; )
or we can meet before or after
or Samia and I can change our plans
I didn't think I'd like climbing, but now I love it
How late do you stay up nowadays?
Okay, well Mission Cliffs is open to 11, so we could hang out before that, somewhere until 8:30 or 9?
Yeah! museums are surprisingly great
anything you have in mind?
I have been to the MOMA a few times but always still love to go
Looks like MOMA is only open until 5, not sure I can get there that early unfortunately
unless I take the day off, which could be okay
I am plotting taking the day off so we can go to MOMA
It will never arrive, until May
Okay taking tomorrow off! That means I can sleep in and then let's go to MOMA in the afternoon : )
That sounds great. MOMA closes at 5 fyi
3333333333333333333333
Hey man, great to hang out! Glad we got to see some Rothko and Twombly, that was pretty amazing
333333333333333333333
It probably evolved from an upright promenade released from selective pressure
33333333333333333333333
justin_smith: Hey man, getting back into digital synthesis lately, working on some table generators and digital waveguide synthesis
Do you have any good resources for modern synthesis?
It has been many years since I looked into it, I'm wondering if there has been any progress or if it is still this Julius O Smith guy: https://ccrma.stanford.edu/~jos/swgt/swgt.html
Also, I don't know how it took me so long to discover that CCRMA is on campus and they have shows every night of the week, I'm going to start attending
What is :b8 and :b5? Do you have a fancy IRC client that displays emojis or something?
333333333333333333333333333333333333
33333333333333333333333333333333333
gaining new abilities every day
Make a choice
Hey justin_smith! How you holding up?
I may be going insane already
doesn't bode well
Yeah! it is hard to care about small things when giant things are happening
there is like a scale of attention or caring, a concentration of concern that large events wipe out the signal of smaller concerns
justin_smith: Hey man thanks! I was going for the slow melting into madness, then sudden catharsis
Hey awesome! I'll check that out
would be great to play with you and others
we could even emerge with some recordings or something
I've been getting deeper into this signal processing also, would be good to have a call on filter design/theory etc at some point
Right! IRC is great, but most people won't use it really
I did a tour recently through all the messaging apps
I settled on signal, it is end-to-end encrypted and all the heavy security guys seem to concur it is the way to go
Basically, it would be good to have a music group chat, which leads immediately to platform choice etc etc tech is the downfall of humanity
You have thoughts on that? We could rally people behind a common cause I think
Basically, until I leave my house again, group chat is the future of human interaction
Yeah, that too
discord does all that I think
(listening now, thanks for sending!)
Hey man, this is great
I haven't heard your viola in awhile, it's come a long way
the potential is getting realized there
justin_smith: Exactly. I've been finding that spontaneous music making takes continuous practice and almost total mental and spiritual commitment to truly honor
Like, it is only valid if you attain true flow state resonance with total mind immersion lol but maybe!
justin_smith: Awesome! I will be listening to this today
Haha hey godgod?
Whoa man, this George Lewis is amazing!
Where has this been my whole life
justin_smith: Want to try out this ninjam soon? Looking into it, we can host a server but it will need some bandwidth
